CIK: 1409269
Company Name: VENUS CONCEPT INC 
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2020-03-30
Accession Number: 0001564590-20-014222


Item 1 Business. Overview We are an innovative global medical technology company that develops, commercializes, and delivers minimally invasive and non invasive medical aesthetic and hair restoration technologies and related practice enhancement services. Our aesthetic systems have been designed on a cost effective, proprietary and flexible platform that enables us to expand beyond the aesthetic industry traditional markets of dermatology and plastic surgery, and into non traditional markets, including family and general practiti1rs and aesthetic medical spas. In the years ended December 31, 2019 and in 2018, a substantial majority of our systems delivered in North America were in non traditional markets. In November 2019, we completed our business combination with Venus Concept Ltd. and the business of Venus Concept Ltd. became the primary business of the company, a global leader in hair restoration. It significantly expanded our presence and capability in the hair restoration market. We have developed and commercialized a robotic device, the ARTAS System, that assists physicians in performing many of the repetitive tasks that are part of a follicular unit extraction surgery, or FUE, a type of hair restoration surgery. In July 2018, we introduced the ARTAS iX Robotic Hair Restoration System, which we believe is the first and only robotic intelligent solution to offer precise, minimally invasive, repeatable harvesting and implantation functionality in 1 platform. The system delivers procedural analysis, precision, repeatability and clinical workflow efficiency for hair restoration. Through our NeoGraft division, which we acquired in 2018, we offer an automated hair restoration system that facilitates the harvesting of follicles during an FUE process, improving the accuracy and speed over commonly used manual extraction instruments. Our hair restoration systems are sold primarily to plastic surgeons and dermatologists, and in the U.S. we offer doctors using the NeoGraft system the services of a group of independently contracted technicians, whom we market as VeroGrafters. This group of approximately 50 technicians is available to assist the physician during a NeoGraft hair restoration procedure. The ARTAS iX System complements our NeoGraft hair restoration system and allows us to penetrate a broader segment of the hair restoration market. We have developed and commercialized twelve technology platforms, including our ARTAS and NeoGraft systems. We have received clearance from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, or FDA, for the combined use of multipolar radio frequency, or RF, and pulsed electromagnetic fields, or PEMF, for non invasive treatment of facial rhytides (wrinkles) in Fitzpatrick skin types I (ivory) IV (light brown), and temporary reduction in the appearance of cellulite, among others. We have also received FDA clearance for the use of our diode laser system for non invasive fat reduction (lipolysis) in the abdomen and flanks for certain body types. In certain jurisdictions outside of the U.S., our products have received marketing authorizations for indications such as temporary increase of skin tightening, non invasive lipolysis of the abdomen and flanks, cellulite reduction and uses for certain soft tissue injuries, among others, and for vaginal treatment in the Israeli market. Our proprietary multipolar RF and PEMF technologies, also referred to as our (MP) 2 technology, synergistically deliver consistent homogenous treatments in a minimally invasive process. We also use in our systems Intense Pulsed Light, or IPL, for treatment of benign pigmented epidermal and cutaneous lesions, lasers for hair removal and fractional ablative RF modality for skin resurfacing. The ARTAS system was cleared by FDA in April 2011 and the ARTAS iX was cleared by FDA in March 2018 to include implantation of harvested hair follicles. In the U.S., we have obtained 510(k) clearance from FDA for our Venus Freeze and Freeze Plus systems, Venus Viva , Venus Legacy , Venus Versa , Venus Velocity , Venus Heal , Venus Bliss and ARTAS systems. The Venus Glow and NeoGraft systems are listed as class I devices under FDA classification system. Outside the U.S., we market our technologies in over 60 countries across Europe, Asia Pacific and Latin America. Because each country has its own regulatory scheme and clearance process, not every device is cleared or authorized for the same indications in each market in which a particular system is marketed. 4 To address the financial barriers faced by physicians and aesthetic service providers globally, we focus our medical aesthetic product sale strategy on a subscription based business model in North America and in our well established direct global markets, which allows us to offer our aesthetic products to non traditional providers and medical spas. Traditional energy based aesthetic devices can require financial commitments of up to $190,000, which typically involve third party financing, often with personal guarantees. These products are often superseded by next generation products within 18 to 24 months, making it financially difficult for aesthetic service providers to continually access the market newest technologies, and for providers in non traditional markets to justify the significant investment. Our subscription based model is designed to provide a lower initial barrier to ownership and includes an up front fee, and a monthly payment schedule, typically over a period of 36 months, with approximately 40% of total contract payments collected in the first year. Our subscription based business model can provide customers with greater flexibility than traditional equipment leases secured through finance companies. The significantly reduced upfront financial commitments, without 1rous credit and disclosure requirements, make this business model increasingly appealing and affordable to non traditional physicians and medical aesthetic spas. If economic circumstances are appropriate, we provide customers in good standing with the opportunity to upgrade to new agreements for our newest available or alternative technology throughout the subscription period. To ensure that each monthly product payment is made on time and that the customers systems are serviced in accordance with the terms of the warranty, every product purchased under a subscription agreement requires a monthly activation code, which we provide to the customer upon receipt of the monthly payment. We currently do not offer the ARTAS iX System under the subscription based model. To support the growth initiatives of our customers, we developed practice enhancement services that provides our customers with a fully integrated monthly marketing support program with business and marketing tools to grow their practices, improve their financial and business performance, and maximize their return on investment, while also supporting our sale of products and ancillary services. These interactions help in further building our customer relationships. As of December 31, 2019, we operated directly in 29 international markets through our 24 direct offices in the U.S., Canada, United Kingdom, Japan, South Korea, Mexico, Argentina, Colombia, Spain, France, Germany, Australia, China, Hong Kong, Singapore, Ind1sia, Vietnam, India, Israel, Italy, Bulgaria, Russia, Kazakhstan and South Africa. Subscription based Business Model We generate recurring monthly revenue under our subscription based business model and from traditional system sales. We commenced a subscription based model in North America in 2011 and, for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, approximately 51% and 55%, respectively, of aesthetic systems we delivered were sold under the subscription based model. For the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, approximately 67% and 75%, respectively, of our total system revenues were derived from the subscription based model. We have launched our subscription based model in targeted international markets in which we operate directly. We currently do not offer the ARTAS iX System under the subscription based model. Our subscription based model includes an up front fee and a monthly payment schedule, typically over a period of 36 months, with approximately 40% of total contract payments collected in the first year. For accounting purposes, these arrangements are considered to be sales type finance leases, where the present value of all cash flows to be received under the subscription agreement is recognized as revenue upon shipment to the customer and achievement of the required revenue recognition criteria. Market Overview Aesthetic Procedures The market for aesthetic procedures is large, growing, global in scale, and comprised of both surgical and non surgical procedures. The International Society of Aesthetic Plastic Surgery, or ISAPS, reported approximately 23 million cosmetic procedures worldwide in 2018. Total cosmetic procedures worldwide in 2018 was comprised of approximately 10.6 million surgical cosmetic procedures and approximately 127 million non surgical cosmetic procedures. Total non surgical procedures worldwide in 2018 included approximately 10.0 million injectable procedures primarily botulinum toxin and hyaluronic acid fillers with the remaining 27 million non surgical, non injectable procedures worldwide in 2018 representing annual addressable procedure opportunity for our minimally invasive and non invasive medical aesthetic technologies. 5 Based on data from Medical Insights reports published in 2019, we estimate the global energy based aesthetic device market totaled approximately $34 billion in 2018. We also estimate this market will increase at a 9.7% CAGR to more than $5.3 billion by the end of 2023 This projected growth CAGR is based on a weighted average of expected growth CAGRs per Medical Insights of 6.1% for Energy Based Aesthetic Devices , 127% for Energy Based Body Shaping & Skin Tightening and 15.0% for Energy Based Feminine Rejuvenation , respectively. Hair Restoration According to the 2017 Practice Census Results Report from the International Society of Hair Restoration or ISHRS, an estimated 597,181 patients worldwide had a surgical hair restoration procedure in 2016, compared to an estimated 216,547 patients in 2006, representing a 10.6% CAGR over the period. The ISHRS estimated the global market for surgical hair restoration treatments totaled $4.1 billion in 2016, compared to $24 billion in 2014, representing a 32% CAGR over the period. We believe several factors are contributing to the growth in the aesthetic and hair restoration markets, including Continuing focus on body image and appearance . Both women and men continue to be concerned with their body image and appearance. Additionally, the population and wealth of the aging baby boomer demographic segment and its desire to retain a youthful appearance have driven the growth in aesthetic and hair restoration procedures. Wide acceptance of aesthetic procedures. According to ASAPS, in 2018, people in the U.S. spent more than $16.5 billion on combined surgical and non surgical aesthetic procedures. Since 2000, aesthetic procedures have increased 163% with minimally invasive procedures growing 223%. From 2000 to 2018, the number of male aesthetic procedures and minimally invasive procedures grew 29% and 72%, respectively. Broader availability of minimally and non invasive procedures. Technological developments have resulted in the introduction of a broader range of safe, effective, easy to use, and low cost minimally invasive and non invasive aesthetic procedures, with fewer side effects. This has resulted in wider adoption of aesthetic procedures by practiti1rs. According to the ASAPS, nonsurgical procedures were performed more often in 2018 than surgical procedures. There has also been a market shift to less invasive hair restoration procedures such as FUE which, according to ISHRS, have increased from less than 10% of hair restoration procedures performed in 2004 to about 526% in 2017. Increased physician focus and changing practiti1r economics. Managed care and government payor reimbursement restrictions in the United States, and similar payment related constraints outside of the United States, are motivating practiti1rs to establish or expand their elective aesthetic practices with procedures that are paid for directly by patients. As a result, in addition to traditional aesthetic providers, non traditional providers have begun to perform these procedures. Increasingly affordable treatment solutions. New, lower cost technologies combined with procedure pricing pressures will broaden the patient population for minimally invasive and non invasive aesthetic procedures, which we believe will continue to contribute to increased market demand. Limitations of Existing Technologies Aesthetic Procedures We believe that several limitations have restricted the growth of existing aesthetic technologies and that patients who do not require significant skin tightening, cellulite reduction, circumferential reduction or body contouring will explore non invasive alternatives to minimize the pain, expense, downtime, and surgical risks associated with current invasive procedures. Most existing non invasive procedures are based on various forms of directed energy treatments, such as RF, IPL, lasers using various wavelengths, shockwave therapy or ultrasound. 6 Most current aesthetic technologies present the following limitations Surgical risks . Invasive and minimally invasive procedures can carry surgical risks associated with the safety of the patient and generally require administering general or local anesthesia, which can carry additional risks. Surgical recovery. Invasive and minimally invasive procedures can often cause pain and require post surgical recovery. As a result, patients may need to spend time away from work and take prescribed pain medications during post surgery recovery. Pain and discomfort . Many existing non invasive procedures involving various laser wavelengths, RF, IPL and shockwave can cause pain during the procedure, which we believe may affect the operator ability to deliver a full therapeutic treatment without creating patient discomfort. Potentially undesired results . Current invasive procedures can cause non uniform fat reduction, dimpling, lumpiness, numbness, scarring, discoloration or sagging skin in the treated area. Minimally invasive and non invasive procedures can cause skin or tissue damage if the physician does not carefully control the heat or ultrasound energy delivered in the treatment area. Limited repeatability. Invasive, minimally invasive and non invasive procedures may trigger non controlled necrosis and or body wound healing response, which may lead to the formation of scar tissue in the treated area and may prevent the patient from undergoing follow up procedures to enhance or correct the original treatment results if the patient is not satisfied with initial aesthetic results. Physician skill and technique dependent . The aesthetic results achieved through most invasive and minimally invasive procedures are dependent upon a physician skill and training. In addition, these procedures often require a significant amount of direct physician or highly trained personnel time to perform the procedure. Poor technique may lead to reduced efficacy, inconsistent aesthetic results and adverse events. High cost . Invasive procedures can be significantly more expensive for patients than minimally invasive or non invasive aesthetic procedures. Effective only for certain skin types. Laser based and IPL based technologies may not be as effective on darker skin t1s and therefore the appropriate pool of patients may be more limited. Our Aesthetic Solutions Aesthetic Technology Solution We designed a suite of medical aesthetic systems that use our proprietary (MP) 2 technology to address the limitations of existing medical aesthetic technologies and procedures. Our systems have the following characteristics Non invasive. Our systems use technologies that are primarily non invasive. Our core (MP) 2 technology combines multipolar RF and magnetic pulse synthesizers to homogenously raise temperature over the entire treatment area and multiple skin layers. Controlled, targeted, uniform heat distribution and the ability to maintain clinically accepted therapeutic temperature for the entire treatment results in no heat spikes (thermal surges) and eliminates the need for topical cooling agents. Easy to use and delegable technology. We believe that the use of our aesthetic systems is not technique dependent and requires limited training and skills to obtain successful aesthetic results. This allows physicians to leverage their own time and increase throughput since procedures can be performed by non physician operators, subject to local regulations. We design our systems to be easy to operate with this benefit in mind. 7 Results for broad range of skin types. Our (MP) 2 technology uses proprietary algorithms that harness the benefits of both RF and PEMF therapy. This resulting energy matrix penetrates multiple layers of skin, raising temperature homogenously and effectively. We believe this type of skin penetration improves treated conditions and provides visible results for a broad range of skin types. Technology enables products to be designed for affordability. Our technology enables us to focus on designing and manufacturing products at an affordable cost. We offer products to physicians and other customers at competitive prices without sacrificing quality, while maintaining our margin objectives. Our competitive prices and subscription model also allow physicians and other customers the option to offer patients more affordable prices. Competitive Advantages for the Aesthetic Market Expands potential market. Our subscription based model enables us to sell to both traditional and non traditional customers without the involvement of third party lenders, which allows us to reach many customers who choose not to purchase competitors aesthetic products because of the barriers associated with equipment financing. Mitigates credit risk . Our payment and 30 day activation code technology help to mitigate the risk that our customers will default on their payments by not allowing them to continue to use the system until we receive the monthly payment. Maintains strong customer relationships. Our payment model requires us to maintain awareness of customer views and expectations, which allows us to provide high quality services and maintain an on going relationship with customers on a month to month basis. Our high touch customer philosophy leads to continuous interactions with our customers and enables us to cultivate strong and long term relationships. Controls secondary market resales . Our monthly activation controls also reduce the risk that our products will be resold in the secondary market without authorization. This allows us to control the various distribution channels for our products and maintain an optimal value of our products after purchase. Opportunities for access to the newest available Venus Concept technology and revenue enhancement. Our customers have the opportunity throughout the subscription period to enter into new agreements for our newest available or alternative technology. A subscription agreement also allows customers to participate in the most current marketing and branding activities we offer. Our monthly call schedules with the customer and practice enhancement services lead to continuing client interaction and the ability to execute on mutually agreed upon marketing goals and strategies. Competitive Advantages For Our Customers in the Aesthetic Market Less 1rous credit and disclosure requirements for physicians and clinics. Our subscription model allows physicians and clinics to purchase our products without the involvement of third party lenders or leasing companies that require borrowers to undergo burdensome application, review and fee requirements. Return on investment. By spreading payments over a 36 month period, our subscription model option is designed to facilitate physicians achieving positive cash flow from their investment in our systems, thus reducing a portion of implementation risk and concerns associated with large capital equipment purchases. Expansion of services. Our aesthetic systems allow physicians to expand services offered within their practices. A majority of our systems can be used to treat more than 1 clinical indication, and some products can be purchased as a modular platform that can be modified to match the needs of a growing aesthetic business. To the extent we are successful in receiving FDA and other clearances for additional clinical indications, the value of our modular platform technologies to physician practices may be further enhanced. 8 Leverage physician time and clinic infrastructure. Subject to the laws of each state in the United States and in other jurisdictions, our physician customers may delegate these non invasive procedures to nurse practiti1rs, technicians and other non physicians as long as the systems are operated under the physicians supervision. We believe that this creates leverage to save physician time and requires the use of less practice infrastructure. Opportunity to upgrade. Our customers in good standing have the opportunity under the subscription model to upgrade into new agreements for our newest available or alternative technology, which allows these customers to employ our latest technologies in their practices. Practice enhancement services. Our practice enhancement services offer marketing, clinical and technical support to subscription customers. These services focus on improving practice or clinic revenue performance, as well as the customers overall financial and business metrics. In addition, customers can take advantage of a diverse menu of digital marketing services that we offer, which include website solutions and management, social media strategy and design, and other educational programs that we believe are effective and helpful in supporting the growth of their practices. Our Hair Restoration Solutions Hair Loss Treatment Options and Their Limitations The treatments for hair loss can broadly be divided between non surgical options and surgical procedures. Non Surgical Options Non surgical options for hair loss include prescription therapeutics and non prescription remedies. In the U.S., FDA has authorized 2 prescription therapeutics for hair loss Rogaine which is applied topically, and Propecia which is ingested in pill form. Both Rogaine and Propecia have several drawbacks, including limited efficacy in some individuals and the need for strict patient compliance for the treatment to have meaningful effect. Surgical Procedures Surgical procedures to address hair loss continue to evolve and become more popular. The first of these therapies, hair plugs, was developed in the late 1950s. Due to the size of the transplanted hair follicle groups, or plugs, the transplants resulted in an unnatural look with the patient often having a doll hair like appearance, the clumping or grouping of hair follicles in a visibly uniform pattern. Because of the poor aesthetic results of hair plugs, strip surgery, or FUT, follicular unit transplantation and follicular unit extraction, or FUE became increasingly more popular. FUE is significantly less invasive than strip surgery. In this procedure, the physician or technician removes individual hair follicles from the patient scalp without removing a strip of tissue. FUE can be performed with manual hand held punches, automated hand held devices (e.g. NeoGraft ) or with the ARTAS System. Strip Surgery In an FUT procedure, or strip surgery, the physician uses a sharp scalpel to surgically remove a large strip of the patient scalp, approximately eight inches in length, and 1 half inch in width and depth, from the donor area. The subsequent wound is sutured or stapled closed. Following the surgical removal of the strip of the scalp from the patient head, the follicular unit grafts, the natural groupings of hair follicles in the scalp, are removed from the strip of scalp by technicians using microscopes and scalpel blades. Following the removal of the individual hair follicles, technicians implant the individual hair follicles into hundreds to thousands of incisions in the patient scalp prepared by the physician. Strip surgery results in a linear scar which may enlarge over time creating a poor aesthetic outcome in the donor area. As a result, strip surgery patients are generally unable to wear their hair short without revealing the scar. 9 Follicular Unit Extraction Using Hand Held Devices In part as a solution to the significant scarring and other drawbacks of strip surgery, FUE procedure was developed in the early 2000s. In an FUE procedure, rather than surgically removing a portion of the patient scalp, each hair graft is individually dissected from the scalp for transplantation. Because a strip of the patient scalp is not removed, a FUE procedure avoids a long linear scar and reduces the post operative pain and numbness associated with strip surgery. Following the dissection of the individual hair follicles, the physician uses a hand held device to remove the hair follicles. After harvesting, the individual hair follicles are implanted in the same way as in a strip surgery procedure. Drawbacks of Strip Surgery and FUE Surgery Using Hand Held Devices While strip surgery and FUE surgery using a hand held device, or manual FUE, can provide significant, long term results in restoring hair, there are several limitations associated with these procedures. Technician training. Strip surgery and manual FUE procedures require dexterity, demanding hand eye coordination, and attention to detail by all members of the transplant team. For strip surgeries in particular, a physician or technician must undergo significant training to dissect grafts under a microscope and it can take a significant period of time for a technician to become proficient. Labor intensive . Both strip surgery and manual FUE procedures require a team of technicians to perform the procedure. The labor intensiveness and time consuming nature of these techniques limits the number of procedures physicians can perform. Long learning curve. Both strip surgery and manual FUE procedures require a major investment of time on the part of physicians and technicians to learn the technique. A physician must commit a substantial amount of time to learn the manual FUE harvesting technique and they often report that the technique is technically and ergonomically challenging. For strip surgeries, there is a significant time investment made to train each technician to dissect grafts under a microscope, handle the delicate grafts with instrumentation and to place the grafts into the site incisions during implantation. Surgical planning and recipient site making. In making the recipient sites into which hair follicles are transplanted, the ability of the physician and the technician to visualize and avoid injuring existing hair is limited to what they can achieve with magnified lenses. As a result, this limited visualization may compromise the aesthetic outcome. Lack of high quality visualization tools for the patient. Generally, hair restoration physicians utilize before and after pictures of previous patients and grease pens to delineate the transplant area. These are typically the only available tools to assist the patient in understanding the aesthetic effect of the procedure and do not provide information to visualize the expected outcome illustrated on the actual patient. Inconsistency in performance. Both strip surgery and manual FUE procedures require either physicians or technicians to perform the repetitive and tedious tasks of dissecting grafts over a long period of time. In a strip surgery, the technicians are required to dissect the individual follicles from the harvested strip of the patient scalp, whereas in a manual FUE procedure the physician and technicians are required to harvest each individual follicle directly from the patient scalp. As a result of this lengthy and tedious process, the physician or technician may begin to fatigue and his or her ability to maintain the concentration necessary to consistently extract high quality grafts without causing follicle damage may diminish. 10 The ARTAS Solution We believe the ARTAS System addresses many of the shortcomings of other hair restoration procedures. The ARTAS System is capable of robotically assisting a physician through many of the most challenging steps of the hair restoration process, including the dissection of hair follicles, site planning and recipient site making. We believe, with this assistance, the ARTAS System can help shorten the often long learning curve for both physicians and technicians to become proficient in performing hair restoration procedures. In addition, we believe that by assisting the physician and technicians with many of the repetitive and tedious tasks associated with the hair restoration procedure, the ARTAS System can make hair restoration procedures less labor intensive and can reduce inconsistent results. Further, we believe the ARTAS System Site Making functionality, which includes an enhanced imaging system and sophisticated algorithms, helps physicians avoid damaging existing follicles and enables them to create a more natural, aesthetically pleasing outcome for the patient. In March 2018, we received 510(k) clearance from FDA to expand the ARTAS technology to include implantation of harvested hair follicles. In December 2018, we completed the ISO audit and are compliant with CE Mark requirements for the sale of the ARTAS iX System with implantation functionality in Europe. Our platform includes the ARTAS Hair Studio application which can simulate pre procedure and post procedure outcomes and can be utilized during the patient consultation and education process. The ARTAS procedure provides patients with a minimally invasive, less painful alternative to strip surgery. The ARTAS System has a faster recovery time and avoids the long linear scar at the back of the patient head. The ARTAS Hair Studio application allows patients to visualize the expected post procedure outcome through a 3 dimensional model. In addition to the advantages afforded to patients, we believe the ARTAS System and the ARTAS Hair Studio application provide compelling benefits for physicians. The ARTAS System image guided robotic capabilities allow physicians to perform procedures with fewer staff than what might be required for a traditional strip surgery or a FUE procedure using hand held devices. With the robotic assistance provided by the ARTAS System, we believe physicians and technicians will be able to perform the complicated, repetitive and tedious task of dissecting hair grafts with less fatigue and greater productivity than would be possible in a manual FUE procedure. We strategically market the ARTAS System to hair restoration surgeons, dermatologists, plastic surgeons and aesthetic physicians. We believe we can reach our target physician customers effectively through focused marketing efforts. These efforts include participation in trade shows, scientific meetings, educational symposiums, webinars, online advertising and other activities. For physicians who purchase the ARTAS System, we provide comprehensive clinical training, practice based marketing support, as well as patient leads. For example, we believe we help our physician customers increase the number of procedures performed by assigning a practice success manager, or PSM, to aid in building the physician customer hair restoration practice. Support from a PSM includes the deployment of patient marketing materials, assisting with social media and digital marketing strategies, and other marketing and sales support. Advantages of the ARTAS Procedure Patient Value . We believe the ARTAS System significantly improves the patient experience and outcome in hair transplantation procedures in the following ways Through the ARTAS System, the dissection of grafts is performed in a manner that leaves only small pinpoint scars that heal faster and are less detectable than the larger post operative linear scar that would be produced from strip surgery. As a result, an ARTAS procedure can, in many cases, offer a shorter recovery time and can enable patients to resume their daily lifestyle faster than with strip surgery. In addition, the ARTAS procedure allows patients to wear their hair short without a noticeable scar. 11 The ARTAS Site Making functionality translates the physician patient site design onto the patient recipient area. The ARTAS System enhanced imaging system and sophisticated algorithms enable the ARTAS System to rapidly create recipient sites at precise depths, replicate pre existing hair angles, avoid damaging the healthy pre existing hair and adjust the distribution of the recipient sites to optimally fill in the transplantation area. We believe these elements can contribute to a superior aesthetic outcome . Physician Value. We believe the ARTAS System provides physicians compelling economic benefits and enables physicians to achieve consistent reproducible results. As a result, we believe the ARTAS procedure also offers an attractive addition to existing dermatology, plastic surgery or aesthetics practices whether they do or do not provide hair restoration procedures. Hair restoration procedures are generally paid for by the patient and do not involve the complexity of securing reimbursement from third party payors. We believe the ARTAS System image guided robotic capabilities allow physicians to perform hair restoration procedures with fewer staff required than a traditional strip surgery or a manual FUE procedure. Procedures can also be performed with less physician and technician fatigue. Because we provide high quality training for physicians and their clinical teams on the use of the ARTAS System and because the robotic system and its intelligent algorithms assist these teams in performing hair restoration procedures, we believe we can significantly shorten the learning curve necessary for hair transplantation procedures using the ARTAS System. This shorter learning curve can reduce barriers to entry for a new hair restoration practice. It can also ease the adoption of a new technology into existing practices. Clinically Established Results. Four peer reviewed clinical publications have demonstrated the quality and consistency of grafts produced by the ARTAS System. 1 published study indicated average damage rates for the hair follicles, or transection rates, with the ARTAS System were as low as 6.6%, with a second study documenting average transection rates as low as 4.9% in a Korean population of patients. The third study documented that the ARTAS System can be programmed by the physician to select follicular units with larger groupings of hairs while skipping single hair grafts, which allows physicians to choose particular follicular units depending on the hair density they are trying to achieve, providing a clinical benefit as measured by the increase in hairs per harvest of 17% and as measured by the increase in hairs per graft of 114%. Results were statistically significant with a p value less than 0.01 This study also demonstrates the ability of robotic follicular unit graft selection to increase the amount of hairs a physician can extract for each incision made in the donor area. The fourth study demonstrated that FUE cases larger than 2,500 grafts, or mega sessions, are possible using the ARTAS System. These peer reviewed publications demonstrate the reproducibility and consistency of dissection results from the ARTAS System in a diverse group of patients, even as the system is used by different clinicians. To our knowledge, there are no other peer reviewed clinical publications that demonstrate the reproducibility of results utilizing other products in FUE or strip surgery procedures. We intend to encourage scientific research in the study of hair restoration to improve our technology, solutions, enhance understanding of our industry and educate physicians on the capabilities of the ARTAS System. Advantages of the NeoGraft Procedure We believe that NeoGraft offers a technology solution that complements our robotic hair restoration system and provides an alternative to strip surgery and fully manual FUE procedures for our customers and their patients. 12 Patient Value Unlike most strip surgery procedures, the NeoGraft system is minimally invasive. In an FUE procedure using NeoGraft , rather than surgically removing a portion of the patient scalp, each hair graft is individually dissected from the scalp for transplantation. Because a strip of the patient scalp is not removed, a FUE procedure avoids a long linear scar and reduces the post operative pain and healing process, reducing the risk of potential infection and headaches. The ARTAS iX is currently FDA cleared for men diagnosed with androgenetic alopecia (male pattern hair loss) with black or brown straight hair. The NeoGraft provides a solution for women, curly haired people and light haired people. Also, in a NeoGraft procedure, the recipient site does not need to be shaved, which makes the procedure more attractive to female patients. NeoGraft can be used for fine tuning of specific areas of the scalp and temples temporal peaks. Physician Value The highly ergonomic mechanical NeoGraft system works as a natural extension of the surgeons hand, allowing for faster and more accurate harvesting of hair follicles. NeoGraft patients may reach their goal with less time in the procedure room or fewer FUE procedures. Doctors performing procedures with our NeoGraft system can choose to use our VeroGrafter TM technician services to free up their time to focus on other areas of their practice. Our NeoGraft system is priced at a much lower price point than an ARTAS robotic system making it a feasible alternative for physicians who do not perform a large volume of hair restoration surgeries. Our Strategy Our goal is to become a leading global provider of minimally invasive and non invasive medical aesthetic technologies and complimentary products, hair restoration technologies and marketing and other support services for aesthetic practiti1rs and aesthetic medical spas. To achieve this goal, we intend to Broaden our portfolio of product offering . We will continue to invest in and leverage the extensive energy based technology developed by our experienced research and development team in Israel, and we believe that collaboration with the experienced robotic research and development team in San Jose will bring new and innovative technology solutions to the non invasive and minimally invasive categories of aesthetic medicine. Apply robotic technologies to new applications. We are working on robotic assisted minimally invasive solutions for aesthetic procedures that currently can only be treated by surgical intervention. Hair restoration market. We intend to focus on providing a complete set of products and services to address the hair restoration market. In 2018, we acquired NeoGraft and in November 2019, we completed our business combination with Restoration Robotics, which significantly expanded our hair restoration product offerings to include the ARTAS iX System, a robotic device that assists physicians in a FUE hair restoration procedure. We believe these 2 systems are complementary and give us a hair restoration product offering that can serve a broad segment of the market. Expand Venus Concept complementary service offerings . In addition to our systems, we offer marketing services through an internal advertising agency, and a revenue share program that complements our systems to help enhance the overall profitability and success of our customers. We believe that these services will increase brand recognition, increase customer loyalty and expand the addressable market for our products and services. 13 Expand FDA (and other regulatory agencies) cleared indications for our products . We intend to seek additional regulatory clearances from FDA, the China Food and Drug Administration, Health Canada and other national regulatory bodies and to extend the scope of our existing FDA clearance and CE Mark certifications. Additionally, we intend to expand the scope of marketable indications for our technologies in various other markets. Leverage our subscription based model to new market channels . Our subscription based model offers our customers an alternative to using third party lenders and reduces their capital expenditure obligations. We believe that with increased restrictions on government reimbursement for medical procedures, there is a large, predominantly untapped market of physicians and physician owned clinics that are seeking new pay out of pocket revenue streams. Limited availability of cost effective capital financing to many non traditional customers makes it more difficult for these types of providers to build new revenue streams. Our technology and subscription based model are designed to specifically target, support and address these issues, enabling us to expand into new markets. Expand into non traditional markets. We intend to market our systems to current and potential providers of aesthetic services in the large and under penetrated non traditional aesthetic market. The ease of use of most of our technologies makes our systems suitable for adoption by physicians and other providers in non traditional markets, including general and family practiti1rs and aesthetic medical spas. Increase our international presence. We built a direct sales force through wholly owned subsidiaries in the U.S., Canada, United Kingdom, Japan, South Korea, Mexico, Argentina, Colombia, Spain, France, Germany, Israel and Australia, and majority owned subsidiaries in China, Hong Kong, Singapore, Ind1sia, Vietnam, India, Italy, Bulgaria, Russia, Kazakhstan and South Africa. We believe we are positi1d to continue to grow the percentage of our revenue from customers located outside North America. Increase consumer awareness and demand for our products. We intend to continue to employ targeted and strategic media to engage consumers through social and digital media marketing programs in order to generate awareness of and demand for our technologies, with an emphasis on targeting the non traditional physician market. Our Technologies We use a variety of technologies that allow us to expand into non traditional physician markets. 1 differentiating technology is our proprietary multipolar magnetic pulsed technology, or (MP) 2 , which synergizes PEMF and a multipolar RF matrix. Our (MP) 2 technology is applicable to a wide range of non invasive skin tightening, wrinkle reduction, body contouring and fat reduction, which have been cleared in U.S., Canada, or Europe, and we plan to enter the rapidly growing non invasive feminine health market in various geographic regions once we receive the necessary regulatory clearances. We also currently have solutions based on other technologies such as fractional ablative RF, IPL and laser technologies, affording a broader set of solution options to address key markets for hair removal, and vascular pigmented lesions, circumference reduction and fat reduction (lipolysis). As part of our strategy, our Heal, Freeze Plus and Fiore systems come with integrated Automatic Temperature Control, or ATC, and our Velocity, Heal, Fiore, Freeze Plus and NeoGraft systems come with integrated internet of things, or IOT, capabilities. 14 Background on Energy Based Aesthetic Technologies RF, a technique that has been employed for several decades for medical purposes, uses an oscillating current of electricity to generate energy in the form of heat. This heat can be used to stimulate, coagulate and or ablate targeted tissue within the body. RF energy is most commonly used in aesthetic dermatology as a noninvasive method of skin tightening, wrinkle removal, and facial rejuvenation. These effects are produced within the heated area through several mechanisms, including ablation and coagulation of connective tissue, stimulation of tissue inflammation and wound healing processes, and improved blood circulation. RF devices that use fractional ablative coagulative technology have been shown to improve the appearance of fine lines and wrinkles in the dermis, while maintaining low risk of adverse side effects in patients of most skin types. This fractional technology uses needle shaped elements as electrodes to deliver the RF energy to the targeted tissue and has been used for treating a variety of dermatological conditions such as improving facial brightness and improving the appearance of skin tightness and skin pigmentation. RF has been recognized as a variable solution by various researchers and companies for aesthetic use due to its safety profile on many skin types, limited downtime and results for tissue tightening. The effect of RF on the dermal extracellular matrix causing this immediate visible tightening of the tissue (through shrinkage of the collagen fibers) with stimulation of dermal fibroblasts inducing the synthesis of new collagen (called neocollagenisis) and elastin fibers (called neoelastogenesis) has been well documented in published clinical research that is widely available through various peer reviewed journals and universities. PEMF has been used in a variety of different medical settings including b1 fusion for many years. Clinically, PEMF has also demonstrated benefits for soft tissue repair (in cases of various sports related injuries), while exhibiting few side effects. It has been suggested that tissue exposed to PEMF has a modulated production of growth factors leading to elevated production of collagen and other proteins, and improved skin vitality and appearance. PEMF triggers a cascade of biological processes at a cellular level that facilitates the creation of new blood vessels (called angiogenesis). IPL relies on selective photothermolysis to damage pigmented targets within cells or tissues, causing demarcated thermal injury to the target while sparing surrounding tissue. Light pulses are generated by bursts of electrical current passing through a xenon gas filled lamp. Individual light pulses have a specific duration, intensity, and fluence, and spectral distribution that allows for a controlled and confined energy delivery into tissue. The effective use of IPL relies on the phenomena that certain targets (chromophores) are capable of absorbing energy from this broad spectrum of light wavelength (absorptive band) without exclusively being targeted by their highest absorption peak. The 3 main chromophores (hemoglobin, water, and melanin) in human skin all have broad absorption peaks of light energy, allowing them to be targeted by a range of light wavelengths and not requiring that any single specific wavelength of light (monochromatic light) is used. Therefore, monochromatic light is not a prerequisite for selective heating of target structures in human skin. The broad wavelength range discharged from an IPL device leads to the simultaneous emission of different wavelengths that can be further filtered to narrower bands, allowing the various chromophores to be targeted simultaneously but specifically. Our (MP) 2 Proprietary Technology Our proprietary (MP) 2 technology employs both PEMF and RF energy in a synergistic manner. (MP) 2 is noninvasive and because (MP) 2 disperses heat equally across the treatment area, it does not produce potentially painful localized heat spikes, and unlike other devices employing RF, (MP) 2 does not require local cooling during treatment. PEMFs energy is created by running short pulses of electrical current through metal coils, which results in the formation of electromagnetic fields. Electromagnetic fields, in turn, influence the behavior of charged particles, including various biomolecules, within the range of the electromagnetic field to cause 1 or more desired effects at the cellular level. PEMF therapy is used for the treatment of wounds, for aesthetic applications, and in the management of postsurgical pain and edema. RF energy, on the other hand, delivers energy that manifests itself as heat within various layers of the skin. The heat generated in the tissue by application of RF energy directly affects fibroblasts, extra cellular matrix, or ECM, materials and fat cells, thereby triggering natural wound healing processes of the skin and resulting in synthesis of new collagen and elastin fibers. In addition, under predetermined conditions, the heat causes contraction of collagen fibers and lipolysis. In our (MP) 2 technology, we employ a multipolar matrix of RF circuits to produce heat. Our multipolar RF matrix distributes the RF currents evenly across the treatment area in a proprietary pattern, which results in the quick and uniform heating of the skin layers without overheating any particular area of the skin. 15 Elements of (MP) 2 Technology Benefits of (MP) Technology Our proprietary (MP) 2 technology enables medical and aesthetic practiti1rs to offer a wide range of non invasive skin tightening and body contouring solutions. The main benefits of using (MP) 2 technology in non invasive aesthetic treatments are the following FDA cleared for various indications. Comfortable treatments. Technology that delivers RF energy uniformly. The volumetric homogeneous distribution of heat reduces localized temperature spikes and eliminates the requirement to use a cooling aid. Ergonomic handpieces designed to increase comfort and reduce operator fatigue. A user friendly interface designed to facilitate intuitive operation, and in most cases does not require an extensive training process. Our Additional Key Technologies In addition to our core (MP) technology, we have technologies that use fractional ablative RF, IPL and laser technologies that allow us to address key markets for skin resurfacing, wrinkle reduction, body contouring, noninvasive fat and circumference reduction, hair removal, acne treatment and treatment of vascular and pigmented lesions. In offering these solutions in the markets where we have marketing clearances or approvals, our goal is to provide improved technologies that are safe and effective for their intended uses and economically viable for our customers. Fractional ablative RF Fractional ablative techniques improve the appearance of skin surfaces by injuring the skin in a fractional manner to trigger a healing response in the treated area. This both tightens the skin and elicits collagen formation, thus rejuvenating the skin surface. Because our fractional ablative RF technology does not use lasers or other light technologies, which are skin color dependent, fractional ablative RF can be used on patients of all skin t1s. Fractional ablative RF technology has been incorporated into our Venus Viva applicator, supported by our Venus Viva and Venus Versa systems. Our current Viva applicator delivers the RF energy via 160 pins, which permit ablation and resurfacing of the skin. Intense Pulsed Light Our IPL devices employ non laser high intensity light sources as part of a high output flash lamp to produce a broad wavelength of non coherent light, usually in the 400 to 1200 nm range, that may be further filtered to narrower bands per specific absorption coefficients of predetermined targets and may be applied to remove unwanted hair as well as vascular and pigmented dermal lesions. 16 We have incorporated IPL technology into our Venus Versa system to expand that treatment offering and to build a modular, upgradable platform that affords a comprehensive solution for common aesthetic treatments. Specifically, the IPL capability permits users of the Venus Versa systems to offer their patients the service options of removing unwanted hair, treating acne vulgaris, and treating vascular and pigmented dermal lesions. Venus Versa uses a square pulse technology in which continuous pulses of the combination of certain wavelengths create a signal that alternates between a constant fixed intensity for a period of time and then changes to a state of no energy for an amount of time. This allows treatment of an area of the patient without having the tissue exposed to the undesirable lower wavelengths that would be present in a signal with a sinusoidal or other varying pattern of energy. A cooling mechanism is also used, cumulatively allowing for an effective impact using less energy per area in a given time period. This enables efficient treatment while significantly reducing and sparing the patient from the undesired side effects that are sometimes associated with IPL treatments. Diode Lasers Diode laser technology is a recognized technology for hair removal. The Venus Velocity system achieves hair removal, permanent hair reduction and inflammation from ingrown hair using the diode laser. The Venus Velocity employs the laser energy to skin via a chilled sapphire light guide that conductively cools the skin simultaneously with the delivery of laser energy, thereby maintaining low temperature in the epidermis to enhance the comfort of the procedure and avoid potential epidermal damage. The Venus Velocity allows us to expand our offering in the hair reduction market, which is 1 of the most popular non invasive energy based aesthetic procedures in the United States. Our laser technology is also incorporated into another non invasive diode laser device, the Venus Bliss, for which we received 510(k) clearance in June 2019. The diode laser system is intended for non invasive lipolysis of the abdomen and flanks in individuals with a Body Mass Index of 30 or less. Our Products Our product portfolio includes ten energy based systems that provide solutions for various non invasive aesthetic applications using Venus Concept (MP) technology, as well as the VariPulse, and or fractional ablative RF, IPL, or laser technologies. We have acquired 2 systems for hair restoration, NeoGraft in 2018 and ARTAS iX at the end of 2019. We also offer practice enhancement services. Product Name Technology Regulatory Clearance Venus Legacy (MP) , VariPulse FDA The Venus Legacy BX is a noninvasive device intended for use in dermatological and general surgical procedures for females for the noninvasive treatment of moderate to severe facial wrinkles and rhytides in Fitzpatrick Skin Types I IV. The Venus Legacy CX using the LB2 and LF2 applicators is intended for the treatment of the following medical conditions for delivery of non thermal RF combined with massage and magnetic field pulses relief of minor muscle aches and pain; relief of muscle spasm; temporary improvement of local blood circulation; and temporary reduction in the appearance of cellulite. Canada Temporary increase of skin tightening, temporary circumferential reduction, temporary cellulite reduction, temporary wrinkle reduction, temporary cellulite reduction. EU (CE Mark) Increase of skin tightening, temporary circumferential reduction, cellulite reduction, wrinkle reduction. 17 Product Name Technology Regulatory Clearance Venus Versa (MP) , IPL FDA The Venus Versa system is a multi application device intended to be used in aesthetic and cosmetic procedures. The SR515 and SR580 IPL applicators are indicated for the following Treatment of benign pigmented epidermal and cutaneous lesions including, hyperpigmentation, melasma, ephelides (freckles), lentigines, nevi, and cafe au lait macules; Treatment of benign cutaneous vascular lesions including port wine stains, hemangiomas, facial, truncal and leg telangiectasias, rosacea, angiomas and spider angiomas, poikiloderma of civatte, leg veins and venous malformations. The HR650, HR690, HR650XL and HR690XL IPL applicators are indicated for the removal of unwanted hair and to effect stable long term or permanent hair reduction for Skin Types I IV. Permanent hair reduction is defined as the long term stable reduction in the number of hairs re growing when measured at 6, 9, and 12 months after the completion of a treatment regimen. The ACDUAL applicator is intended to be used for the treatment of acne vulgaris. The Viva applicator is intended for dermatological procedures requiring ablation and resurfacing of the skin. The Diamondpolar and Octipolar applicators are noninvasive devices intended for use in dermatologic and general surgery procedures for females for the noninvasive treatment of moderate to severe facial wrinkles and rhytides in Fitzpatrick skin types I IV. Canada The SR515 and SR580 IPL applicators are indicated for the following Treatment of benign pigmented epidermal and cutaneous lesions including hyperpigmentation; melasma; ephelides (freckles); lentigines; nevi; and cafe au lait macules; and Treatment of benign cutaneous vascular lesions including port wine stains; hemangiomas; facial, truncal and leg telangiectasias; rosacea; angiomas and spider angiomas; poikiloderma of civatte; leg veins and venous malformations. The HR650, HR690, HR650XL and HR690XL IPL applicators are indicated for the removal of unwanted hair and to effect stable long term or permanent hair reduction for Skin Types I IV. The ACDUAL applicator is intended to be used for the treatment of acne vulgaris. The Viva applicator is intended for dermatological procedures requiring ablation and resurfacing of the skin. The Diamondpolar applicator is a noninvasive device intended for use in dermatologic and general surgery procedures for females for the noninvasive treatment of moderate to severe facial wrinkles and rhytides in Fitzpatrick skin types I IV. The Venus Versa system, using the Octipolar applicator, is designed for use in temporary body contouring via skin tightening, circumferential reduction, and cellulite reduction. 18 Product Name Technology Regulatory Clearance EU The Venus Versa system, using the Diamondpolar applicator, is designed for use in dermatological procedures requiring treatment of moderate to severe facial wrinkles and rhytides in Fitzpatrick skin types I IV. The Venus Versa system, using the Octipolar applicator, is designed for use in body contouring via skin tightening, circumferential reduction, and cellulite reduction. The Venus Versa system, using the Viva applicator, is designed for use in dermatological procedures requiring ablation and resurfacing of the skin. The SR515 and the SR580 IPL applicators are indicated for the treatment of benign pigmented epidermal and cutaneous lesions including melasma, ephelides (freckles) and lentigines. The SR515 and SR580 applicators are also indicated for the treatment of benign cutaneous vascular lesions including port wine stains, hemangiomas, facial, truncal and leg telangiectasias, rosacea, erythema of rosacea, angiomas and spider angiomas, and poikiloderma of civatte. The HR650, HR690, HR 650XL and HR690XL IPL applicators are indicated for the removal of unwanted hair and to effect stable long term or permanent hair reduction. The ACDUAL IPL applicator is indicated for the treatment of acne vulgaris. Venus Viva SR (MP) , Nano Fractional RF, SmartScan FDA The Venus Viva SR is intended for dermatological procedures requiring ablation and resurfacing of the skin. Canada Dermatologic and general surgical procedures requiring ablation and resurfacing of the skin, using the Firm FX applicator, and treatment of moderate to severe wrinkles and rhytides in Fitzpatrick skin types I IV, using the Diamondpolar applicator. EU Using the Diamondpolar applicator, Venus Viva is designed for use in dermatological procedures requiring treatment of moderate to severe facial wrinkles and rhytides in Fitzpatrick skin types I IV. The Venus Viva system, using the Viva applicator, is designed for use in dermatological procedures requiring ablation and resurfacing of the skin. Venus Freeze (MP) and Freeze Plus (MP) FDA The Venus Freeze (MP)2 system is a noninvasive device intended for use in dermatologic and general surgical procedures for females for the noninvasive treatment of moderate to severe facial wrinkles and rhytides in Fitzpatrick Skin Types I IV, using the Diamondpolar and Octipolar applicators. 19 Product Name Technology Regulatory Clearance Canada Temporary reduction of cellulite, temporary skin tightening, temporary reduction in the appearance of stretch marks at the abdomen and flanks using the Diamondpolar and Octipolar applicators. EU Venus Freeze Plus system, using the Diamondpolar applicator, is intended for dermatological procedures requiring treatment of moderate to severe facial wrinkles and rhytides. The Venus Freeze Plus system, using the Octipolar applicator is intended for Increase of skin tightening; Temporary circumferential reduction; Cellulite reduction; and Wrinkle reduction. Venus Velocity Diode Laser FDA The Venus Velocity is intended for all Fitzpatrick skin types, including tanned skin, for use in dermatology, general and plastic surgery applications for Hair removal; Permanent hair reduction (defined as the long term stable reduction in the number of hairs regrowing when measured at 6, 9, and 12 months after the completion of a treatment regimen); and Treatment of pseudofolliculitis barbae. Canada The Venus Velocity is intended for all Fitzpatrick skin types, including tanned skin, for use in dermatology, general and plastic surgery applications for Hair removal; Permanent hair reduction (defined as the long term stable reduction in the number of hairs re growing when measured at 6, 9, and 12 months after the completion of a treatment regimen); and Treatment of pseudofolliculitis barbae. EU The Venus Velocity is intended for treatment of hirsutism (hair removal), permanent hair reduction, and the treatment for pseudofolliculitis barbae (PFB). Permanent hair reduction is defined as the long term, stable reduction in the number of hairs re growing when measured at 6, 9, and 12 months after the completion of a treatment regime. The Venus Velocity is intended for use on all skin types (Fitzpatrick skin types I VI), including tanned skin. 20 Product Name Technology Regulatory Clearance Venus Fiore (MP) EU The Venus Fiore is intended for vaginal canal treatment and skin tightening. The applicators are intended as follows (i) VG applicator is intended for improvement of symptoms of vaginal laxity and vaginal atrophy, (ii) the MP applicator for dermatological procedures requiring increasing of skin tightening and improvement in skin laxity of the Mons Pubis (MP) area and (iii) the LA applicator is intended for dermatological procedures requiring increasing of skin tightening and improvement in skin laxity of the Labia Majora area. Israel Aesthetic and functional treatment of the vagina, labia and mons pubis. Venus Heal (MP) FDA The Venus Heal is intended for the treatment of the following medical conditions; using the Large and Small applicators for delivery of non thermal RF combined with massage and magnetic field pulses Relief of minor muscle aches and pain; Relief of muscle spasm; Temporary improvement of local blood circulation; and Temporary reduction in the appearance of cellulite. Canada Venus Heal is a non invasive treatment system intended to increase the tissue temperature and results in effects such as pain relief, myorelaxation, increase of local blood circulation and oedema. Venus Heal can be used for treatment of both acute and chronic disorders of musculoskeletal system, such as muscle spasms, back pain and soft tissue injuries. Venus Bliss Diode Laser, (MP) FDA Using the diode laser system, the Venus Bliss device is intended for non invasive lipolysis of the abdomen and flanks in individuals with a Body Mass Index (BMI) of 30 or less. Using the ( MP) applicator for delivery of RF energy combined with massage and magnetic field pulses, the Venus Bliss device is intended for the treatment of the following medical conditions Relief of minor muscle aches and pain, relief of muscle spasm Temporary improvement of local blood circulation Temporary reduction in the appearance of cellulite. Canada Application submitted for non invasive lipolysis of the abdomen and flanks in individuals with a BMI of 40 or less, using the body laser applicator and for the temporary increase of skin tightening, temporary circumferential reduction, temporary cellulite reduction and temporary wrinkle reduction using the ( MP) applicator. 21 Product Name Technology Regulatory Clearance EU Application submitted for the increase of skin tightening, temporary circumferential reduction, cellulite reduction, and wrinkle reduction using the diode laser applicators and ( MP) applicator. Venus Glow FDA (listed as a Class I device) Motorized dermabrasion device. Canada (listed as a Class I device) EU Not a medical device. NeoGraft FDA (listed as a Class I device) Surgical instrument motors and accessories that are intended for use during surgical procedures to provide power to operate various accessories or attachments to cut hard tissue or b1 and soft tissue. Canada (listed as Class I without indication) EU Hair Transplant device Epileve Canada The Epileve is intended for all Fitzpatrick skin types, including tanned skin, for use in dermatology, general and plastic surgery applications for Hair removal; Permanent hair reduction (defined as the long term stable reduction in the number of hairs re growing when measured at 6, 9, and 12 months after the completion of a treatment regimen); and Treatment of pseudofolliculitis barbae. EU The Epileve is intended for treatment of hirsutism (hair removal), permanent hair reduction, and the treatment for pseudofolliculitis barbae (PFB). Permanent hair reduction is defined as the long term, stable reduction in the number of hairs re growing when measured at 6, 9, and 12 months after the completion of a treatment regime. The Epileve is intended for use on all skin types (Fitzpatrick skin types I VI), including tanned skin. 22 Product Name Technology Regulatory Clearance ARTAS iX FDA Harvesting hair follicles from the scalp in men diagnosed with androgenic alopecia who have black or brown straight hair. The ARTAS system is intended to assist physicians in identifying and extracting hair follicles units from the scalp during hair transplantation, creating recipient sites and implanting the harvested hair follicles. Canada Harvesting hair follicles from the scalp in men diagnosed with androgenic alopecia who have black or brown straight hair. The ARTAS system is intended to assist physicians in identifying and extracting hair follicles units from the scalp during hair transplantation, creating recipient sites and implanting the harvested hair follicles. EU Computer assisted hair follicle harvesting, incision making and implantation system. The ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems and Procedure We believe the ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems have improved multiple phases of the hair transplantation procedure, which include harvesting, recipient site making and implantation. Harvesting During the harvesting phase of the hair restoration procedure, the robotic arm and integrated vision system work in tandem to identify the optimal hair follicles to be used in the procedure. The ARTAS vision system uses proprietary algorithms to identify individual hair follicles, growth angle, density, thickness, length and follicle grouping and to determine which grafts to dissect and the optimal order in which they should be dissected. The algorithms recalculate 60 times per second, accommodating patient movement, to provide the physician with accurate up to date information during the course of the procedure. We believe these assessments directly correlate to the quality of the outcome and the state of the donor area. This is important because we believe it affects how the donor area will appear following the procedure, and the potential viability for subsequent harvesting for future transplantation procedures. The ARTAS System harvesting user interface provides the physician with enhanced control during the procedure. An example of the harvesting user interface appears as follows 23 Following the vision system identification of the optimal hair follicles for transplant, the ARTAS System dissects these follicles using a sharp needle to score the epidermis and a punch, coaxial with the needle, to separate the graft from the surrounding tissue. In the final step of the harvesting phase, the grafts are removed manually with forceps by the physician or the technician. The grafts are then cleaned, inspected and prepared for implantation. During the procedure, the physician can customize the dissection incisions by choosing a needle and punch that will produce 0.8mm, 0.9mm or 10mm incisions. The image below illustrates a typical ARTAS System punch and needle 24 The needle travels at speeds such that, when it contacts the skin, it provides targeted precision and a cleanly scored incision. The punch then spins between 3,000 and 5,000 rpm and loosens the grafts from the surrounding tissue. In a clinical setting, we have observed that the dissection cycle takes between 1 to 2 seconds per graft, depending on the length of the graft. In a clinical setting, the ARTAS System has been shown to move from graft to graft at a rate of approximately 1 to 3 seconds, thereby enabling the ARTAS System to dissect a graft every 2 to five seconds, or approximately 720 to over 1,800 grafts per hour. The ARTAS System enables the physicians to adjust dissection parameters to accommodate for different types of skin and manipulate graft selection algorithms based on patient needs. The ARTAS System can be programmed to dissect as many grafts as appropriate thus maximizing the use of the donor area. It can also be programmed to dissect grafts with more than 2 hairs each, thereby increasing the hair yield or the number of hairs per graft. During the harvesting phase of the hair transplantation procedure, the patient may be lightly sedated, and the integrated vision system can track patient movement and pause if excessive movement is detected. Recipient Site Making Sites, or incisions, are created to receive the harvested grafts. This task is generally performed by the physician. Prior to the ARTAS System, site making was performed manually using a hand held tool or needle to create hundreds to thousands of tiny incisions in the scalp. This is a critical step as it creates the hair pattern in which the harvested grafts will grow. From communications with physicians we have found that, typically, a physician can manually create approximately 1,500 sites per hour. Precision and consistency, however, can be affected by experience, hand eye coordination and fatigue. The ARTAS System Site Making functionality incorporates artificial intelligence and robotics precision to strategically make surgical incision sites for implanting hair follicles, while also identifying and avoiding injuring healthy follicles in proximity of the implantation sites. This allows the patient hair to look more natural and prevents damaging existing healthy hair in the transplant area which we believe would result in patients with more hair than if the sites were made manually. Robotic recipient Site Making is performed by the physician, who develops the ARTAS System treatment plan, or map, identifying where to make the incisions on the patient. The treatment plan is prepared using 3 dimension modeling software that takes 1 picture of the patient recipient area and generates a 3 dimensional map that is utilized by the ARTAS System. With entry angle accuracy, consistency and precise depth control, the ARTAS System creates the recipient sites using a small solid core needle or a blade at a rate of approximately 2,500 to 3,000 sites per hour, which is significantly faster than the approximately 1,500 sites per hour achieved manually. Implantation Following the site making phase of the hair transplantation procedure, the physician and or technicians utilizing an ARTAS System without the implantation functionality will manually implant the grafts in the robotically created sites made by the ARTAS System. Physicians and technicians utilizing an ARTAS iX System can utilize the robotic functionality of the system to assist in implanting the dissected follicles. We believe this robotic implantation functionality will help further shorten the learning curve, improve the consistency and reproducibility of results by protecting permanent hair and reducing inconsistencies associated with manual implantation, and could potentially reduce the amount of time each graft spends outside of the scalp and decrease the overall time required for implantation. ARTAS Kits for Harvesting and Site Making The ARTAS System utilizes a set of disposable and reusable kits for our Harvesting and Site Making functionality. Each system comes with a set of reusable Item. The disposable kits are included with the purchase of procedures. 25 Venus Legacy Venus Legacy combines (MP) 2 and VariPulse technologies with real time thermal feedback to act as a workstation, providing homogeneous heating to multiple tissue depths while allowing for adjustable pulsed suction. Venus Versa Venus Versa is a versatile system based on a multi application approach. It is a modular and upgradable platform that offers the most in demand aesthetic treatments by supporting 10 optional applicators which utilize Venus Concept (MP) 2 , and IPL and NanoFractional RF technologies. Designed as an open platform, the Venus Versa can be configured to best suit a practice needs with the ability to add additional applications as the practice grows or changes. Depending on the applicator, the platform can provide multiple aesthetic solutions. Venus Viva Venus Viva is an advanced, portable, fractional ablative system for dermatological procedures requiring ablation and resurfacing of the skin. Venus Viva uses NanoFractional RF and Smart Scan technologies. The combination of technologies allows ablation heated z1 density control and pattern generation via a proprietary tip. The energy is delivered through 160 pins per tip into the treated skin and maintains the surrounding tissue intact and healthy to support the healing process. Venus Freeze Plus Venus Freeze Plus is the second generation of Venus Concept (MP) 2 family of products. The Venus Freeze Plus uses Venus Concept (MP) 2 technology. ATC is a new feature that Venus Concept added to the Venus Freeze Plus, which allows the operator to choose a target temperature within the therapeutic range and have the system adjust the output power accordingly, to automatically maintain the desired temperature. This feature allows a more intuitive user experience, and results in less variable treatment outcomes usually attributable to the differences in operator techniques. 26 Venus Velocity The Venus Velocity system uses pulsed laser energy of 800 mm that is absorbed by a chromophore or pigmented target (e.g., melanin in hair follicles) that has greater optical absorption at the selected laser wavelength than the surrounding tissue. Different chromophores are targeted for different clinical indications. The selective absorption of different wavelengths leads to localized heating and thermal denaturation and destruction of the anatomic hair follicle target with minimal effect on surrounding tissues. The chilled sapphire light guide conductively cools the skin simultaneously with the delivery of laser energy, thereby maintaining low temperature in the epidermis to enhance the comfort of the procedure and avoid potential epidermal damage. Venus Fiore Venus Fiore incorporates Venus Concept (MP) 2 technology, supporting 3 different applicators. Venus Fiore has a desktop configuration and is portable and compact. It incorporates ATC technology, allowing the operator to choose a target temperature within the therapeutic range and have the system adjust the output power accordingly, to automatically maintain the desired temperature. The vaginal applicator incorporates 3 pairs of electrodes, each pair of electrodes accompanied by a temperature sensor, allowing the operator to control the temperature in the distal, middle and proximal thirds of the vaginal canal independently. Venus Fiore has received clearance in the EU and Israel, but is not yet cleared or approved in the United States or Canada. Venus Heal The Venus Heal has a desktop configuration and is portable and compact. The Venus Heal incorporates Venus Concept RP3 technology (a synergistic combination of Multi Polar Radio Frequency and PEMF, along with massage) supporting 2 different applicators. Venus Heal also incorporates ATC technology, allowing the operator to choose a target temperature within the therapeutic range, while the system adjusts the output power accordingly, to automatically maintain the temperature at the desired level. The device incorporates a 15 touch screen allowing an intuitive and friendly user interface. 27 Venus Bliss The Venus Bliss device consists of a console (main unit), 1 RF applicator and four diode laser applicators. The system, via its different applicator types, delivers laser and or bipolar RF energies, vacuum pressure, and pulsed magnetic fields to the skin and the underlying tissues of the treatment area. The console of the Venus Bliss device contains a power supply unit, laser and RF controllers, a suction module, a controller unit, laser water cooling system, a touch screen user interface and display panel. Venus Bliss delivers laser energy to the subcutaneous tissue layers via the four diode laser applicators connected to the console. The console utilizes diode laser modules as sources of optical energy and the optical output is fiber coupled through the applicator to the treatment area so to increase the temperature of the fat resulting in fat breakdown (lipolysis). In addition, the Venus Bliss device through the (MP) 2 applicator provides RF treatments combined with emitted magnetic fields and vacuum massaging. The RF heating effect, together with the non thermal magnetic fields and vacuum, leads to the temporary reduction in the appearance of cellulite, temporary relief of muscle pain and spasm, and improvement of local blood circulation in the subdermal layers. Venus Glow Venus Glow consists of a console and applicator. It is used to improve skin appearance using powerful tri modality treatment combining a rotating tip, a vacuum modality and a jet. Venus Glow deep cleans pores by removing impurities such as daily dirt and debris, dry or dead skin cells, and excess sebum. NeoGraft Venus Concept NeoGraft device is an advanced hair restoration technology with an automated FUE and implantation system. The procedure leaves no linear scar and is minimally invasive. ARTAS iX The ARTAS System is comprised of the patient chair, the cart, which includes the robotic arm, integrated vision system, artificial intelligence algorithms and a series of proprietary end effectors, which are the various devices at the end of the robotic arm, such as the automated needle and punch, that interact with the patient scalp and hair follicles and perform various clinical functions. 28 The image below depicts the ARTAS iX System cart, including the robotic arm and the needle mechanism which houses the automated needle and punch used for follicle dissection and site making. Venus Epileve The Venus Epileve system uses pulsed laser energy of 800 mm that is absorbed by a chromophore or pigmented target (e.g., melanin in hair follicles) while skin surface is being chilled, for different indications of hair removal and permanent hair reduction. Venus Epileve is intended to provide an entry level, affordable solution for non traditional markets for hair removal of all skin types. Epileve has obtained both CE mark and Health Canada license. Products in Development On an ongoing basis, we work to bring new and innovative products to market. We are developing the following products and technologies Venus Glow Serums We are developing a series of topical serums to be used with our Venus Glow system. Directional Skin Tightening (DT) Technology DT is intended as a non surgical alternative to lift and tighten skin for procedures typically requiring surgical intervention that uses artificial intelligence and robotics to achieve the intended outcomes. The punches DT utilizes for coring are designed not leave scars on tissue. The skin will be contracted after coring by applying a flexible patch to the area which will allow healing of the skin with predefined directional effect. Magnetic Muscle Stimulation Technology Magnetic Muscle Stimulation (MMS) is body contouring technology that is intended to be complimentary to our Venus Bliss device. MMS is intended to create volume in predefined areas of the body by utilizing magnetic fields to create controlled muscle contractions. MMS will be operated with 2 applicators for use on symmetrical pairs of the muscles and will use smart algorithms to determine the strength and sequences of muscle contraction and relaxation. 29 Venus Legacy 2 Venus Legacy 2 is intended to be the next generation of the well accepted Venus Legacy product line. The Venus Legacy 2 is intended to extend and revive the original Venus Legacy system product line, which has been in the worldwide market for over 5 years. The device will combine (MP) and VariPulse technologies with real time thermal feedback and ATC to provide homogeneous heating to multiple tissue depths while allowing for adjustable pulsed suction to further support deep energy penetration, resulting in enhanced lymphatic drainage and improved circulation stimulation. We are planning to include some advanced user feedback features, such as a thermal camera in the Venus Legacy 2 VeroGrafter Services In the United States, we offer the services of a group of independently contracted technicians who are certified to assist physicians during a hair restoration procedure. These technicians, who we market as VeroGrafters , must successfully complete a yearly certification process to remain active. VeroGrafters service is currently offered for NeoGraft procedures and we expect we offer VeroGrafters for ARTAS procedures in 2020. 225 Services 225 is our internal advertising agency focused on localized marketing services for small to mid sized business owners who have purchased products sold by us. Currently there are 3 areas of focus (i) digital lead generation; (ii) local search engine optimization (SEO) and reputation management; and (iii) website development. Digital Lead Generation . More commonly referred to as Pay Per Click Marketing, the business owners establish a recommended campaign budget that we manage on their behalf with a goal of generating qualified prospective patient ph1 calls and email leads for their practice. We manage the strategy, creative development, campaign execution, and media spend on 3 main platforms (Google, Facebook and Instagram) and provide real time dashboard reporting to demonstrate the success of their digital marketing programs. Local SEO & Reputation Management . This service is offered to ensure the doctors are represented accurately and fairly on online directories and they can monitor and respond to their reviews. We ensure their Google My Business Listings for all locations are d1 accurately, optimized for Local SEO success, and updated regularly to reflect any change in business hours, services offered, additional locations, etc. Last, we setup, all customers on Google Search Console to monitor any changes or issues with their website and organic traffic. Website Development . Our team of Web Development experts create, develop and maintain engaging, fully responsive, mobile friendly aesthetic practice websites that are not only SEO ready, but also optimized for conversions to help generate more patient leads from both organic and Pay Per Click traffic. These websites are hosted in secure, high speed web servers, loaded with custom colors, unique branding, stock images and include SEO optimized aesthetic text content. They also bring functionality that allows customers to add pages, edit content, integrate with social platforms, and Google Analytics. Practice Enhancement Services To support the growth initiatives of our customers, we have built a practice enhancement offering that provides our customers with a fully integrated marketing support program along with business and marketing tools to grow their practices, improve their financial and business performance, and maximize their return on investment, while also supporting our sale of products and ancillary services. Complimentary practice enhancement services are included with the purchase of a system under our subscription model. These services include marketing support and media exposure, such as email marketing, search engine optimization, branding, web presence, social media presence, photography and videography, copywriting, and event planning, in each case specifically designed for physician practices. For an additional fee, we offer incremental practice enhancement services such as a specific digital marketing package, custom website redesign, and customized video and photography shoots. 30 Vero Hair Practice Development Services To support the growth initiatives of our hair restoration customers, we have built a specialized practice development team. This team offers support in all areas of marketing and clinic support. Some of the key services include clinic staff training, marketing of the procedure and device online and off line. The practice development services help drive utilization of the ARTAS system and procedure kits and consumables. Clinical Developments We have invested in research and development to support our technology, marketing and post marketing surveillance. We also have a portfolio of 15 peer reviewed publications and more than 20 white papers, many of which pertain to indications cleared outside of the United States to educate users in other countries and to study expanded indications in the United States. Authors for several of these publications hold stock options in Venus Concept or were consultants for us. 1 of the published studies examined the thermal levels reached with Venus Concept Venus Freeze system. The results indicated that these systems achieve homogeneous dermal heating. Another study reviewed the use of (MP) 2 technology for wrinkles and rhytides treatment. In addition, to test the effectiveness and safety of Venus Viva and its Nano Fractional technology, a study examined the performance of Venus Concept fractional RF technology on skin texture in the United States. In this trial, subject improvement was assessed after 1 month and after 2 months, and subject satisfaction was assessed through surveys. Reviewers reported that the subjects demonstrated statistically significant and measurable reductions in minor wrinkles, and textual appearance in the skin. In addition, over 80% of subjects indicated in their survey satisfaction with treatments. In a 60 patient clinical study d1 with the Venus Bliss device, all participants received a single diode laser treatment to either their flanks or abdomen. Based on the data review, subjects saw a statistically significant reduction in adipose layer thickness as measured by ultrasound, 6 and 12 weeks following treatment. Greater than 90% of the subjects found the treatment to be comfortable and the majority were satisfied with the results. The IPL technology used in Venus Versa has shown to be versatile and effective for treating vascular and pigmented lesions, acne and rosacea. Venus Concept has a number of ongoing clinical trials covering both new technologies and the development of expanded indications for existing technology. Clinical trials are conducted frequently to support existing technologies and their respective enhancements and upgrades. Sales and Marketing We market and sell our products and services to the traditional medical aesthetic market including plastic surgeons and dermatologists. We also sell in certain markets to a broad base of non traditional physician markets, including general and family practiti1rs and aesthetic medical spas. Through our wholly owned and majority owned subsidiaries, we sell our products and services both through a traditional sales model as well as through our subscription model. In select markets, we enter into distribution agreements with local distributors. Direct Sales We currently provide our subscription model and associated marketing support programs through its wholly owned subsidiaries in the United States, Canada, United Kingdom, Japan, South Korea, Mexico, Argentina, Colombia, Spain, France, Germany, Israel and Australia, as well as through Venus Concept majority owned subsidiaries in China, Hong Kong, Singapore, Ind1sia, Vietnam, India, Italy, Bulgaria, Russia, Kazakhstan and South Africa. In our international direct operations, whether wholly owned or a majority owned subsidiary, we deliver devices under both our subscription model and traditional sales model. 31 Direct sales force. In the United States and select international markets, we use our direct sales force to sell our systems and other products and services. Our direct sales force works directly with our customers to provide comprehensive education and training on the use of our systems. As of December 31, 2019, we had a direct sales and marketing team of approximately 2 45 employees, managed by five Vice Presidents of Sales for various international markets and 1 Vice President of Global Marketing. We plan to continue to expand our direct sales organization internationally to help facilitate further adoption among a broad physician market. Distributors. In countries where we do not operate directly, we sell through distributors. As of December 31, 2019, we had distribution agreements in approximately 36 countries. We enter into both exclusive and non exclusive distribution agreements. Our distribution agreements generally provide the distributor with a right to distribute our systems for an initial term of 1 to 3 years, with certain agreements automatically renewing for a period of 2 to 3 additional years. Our distribution agreements also typically provide the exclusive right to distribute our systems within a designated territory and a right of first refusal to distribute any of our new systems offered in the territory. Each agreement sets forth the minimum quarterly purchase commitments. If the distributor fails to meet 1 of its minimum quarterly purchase commitments, we can convert the distributor to a non exclusive distributor during the then remaining term or it can terminate the agreement. To provide more comprehensive customer support, these agreements require our distributors to provide after sales service to customers, such as training and technical support, and various marketing activities, such as preparing and executing marketing plans and working with key market leaders in the designated territory to promote the product. Marketing and Branding Programs We are focused on, and invest heavily in, direct to consumer marketing initiatives to increase awareness of our products and services. We believe our marketing activities are both cost effective and critical in supporting the continued growth and development of our business. As of December 31, 2019, we had a Vice President of Global Marketing and a Director of Global Brand Marketing, with marketing associates located in various markets who specifically focus on implementing Venus Concept marketing initiatives. We implemented a public relations outreach strategy that incorporates both digital media and top national media channels in the fashion and beauty industries and have a presence on the most popular social media channels, such as Facebook, Twitter, YouTube, Pinterest, LinkedIn and Instagram. We also raise our profile through large media events in major metropolitan centers, such as New York, Milan, Los Angeles, Toronto, London, Paris, and Madrid, and engage in regular meetings with journalists, media outlets, celebrity doctors, and representatives of the fashion and beauty industries. We also attend major medical and scientific meetings, as well as trade shows. Since some countries require customized marketing programs, we have hired country specific marketing managers to ensure that marketing programs are executed successfully in those jurisdictions. Customer Support We provide our physician customers and authorized distributors with customer support through our fully integrated marketing program and strong clinical and technical support teams. Practice Enhancement Services To support the growth initiatives of our customers, we have built a practice enhancement unit that provides customers with a fully integrated marketing support program with business and marketing tools to grow their practices, improve their financial and business performance, and maximize their return on investment while also supporting our sale of products and ancillary services. Our practice enhancement program includes the following features Inclusion in an advanced clinic directory that is promoted online and offline to consumers. The full page listing includes the clinic photos, videos, testimonials, social media profiles and a full list of treatments including competitive products and services. Video marketing strategy focused on answering consumers questions about non invasive aesthetic procedures and featuring people testimonials, tips and customer success stories. Strong support and guidance for the clinic own video marketing initiatives. 32 Individual meetings coordinated with influential journalists and media outlets, and participation in our public relations outreach programs in national, regional and local media outlets. New Customer Success Kits comprised of a starter package with marketing materials necessary to introduce and promote new Venus products with a heavy emphasis on a digital and social media strategy. Access to customized practice enhancement programs such as Secret Shopper and Open House programs. Routine analysis of business practices with instruction on effective patient consultation and conversion strategies. Our TV and media plans consisting of custom video and media programs tailored to the practice marketing needs. Analysis of current social media and online marketing efforts and guidance on how to attract and convert potential consumers more efficiently. For hair restoration customers, access to specialized VeroHair 12 Step Program designed to assist ARTAS and NeoGraft customers with building a successful hair restoration practice. Technical and Clinical Support We provide a warranty for many of our products against defects for up to 3 years, with certain products carrying a warranty for a more extended period. Once the warranty expires, our customers have the option of purchasing a service contract, which is typically for a term of 1 to 3 years. We maintain a technical and clinical support team to field inquiries, troubleshoot product issues, facilitate sales activities and support the commercial activities of our direct offices and its international distributors. We provide immediate response technical support to our physician customers and distributors year round. In the event that an issue arises, our technical support personnel will work with our customers to determine if a technical issue may be resolved over the teleph1 or requires a service visit. In markets where we do not have our own service engineers, we service and support our products through arrangements handled by our independent distributors. In order to maximize customer up time, we proactively deploy replacement systems, modules, and comp1nts to strategic hubs worldwide. Manufacturing and Quality Assurance We have our own research and development center in Yokneam, Israel and uses four ISO certified contract manufacturers in Karmiel, Israel; Nazareth, Israel; Mazet, France and Weston, Florida where it manufactures the Venus Legacy and Venus Viva systems in a FDA registered facility. During the second half of 2018, we began to assemble the ARTAS iX System in San Jose, California, while reusable and disposable kits are assembled exclusively for us by NPI Solutions, Inc., or NPI based in Morgan Hill, California. We work closely with our manufacturers and perform final quality control testing using our own employees stati1d in the manufacturing facilities. Having over 85% of the production of our systems in close proximity to our research and development and operations facilities enables us to control the entire process from product development through manufacturing and final testing, which enables us to provide advanced, high quality systems as well as the flexibility to create customized solutions for our customers. Also, using multiple manufacturers allows us a greater degree of flexibility in adjusting production levels to meet fast changing market demand. We do not have any long term supply agreements for comp1nts. 33 Manufacturing facilities that produce medical devices intended for distribution in the United States and internationally are subject to regulation and periodic unannounced inspection by FDA and other domestic and international regulatory agencies. In the United States, we are required to manufacture our products in compliance with FDA QSR, which covers the methods and documentation of the design, testing, control, manufacturing, labeling, quality assurance, packaging, storage, and shipping of our products. In international markets, we are required to obtain and maintain various quality assurance and quality management certifications. We have obtained the following international certifications ISO 134852016 Medical devices Quality management systems Requirements for regulatory purposes, ISO 13485 under Medical Devices Single Audit Program, or MDSAP, in Canada, Ordinance 169 certification (Japan), CE Certificate of Conformity in accordance with Annex II (Full Quality System) to the Medical Devices Directive (EEA), and MDSAP. Venus Concept maintains a quality system designed to be compliant with quality system management and QSR and have procedures in place designed to ensure that all products and materials purchased by us conform to specified requirements, including evaluation of suppliers, and where required, qualification of the comp1nts supplied. Our current facilities are adequate to support our operations. Research and Development Our ongoing research and development activities are primarily focused on improving and enhancing our current technologies, products, and services, as well as expanding our current product offering with the introduction of new products for different aesthetic, medical and hair restoration applications. Our research and development efforts related to our technologies currently include research to expand indications, broaden our offering of system applicators, advance our proprietary (MP) 2 technology, refine our Harvesting and Site Making functions, as well as the implantation functionality for the ARTAS iX System, develop design improvements and new products, and implement a technology platform to record and collect information on each treatment procedure. For the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, we incurred research and development expenses of $8.0 million and $7.0 million, respectively. We expect our research and development expense to vary as different development projects are initiated and completed, as we invest in research, clinical studies, regulatory affairs and development activities over time, and as we continue to expand our business. Intellectual Property Portfolio We rely on a combination of patent, copyright, trademark and trade secret laws, and confidentiality and invention assignment agreements to protect our intellectual property rights. As of December 31, 2019, our patent portfolio is comprised of 8 issued U.S. patents which cover our (MP) 2 technology that are associated with 2 different patent families (the earliest of which will expire in 2022), 94 issued U.S. patents primarily covering the ARTAS System and methods of use (the earliest of which expire in 2021), 18 pending U.S. patent applications, 1 pending U.S. provisional patent application, 135 issued foreign counterpart patents, and 39 pending foreign counterpart patent applications. As of December 31, 2019, our trademark portfolio included the following trademark registrations, pending trademark applications or common law trademark rights, among others Venus, Venus Concept , Venus Fiore , Venus Freeze , Venus Freeze Plus , Venus Glow , Venus Heal , Venus Legacy , Venus Skin , Venus Viva , Venus Versa , Venus Bliss , Restoration Robotics , ARTAS , ARTAS iX, Venus Concept delivering the promise, NeoGraft and (MP)2 We continue to file new trademark applications in many countries to protect our current and future products and related slogans. 34 Intellectual Property Transfer Agreement In August 2013, Venus Concept Ltd. entered into a license agreement for the rights to an invention for fractional RF treatment of the skin with the developers of the technology. Pursuant to the license agreement, the developers granted to Venus Concept Ltd. an exclusive worldwide, perpetual, irrevocable license to develop and commercialize their inventions and any product into which it is integrated. As consideration for such license, Venus Concept Ltd. agreed to pay the developers 7% of the gross income received by it from sales of the Venus Viva system and the related consumables and $1,500 per Venus Versa system, which includes the IPL applicator, up to an aggregate amount of $30 million. With respect to gross income from sales of the Venus Viva system and the related consumables in China, Hong Kong, Israel and Italy, payment is determined by multiplying the sales by Venus Concept Ltd. percentage equity ownership in those majority owned subsidiaries. 1 of the developers of the technology is Boris Vaynberg, our Chief Technology Officer. In 2014, the developers executed a patent assignment document and Venus Concept Ltd. filed it with the USPTO to provide notice of the transfer and to perfect its rights. In 2016, the parties executed an amendment to the 2013 license agreement to memorialize the transfer that was filed with the USPTO, among other things. For the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, Venus Concept paid Mr. Vaynberg $370,000 and $280,000 respectively, under these arrangements. License Agreement with HSC Development LLC and James A. Harris, MD In July 2006, we entered into a license agreement, or the HSC license agreement, with HSC Development LLC, or HSC, and James A. Harris, M.D., as amended, pursuant to which we received an exclusive, worldwide license to develop, manufacture and commercialize products covered by any of the licensed patent rights or that incorporate the licensed technology in the field of performance of hair removal and implantation, including transplantation, procedures using a computer controlled system in which a needle or other device carried on a mechanized arm is oriented to a follicular unit for extraction of same, or to an implant site for implantation of a follicular unit, or some combination thereof. Under the HSC license agreement, we are developing the ARTAS System to be utilized as a robotic system to assist a physician in performing hair restoration procedures. In consideration for the license, we issued to HSC 25,000 shares of our common stock, prior to the Company 1 for 10 reverse stock split, and paid HSC a 1 time payment of $25,000. The license grant is perpetual, and the license agreement does not provide a right for HSC or Dr. Harris to terminate the HSC license agreement. The licensed patents cover, in general, a method and device for the extraction of follicular units from a donor area on a patient. The method includes scoring the outer skin layers with a sharp punch, and then inserting a blunt punch into the incision to separate the hair follicle from the surrounding tissue and fatty layer. The method and device significantly decrease the amount of follicular transection and increase the rate at which follicular units can be extracted. There are other embodiments not herein disclosed. The licensed patents will expire from 2025 through 2030. Competition The medical technology and aesthetic product markets are highly competitive and dynamic and are characterized by rapid and substantial technological development and product innovation. Demand for our systems is impacted by the products and procedures offered by our competitors. Certain of our systems also compete against conventional non energy based treatments, such as Botox and collagen injections, chemical peels, and microdermabrasion. In the U.S., we compete against companies that have developed minimally invasive and non invasive medical aesthetic procedures. Outside of the U.S., likely due to less stringent regulatory requirements, there are more aesthetic products and procedures available in international markets than are cleared for use in the U.S. Sometimes, there are also fewer limitations on the claims our competitors in international markets can make about the effectiveness of their products and the manner in which they can market them. As a result, we may face a greater number of competitors in markets outside of the U.S. We also compete generally with medical technology and aesthetic companies, including those offering products and products unrelated to skin treatment. Recently, there has been consolidation in the aesthetic industry leading to companies combining their resources, which increases competition and could result in increased downward pressure on our system prices. 35 In the surgical hair restoration market, we consider our direct competition to be strip surgeries and FUE procedures using hand held devices. Many of our surgical device and equipment competitors have greater capital resources, sales and marketing operations and service infrastructures than we do, as well as longer commercial histories and more extensive relationships with physicians. Strip surgery and some manual FUE procedures have a greater penetration into the hair restoration market. Our indirect competition in the hair restoration market also includes non surgical treatments for hair loss, such as prescription therapeutics, including Propecia, and non prescription remedies, such as wigs, hair pieces and spray on applications. We believe that its systems compete largely on the basis of the following factors company and product brand recognition; effective marketing and education; sales force experience and access; product support and service; technological innovation, product enhancements and speed of innovation; pricing and revenue strategies; product reliability, safety and durability; ease of use; consistency, predictability and durability of aesthetic results; and procedure costs to patients. Many of our competitors are larger, more experienced companies that have substantially greater resources and brand recognition than we do. Some of these companies have a broad range of product offerings, large direct sales forces and long term customer relationships with the physicians we target, which could make our market penetration efforts more difficult. Government Regulation The design, development, manufacture, testing and sale of Venus Concept products are subject to regulation by numerous governmental authorities, including FDA, and corresponding state and foreign regulatory agencies. Regulation by FDA In the United States, the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, or FDCA, FDA regulations and other federal and state statutes and regulations govern, among other things, medical device design and development, preclinical and clinical testing, premarket clearance or approval, registration and listing, manufacturing, labeling, storage, advertising and promotion, sales and distribution, export and import, and post market surveillance. FDA enforces the FDCA and the regulations promulgated pursuant to the FDCA. Each medical device that we wish to distribute commercially in the United States will require marketing authorization from FDA prior to distribution, unless exempt. The 2 primary types of FDA marketing authorization applicable to a device are premarket notification, also called 510(k) clearance, and premarket approval, also called PMA approval. The type of marketing authorization is generally linked to the classification of the device. FDA classifies medical devices into 1 of 3 classes (Class I, II, or III) based on the degree of risk FDA determines to be associated with a device and the level of regulatory control deemed necessary to ensure the device safety and effectiveness for its intended use(s). Devices requiring fewer controls because they are deemed to pose lower risk are placed in Class I or II. Class I devices are deemed to pose the least risk and are subject only to general controls applicable to all devices, such as requirements for device labeling, and adherence to FDA current Good Manufacturing Practices, or cGMP, and regulation, as reflected in its QSR. Class II devices are intermediate risk devices that are subject to general controls and may also be subject to special controls such as performance standards, product specific guidance documents, special labeling requirements, patient registries, or post market surveillance. Class III devices are those for which insufficient information exists to assure safety and effectiveness solely through general or special controls and include life sustaining, life supporting or implantable devices, devices of substantial importance in preventing impairment of human health, or which present a potential, unreasonable risk of illness or injury. 36 Most Class I devices and some Class II devices are exempted by regulation from the 510(k) clearance requirement and can be marketed without prior authorization from FDA. Some Class I devices that have not been so exempted and most Class II devices are eligible for marketing through the 510(k) clearance pathway. By contrast, devices placed in Class III generally require PMA approval or approval of a de novo reclassification petition prior to commercial marketing. FDA 510(k) clearance process usually takes from 3 to twelve months, but can take longer. For products subject to PMA, the regulatory process generally takes from 1 to 3 years or even longer, from the time the application is filed with FDA and involves substantially greater risks and commitment of resources than either the 510(k) clearance or de novo processes. 510(k) Clearance To obtain 510(k) clearance for a medical device, an applicant must submit a premarket notification to FDA demonstrating that the device is substantially equivalent to a previously cleared 510(k) device or a device that was in commercial distribution before May 28, 1976 for which FDA has not yet called for PMA approval, commonly known as the predicate device. A device is substantially equivalent if, with respect to the predicate device, it has the same intended use and has either (i) the same technological characteristics or (ii) different technological characteristics and the information submitted demonstrates that the device is as safe and effective as a legally marketed device and does not raise different questions of safety or effectiveness. A showing of substantial equivalence sometimes, but not always, requires clinical data. Generally, the 510(k) clearance process can exceed 90 days and may extend to a year or more. After a device receives 510(k) marketing clearance, any modification that could significantly affect its safety or effectiveness, or that would constitute a major change or modification in its intended use, will require a new 510(k) marketing clearance or, depending on the modification, a de novo classification or PMA approval. FDA requires each manufacturer to determine whether the proposed change requires submission of a 510(k) or a PMA in the first instance, but FDA can review any such decision and disagree with a manufacturer determination. Many minor modifications today are accomplished by a letter to file in which the manufacture documents the change in an internal letter to file. The letter to file is in lieu of submitting a new 510(k) to obtain clearance for every change. FDA may review these letters to file during an inspection. If FDA disagrees with a manufacturer s determination that no 510(k) was required for the change, FDA can require the manufacturer to cease marketing and or request the recall of the modified device until 510(k) marketing clearance or PMA approval is obtained. Also, in these circumstances, we may be subject to significant regulatory fines or penalties. In addition, FDA may not approve or clear our products for the indications that are necessary or desirable for successful commercialization or could require clinical trials to support any modifications. FDA has issued guidance intended to assist manufacturers in determining whether modifications to cleared devices require the submission of a new 510(k), and such guidance has come under scrutiny in recent years, the practical impact of which is unclear. We have made modifications to our products in the past and have determined based on our review of the applicable FDA regulations and guidance that in certain instances new 510(k) clearances or PMA approvals were not required. As part of an internal review of our regulatory clearances in the U.S., we determined that Special 510(k) applications were necessary related to an earlier modification to 2 of our FDA cleared devices. Specifically, because we added to 2 of our FDA cleared devices additional FDA cleared applicators not initially considered in the device clearance submissions, we believed that Special 510(k) applications should have been filed to allow FDA to review the incorporation into the cleared devices of the separately cleared applicators. We filed 1 of the Special 510(k) submissions with FDA. FDA requested that we instead submit a Traditional 510(k) and provide additional information. We have accordingly modified the Special 510(k) submitted to FDA to a Traditional 510(k) application for this device, related to these modifications. Generally the 510(k) initial response process takes approximately 90 days, however, the overall process may extend to 180 days or more. We cannot be certain that FDA will respond to our submission in a timely manner or that clearance will be obtained. We also submitted a Traditional 510(k) for the second device and, on September 6, 2019, received 510(k) clearance from FDA. We believe that the modifications do not affect safety or efficacy, do not affect the intended use of the device, and do not alter the fundamental scientific technology of the device, however, we cannot be certain that FDA will agree with our assessment. FDA may not clear the device or may take other action against us as described above, which could have a material adverse effect on our business. 37 De Novo Reclassification If there is no known predicate for a device ( i.e., a legally marketed Class I or II device with comparable indications), a company may request a de novo reclassification of the product. De novo reclassification generally applies where there is no predicate device and FDA believes the device is sufficiently safe so that no PMA should be required. FDA de novo reclassification process has been streamlined to allow a company to request that a new product classification be established based on information provided by the requesting company. The direct de novo process allows a company to submit a reclassification petition without the company needing to submit a 510(k) clearance application first. The submitter also must provide draft Special Control(s) for the product. The Special Controls specify the recommendations for submission of subsequent devices for the same intended use. If a product is classified as Class II through the direct de novo review process, then that device may serve as a predicate device for subsequent 510(k) pre market notifications. The FDA may take a year or more to reach a decision on the petition and issue a new product code. Should FDA fail to approve a direct de novo petition, or establish a new product code, PMA approval may be required. PMA Approval A PMA application must be submitted if the device cannot be cleared through the 510(k) process and is found ineligible for de novo reclassification. The PMA application process is generally more costly and time consuming than the 510(k) process. A PMA application requires the payment of significant user fees. PMA applications must be supported by valid scientific evidence, which typically requires extensive data, including technical, preclinical, clinical, and manufacturing data, to demonstrate to FDA satisfaction the safety and effectiveness of the device. A PMA application must also include, among other things a complete description of the device and its comp1nts; a detailed description of the methods, facilities and controls used to manufacture the device; and proposed labeling. FDA has 45 days from its receipt of a PMA to determine whether the application will be accepted for filing based on the agency threshold determination that it is sufficiently complete to permit substantive review. Once the submission is accepted for filing, FDA begins an in depth review. Although FDA by statute has 180 days to review the accepted application , review of the application can take between 1 and 3 years or longer. During this review period, FDA may request additional information or clarification of information already provided. Also, during the review period, an advisory panel of experts from outside FDA may be convened to review and evaluate the application and provide recommendations to FDA as to the approvability of the device. In addition, FDA will conduct a pre approval inspection of the manufacturing facility or facilities to ensure compliance with the QSR. Approval of FDA review of an initial PMA application may require several years to complete. FDA can delay, limit, or deny approval of a PMA application for many reasons, including it is not demonstrated that there is reasonable assurance that the device is safe or effective under the conditions of use prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the proposed labeling; the data from preclinical studies and clinical trials may be insufficient, and the manufacturing process, methods, controls, or facilities used for the manufacture, processing, packing, or installation of the device do not meet applicable requirements. If FDA evaluations of both the PMA application and the manufacturing facilities are favorable, FDA will either issue an approval letter or an approvable letter, which usually contains a number of conditions that must be met in order to secure final approval of the PMA. If FDA evaluation of the PMA or manufacturing facilities is not favorable, FDA will deny approval of the PMA or issue a not approvable letter. A not approvable letter will outline the deficiencies in the application and, where practical, will identify what is necessary to make the PMA approvable. FDA may also determine that additional clinical trials are necessary, in which case the PMA approval may be delayed for several months or years while the trials are conducted and then the data must be submitted in an amendment to the PMA. Once granted, PMA approval may be withdrawn by FDA if compliance with post approval requirements, conditions of approval or other regulatory standards is not maintained, or problems are identified following initial marketing. 38 Certain changes to an approved device, such as changes in manufacturing facilities, methods, or quality control procedures, or changes in the design performance specifications, which affect the safety or effectiveness of the device, require submission of a PMA supplement. PMA supplements often require submission of the same type of information as a PMA, except that the supplement is limited to information needed to support any changes from the device covered by the original PMA and may not require as extensive clinical data or the convening of an advisory panel. Certain other changes to an approved device require the submission of a new PMA, such as when the design change causes a different intended use, mode of operation, and technical basis of operation, or when the design change is so significant and the data that were submitted with the original PMA do not provide reasonable assurance of safety and effectiveness. Clinical Trials Clinical trials are almost always required to support FDA approval of a premarket approval application and are sometimes required for 510(k) clearances. If a device presents a significant risk, as defined by FDA, to human health, the device sponsor may need to file an investigational device exemption ( IDE ) application with FDA and obtain an IDE approval prior to commencing the human clinical trials. The IDE application must be supported by appropriate data, such as animal and laboratory testing results, showing that it is safe to test the device in humans and that the testing protocol is scientifically sound. The IDE application must be approved in advance by FDA for a specified number of patients, unless the product is deemed a non significant risk device and eligible for more abbreviated IDE requirements. Clinical trials for a significant risk device may begin once the IDE application is approved by FDA and the appropriate institutional review boards, or IRBs. Clinical trials are subject to extensive monitoring, recordkeeping and reporting requirements. Clinical trials must be conducted under the oversight of an IRB and must comply with FDA regulations, including but not limited to those relating to good clinical practices. To conduct a clinical trial, the devices sponsor is also required to obtain the patients informed consent in form and substance that complies with both FDA requirements and applicable state and federal privacy and human subject protection regulations. Any future clinical trials must be conducted in accordance with FDA regulations and applicable federal and state regulations concerning human subject protection, including informed consent and healthcare privacy regulations. A clinical trial may be suspended by FDA or the IRB at any time for various reasons, including a belief that the risks to the study participants outweigh the benefits of participation in the study. Even if a study is completed, the results of its clinical testing may not demonstrate the safety and efficacy of the device or may be equivocal or otherwise not be sufficient to obtain clearance or approval of the sponsor device. The Food and Drug Administration Amendments Act, or FDAAA, expanded the federal government clinical trial registry and results databank maintained by the National Institutes of Health, or NIH, to include all (with limited exceptions) medical device trials. In particular, it requires certain information about device trials, including a description of the trial, participation criteria, location of trial sites, and contact information, to be sent to NIH for inclusion in a publicly accessible database. In addition, the results of clinical trials that form the primary basis for efficacy claims or are conducted after a device is approved or cleared must be posted to the results databank. Under FDAAA, companies that violate these and other provisions of the law are subject to substantial civil m1tary penalties. Similarly, in Europe a clinical study must be approved by the local ethics committee and in some cases, including studies of high risk devices, by the ministry of health in the applicable country. In the EU, physico chemical tests carried out on the medical device may be necessary in order to obtain the CE mark. These tests must be performed by accredited laboratories for Class II b and III medical devices. The reports and tests are required to be filed in a technical file submitted to the notified body for validation of and obtaining the CE mark. Regulation 2017 745 applicable as of May 2020 in the EU will significantly strengthen the requirements for clinical evaluation (EC). The clinical evaluation for class II b and class III medical devices will be based on a critical evaluation of relevant scientific publications, the results of all available clinical investigations as well as the consideration of other medical devices with the same purpose. Regulation 2017 745 notably requires the manufacturer to carry out a post marketing safety monitoring plan, which includes post marketing clinical follow ups (SCAC) in order to update information about the devices marketed throughout its life cycle, and notably any adverse effects. 39 Post market Regulation Any devices that are manufactured or distributed pursuant to clearance or approval by FDA are subject to pervasive and continuing regulation by FDA and certain state agencies. After a device is placed on the market, numerous regulatory requirements continue to apply. These include establishment registration and device listing with FDA; QSR requirements, which require manufacturers, including third party manufacturers, to follow stringent design, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures during all aspects of the design and manufacturing process; labeling and marketing regulations, which require that promotion is truthful, not misleading, fairly balanced and provide adequate directions for use and that all claims are substantiated, and prohibit the promotion of products for unapproved or off label uses and impose other restrictions on labeling; clearance or approval of product modifications to 510(k) cleared devices that could significantly affect safety or effectiveness or that would constitute a major change in intended use of 1 of our cleared devices; medical device reporting regulations, which require that a manufacturer report to FDA if a device it markets may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury, or has malfuncti1d and the device or a similar device that it markets would be likely to cause or contribute to a death or serious injury, if the malfunction were to recur; correction, removal and recall reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA field corrections and product recalls or removals if undertaken to reduce a risk to health posed by the device or to remedy a violation of the FDCA that may present a risk to health; complying with the federal law and regulations requiring Unique Device Identifiers (UDI) on devices and requiring the submission of certain information about each device to FDA Global Unique Device Identification Database, or GUDID; FDA recall authority, whereby the agency can order device manufacturers to recall from the market a product that is in violation of governing laws and regulations; and post market surveillance activities and regulations, which apply when deemed by FDA to be necessary to protect the public health or to provide additional safety and effectiveness data for the device. We may be subject to similar foreign laws that may include applicable post marketing requirements such as safety surveillance. Our manufacturing processes are required to comply with the applicable portions of the QSR, which cover the methods and the facilities and controls for the design, manufacture, testing, production, processes, controls, quality assurance, labeling, packaging, distribution, installation and servicing of finished devices intended for human use. The QSR also requires, among other things, maintenance of a device master file, device history file, and complaint files. As a manufacturer, we are subject to periodic scheduled or unscheduled inspections by the FDA. A failure to maintain compliance with the QSR requirements could result in the shut down of, or restrictions on, manufacturing operations and the recall or seizure of products. The FDA has broad regulatory compliance and enforcement powers. If the FDA determines that we failed to comply with applicable regulatory requirements, it can take a variety of compliance or enforcement actions, which may result in any of the following sanctions warning letters, untitled letters, fines, injunctions, consent decrees and civil penalties; recalls, withdrawals, or administrative detention or seizure of our products; operating restrictions or partial suspension or total shutdown of production; refusing or delaying requests for 510(k) marketing clearance or PMA approvals of new products or modified products; withdrawing 510(k) clearances or PMA approvals that have already been granted; 40 refusal to grant export or import approvals for our products; criminal prosecution; or debarment or disqualification. Labeling and promotional activities are subject to scrutiny by FDA and, in certain circumstances, by the Federal Trade Commission. Medical devices approved or cleared by FDA may not be promoted for unapproved or uncleared uses, otherwise known as off label promotion. Medical devices requiring clearance or approval, but for which such clearance approval has not been obtained, also must not be marketed. FDA and other agencies actively enforce the laws and regulations prohibiting the promotion of off label uses, and a company that is found to have improperly promoted off label uses may be subject to significant liability, including substantial m1tary penalties and criminal prosecution. We received an inquiry from FDA in August 2018 regarding off label or unapproved uses of Venus Fiore. However, we never marketed or promoted Venus Fiore in the United States and we explained this to the agency. We subsequently added geoblocker functionality to our website, to portray accurately what devices we are marketing in the United States. Export of Our Products Export of products subject to the 510(k) notification requirements, but not yet cleared to market, is permitted with FDA authorization provided certain requirements are met. Unapproved or uncleared products subject to the PMA requirements may be exported if the exporting company and the device meet certain criteria, including, among other things, that the device complies with the laws of the receiving country, has valid marketing authorization from the appropriate authority and the company submits a Simple Notification to FDA when Venus Concept begins to export. Importantly, however, export of such products may be limited to certain countries designated by statutory provisions, and petitions may need to be submitted to FDA to enable export to countries other than those designated in the statutory provisions. The petitioning process can be difficult, and FDA may not authorize unapproved or uncleared products to be exported to countries to which a manufacturer wishes to export. Devices that are adulterated, devices whose label and labeling does not comply with requirements of the country receiving the product, and devices that are not promoted in accordance with the law of the receiving country, among others, cannot be exported. Fraud and Abuse Regulations Federal and state governmental agencies subject the healthcare industry to intense regulatory scrutiny, including heightened civil and criminal enforcement efforts. These laws constrain the sales, marketing and other promotional activities of medical device manufacturers by limiting the kinds of financial arrangements Venus Concept may have with physicians and other potential purchasers of Venus Concept products. There exist numerous federal and state health care anti fraud laws, including the federal anti kickback statute which prohibits, among other things, persons from knowingly and willfully soliciting, receiving, offering or paying remuneration, directly or indirectly, in cash or in kind, to induce or reward either the referral of an individual for, or the purchase, order or recommendation of, Item or services for which payment may be made, in whole or in part, under federal healthcare programs. Violations may result in substantial civil penalties, including treble damages, and criminal penalties, including imprisonment, fines and exclusion from participation in federal health care programs. The Federal False Claims Act also contains whistleblower or qui tam provisions that allow private individuals to bring actions on behalf of the government alleging that the defendant has defrauded the government. Venus Concept products are not reimbursable by Medicare, Medicaid or other federal health care programs. As a result, the federal anti kickback statute and many federal false claims provisions do not apply to Venus Concept. However, Venus Concept may be subject to similar state anti kickback laws that apply regardless of the payor. In addition, various states have enacted laws modeled after the Federal False Claims Act, including qui tam or whistleblower provisions, and some of these laws apply to claims filed with commercial insurers. 41 HIPAA created federal criminal statutes that prohibit among other actions, knowingly and willfully executing, or attempting to execute, a scheme to defraud any healthcare benefit program, including private third party payors, knowingly and willfully embezzling or stealing from a healthcare benefit program, willfully obstructing a criminal investigation of a healthcare offense, and knowingly and willfully falsifying, concealing or covering up a material fact or making any materially false, fictitious or fraudulent statement in connection with the delivery of or payment for healthcare benefits, Item or services. Compliance with applicable United States and foreign laws and regulations, such as import and export requirements, anti corruption laws such as the FCPA and similar worldwide anti bribery laws, tax laws, foreign exchange controls and cash repatriation restrictions, data privacy requirements, environmental laws, labor laws and anti competition regulations, increases the costs of doing business in foreign jurisdictions. In some cases, compliance with the laws and regulations of 1 country could violate the laws and regulations of another country. Many foreign countries have similar laws relating to healthcare fraud and abuse. Foreign laws and regulations may vary greatly from country to country. Violations of these laws, or allegations of such violations, could result in fines, penalties, or prosecution and have a negative impact on our business, results of operations and reputation. There has been a recent trend of increased foreign, federal, and state regulation of payments and transfers of value provided to healthcare professionals, such as physicians, and entities. As noted, Venus Concept products are not reimbursed by Medicare, Medicaid, or federal health care programs, so the U.S. federal reporting laws (such as the federal Sunshine Act) do not apply to Venus Concept. However, certain foreign countries and U.S. states also mandate implementation of commercial compliance programs, impose restrictions on device manufacturer marketing practices and require tracking and reporting of gifts, compensation and other remuneration to healthcare professionals and entities. Violations of these laws, or allegations of such violations, could result in fines, penalties, or prosecution and have a negative impact on our business, results of operations and reputation. Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act In the United States, the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, as amended by the Health Care and Education Affordability Reconciliation Act, to which we refer collectively as the Affordable Care Act, or ACA, was enacted into law in 2010. Although most of the provisions of the ACA are now in effect, in December 2018 a federal court judge in the Northern District of Texas ruled in Texas v. Azar, or the Texas Case, that the ACA individual mandate is unconstitutional, and that the remainder of the ACA was inseverable from the individual mandate and therefore invalid. This case was appealed to the Fifth Circuit in January 2019. Because the Texas judge issued a stay of his ruling pending the appeal, the ACA continues to be in effect at this time. In the event the Fifth Circuit were to uphold the ruling of the district court, the case will likely be appealed to, and ultimately decided by, the U.S. Supreme Court. As a result of the passage of the ACA, an excise tax is imposed on the sale of certain medical devices by the U.S. manufacturer, producer, or importer of the device. This excise tax applies to sales of taxable medical devices beginning January 1, 2013 The excise tax equals 23% of the constructive sale price of the applicable medical device. As a U.S. based manufacturer and importer of taxable medical devices, are responsible for remitting to the federal government the excise tax on the sales of medical devices it manufactures in, or imports into, the U.S. Although this excise tax was in effect during the years 2013 2015, there was in effect a moratorium on the medical device excise tax through the end of 2019. The excise tax was repealed effective January 1, 2020. Foreign Government Regulation The regulatory review process for medical devices varies from country to country, and many countries also impose product standards, packaging requirements, environmental requirements, labeling requirements and import restrictions on devices. Each country has its own tariff regulations, duties, and tax requirements. Failure to comply with applicable foreign regulatory requirements may subject a company to fines, suspension or withdrawal of regulatory approvals, product recalls, seizure of products, operating restrictions, criminal prosecution, or other consequences. 42 European Economic Area In the European Economic Area (the EEA ), our devices are required to comply with the Essential Requirements set forth in Annex I to the Council Directive 93 42 EEC concerning medical devices, commonly referred to as the Medical Devices Directive. Compliance with these requirements entitles a manufacturer to affix the CE mark to its medical devices, without which they cannot be commercialized in the EEA. To demonstrate compliance with the Essential Requirements set forth in Annex I to the Medical Devices Directive and to obtain the right to affix the CE mark to medical devices, they must undergo a conformity assessment procedure, which varies according to the type of medical device and its classification. Except for low risk medical devices (Class I with no measuring function and which are not sterile), where the manufacturer can issue an EC Declaration of Conformity based on a self assessment of the conformity of its products with the Essential Requirements set forth in the Medical Devices Directive, a conformity assessment procedure requires the intervention of a notified body, which is an organization designated by the competent authorities of a EEA country to conduct conformity assessments. The notified body typically audits and examines products Technical File and the quality system for the manufacture, design and final inspection of our devices before issuing a CE Certificate of Conformity demonstrating compliance with the relevant Essential Requirements laid down in Annex I to the Medical Devices Directive. Following the issuance of this a CE Certificate of Conformity, a manufacture Venus Concept can draw up an EC Declaration of Conformity and affix the CE mark to the products covered by this CE Certificate of Conformity and the EC Declaration of Conformity. Venus Concept has successfully completed several notified body audits since Venus Concept original certification in December 2009. Following these audits, Venus Concept notified body issued ISO 134852016 Certificate and CE Certificates of Conformity allowing it to draw up an EC Declaration of Conformity and affix the CE mark to certain of Venus Concept devices since 2019 MDSAP Certificate. After the product has been CE marked and placed on the market in the EEA, a manufacturer must comply with a number of regulatory requirements relating to registration of medical devices in individual EEA countries; pricing and reimbursement of medical devices; establishment of post marketing surveillance and adverse event reporting procedures; field safety corrective actions, including product recalls and withdrawals; and interactions with physicians. In 2017, the European Parliament passed the Medical Devices Regulation, which repeals and replaces the EU Medical Devices Directive. Unlike directives, which must be implemented into the national laws of the EEA member States, the regulations would be directly applicable, i.e., without the need for adoption of EEA member State laws implementing them, in all EEA member States and are intended to eliminate current differences in the regulation of medical devices among EEA member States. The Medical Devices Regulation, among other things, is intended to establish a uniform, transparent, predictable and sustainable regulatory framework across the EEA for medical devices and in vitro diagnostic devices and ensure a high level of safety and health while supporting innovation. The Medical Devices Regulation will however only become applicable 3 years after publication. Once applicable, the new regulations will among other things strengthen the rules on placing devices on the market and reinforce surveillance once they are available; establish explicit provisions on manufacturers responsibilities for the follow up of the quality, performance and safety of devices placed on the market; improve the traceability of medical devices throughout the supply chain to the end user or patient through a unique identification number; set up a central database to provide patients, healthcare professionals and the public with comprehensive information on products available in the EU; and strengthen rules for the assessment of certain high risk devices, such as implants, which may have to undergo an additional check by experts before they are placed on the market. 43 To the extent that our products have already been certified under the existing regulatory framework, the MDR allows us to market them provided that the requirements of the transitional provisions are fulfilled. In particular, the certificate in question must still be valid. Under article 120(2) MDR, certificates issued by notified bodies before May 25, 2017 will remain valid until their indicated expiry dates. By contrast, certificates issued after May 25, 2017 will be void at the latest by May 27, 2024. Accordingly, before that date, we will need to obtain new CE Certificates of Conformity. Furthermore, the regulation introduces UDI, i.e. a bar code that must be placed on the label of the device or on its packaging, and manufacturers will be obligated to file adverse effects reports via the Eudamed platform in case there is an increase in the frequency or severity of incidents related to the medical device. Environmental Regulation We are subject to numerous foreign, federal, state, and local environmental, health and safety laws and regulations relating to, among other matters, safe working conditions, product stewardship and environmental protection, including those governing the generation, storage, handling, use, transportation and disposal of hazardous or potentially hazardous materials. Some of these laws and regulations require us to obtain licenses or permits to conduct our operations. Environmental laws and regulations are complex, change frequently and have tended to become more stringent over time. Although the costs to comply with applicable laws and regulations have not been material, we cannot predict the impact on our business of new or amended laws or regulations or any changes in the way existing and future laws and regulations are interpreted or enforced, nor can we ensure we will be able to obtain or maintain any required licenses or permits. Data Privacy and Security We are subject to diverse laws and regulations relating to data privacy and security, including, in the U.S., the HIPAA, and, in the EU and shortly in the EEA, GDPR. New global privacy rules are being enacted and existing 1s are being updated and strengthened. Complying with these numerous, complex and often changing regulations is expensive and difficult, and failure to comply with any privacy laws or data security laws or any security incident or breach involving the misappropriation, loss or other unauthorized use or disclosure of sensitive or confidential patient or consumer information, whether by us, 1 of our business associates or another third party, could have a material adverse effect on our business, reputation, financial condition and results of operations, including but not limited to material fines and penalties; damages; litigation; consent orders; and injunctive relief. The regulation of data privacy and security, and the protection of the confidentiality of personal information, is increasing and continues to evolve. For example, the GDPR came into effect in May 2018 reforming the European regime. The GDPR implements more stringent operational requirements than its predecessor legislation. For example, the GDPR requires us to make more detailed disclosures to data subjects, requires disclosure of the legal basis on which we can process personal data, makes it harder for us to obtain valid consent for processing, provides more robust rights for data subjects, introduces mandatory data breach notification through the EU, imposes additional obligations on us when contracting with service providers and requires us to adopt appropriate privacy governance including policies, procedures, training and data audit. If we do not comply with our obligations under the GDPR, we could be exposed to fines of up to the higher of 20,000,000 Euros or up to 4% of our total worldwide annual turnover in the event of a significant breach. In addition, we may be the subject of litigation and or adverse publicity, which could have material adverse effect on our reputation and business. We are also subject to evolving European laws on data export and electronic marketing. The rules on data export will apply when we transfer personal data to group companies or third parties outside of the EEA. For example, in 2015, the Court of Justice of the EU ruled that the U.S. EU Safe Harbor framework, 1 compliance method by which companies could transfer personal data regarding citizens of the EU to the U.S., was invalid and could no longer be relied upon. The U.S. EU Safe Harbor framework was replaced with the U.S. EU Privacy Shield framework, which is now under review and there is currently litigation challenging another EU mechanism for adequate data transfers, the standard contractual clauses. It is uncertain whether the Privacy Shield framework and or the standard contractual clauses will be similarly invalidated by the European courts. These changes may require us to find alternative bases for the compliant transfer of personal data from the EEA to the U.S. and we are monitoring developments in this area. The EU is also in the process of replacing the e Privacy Directive with a new set of rules taking the form of a regulation, which will be directly implemented in the laws of each European member state, without the need for further enactment. The current draft of the e Privacy Regulation retains strict opt in for electronic marketing and the penalties for contravention have significantly increased with fining powers to the same levels as the GDPR (i.e. the greater of 20,000,000 Euros or 4% of total global annual revenue). 44 Employees As of December 31, 2019 we had 525 employees, 155 based in the United States, 92 based in Canada, 75 based in Israel, and 203 in the rest of the world. Of the total number of full time employees, approximately 245 are direct sales representatives, including sales management and members of the physician engagement team. In addition, as of December 31, 2019, we engaged the services of approximately 50 contract technicians in 2019 as part of our VeroGrafters program. Corporate Information We were founded on November 22, 2002 as a Delaware corporation under the name Restoration Robotics, Inc. Our principal executive offices are located at 235 Yorkland Blvd., Suite 900, Toronto, Ontario M2J 4Y8 and our teleph1 number is (877) 848 8430. You may find on our website at https www.venusconcept.com en us electronic copies of our annual report on Form 10 K, quarterly reports on Form 10 Q, current reports on Form 8 K, and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Such filings are placed on our website as soon as reasonably possible after they are filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the SEC ). Our most recent charter for our audit, compensation, and nominating and corporate governance committees and our Code of Business Conduct and Ethics are available on our website as well. Any waiver of our Code of Business Conduct and Ethics may be made only by our board of directors. Any waiver of our Code of Business Conduct and Ethics for any of our directors or executive officers must be disclosed on a Current Report on Form 8 K within four business days, or such shorter period as may be required under applicable regulation. Information contained on, or that can be accessed through, our website is not incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10 K, and you should not consider information on our website to be part of this Annual Report on Form 10 K. We have included our website address as an inactive textual reference only. Available Information We file Annual Reports on Form 10 K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10 Q, Current Reports on Form 8 K and other information with the SEC. Our filings with the SEC are available free of charge on the SEC website at www.sec.gov and on our website under the Investors tab as soon as reasonably practicable after we electronically file such material with, or furnish it to, the SEC. Item 1A. Risk Factors. Our operations and financial results are subject to various risk and uncertainties, including those described below, any of which could adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition and prospects. In such an event, the market price of our Common Stock could decline, and you may lose all or part of your investment. Additional risks and uncertainties not presently known to us or that we currently deem immaterial may also adversely affect our business operations. You should carefully consider the risk described below and the other information in this Annual Report on Form 10 K, including our audited consolidated financial statements and the related notes thereto, and Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations. Risks Related to Our Business Following the Merger, we may be unable to integrate successfully the businesses of Restoration Robotics and Venus Concept Ltd. and realize the anticipated benefits of the Merger. The Merger, which closed on November 7, 2019, involved the combination of 2 companies which operated as independent companies. Following the Merger, we have been required to devote significant management attention and resources to integrating our business practices and operations. We may fail to realize some or all of the anticipated benefits of the Merger if the integration process takes longer than expected or is more costly than expected. Potential difficulties we may encounter in the integration process include the following the inability to successfully combine the businesses in a manner that permits us to achieve the anticipated benefits of the Merger, including cost savings from our cost reduction initiatives, in the time frame currently anticipated or at all; 45 complexities associated with managing the combined businesses; integrating personnel from the 2 companies; creating uniform standards, controls, procedures, policies and accounting and other information systems; difficulty or failure to transfer or obtain the licenses or permits required for post Merger operation; potential unknown liabilities and unforeseen increased expenses, delays or regulatory conditions associated with the Merger; and performance shortfalls at 1 or both of the 2 companies as a result of the diversion of management attention caused by completing the Merger and integrating the companies operations. Restoration Robotics and Venus Concept Ltd. have operated independently prior to the Merger. The integration process may also result in the diversion of management attention, the disruption or interruption of, or the loss of momentum in, each company ongoing businesses or inconsistencies in standards, controls, procedures and policies, any of which could adversely affect our ability to maintain relationships with customers, suppliers and employees or the ability to achieve the anticipated benefits of the Merger, or could reduce the earnings or otherwise adversely affect the business and financial results of the combined company. Our product sale strategy is focused primarily on a subscription based business model, and the success of this sales strategy depends on the continued adoption and use of our subscription based products and services. To address the financial barriers faced by physicians and aesthetic service providers globally, in our direct operations, we focus our product sale strategy on a subscription based business model. Our subscription based model includes an up front fee and a monthly payment schedule, typically over a period of 36 months, with approximately 40% of total contract payments collected in the first year. If economic circumstances are appropriate, we provide customers in good standing with the opportunity to upgrade to new agreements for the newest available or alternative technology we provide throughout the subscription period. Our success depends on growing market adoption by traditional and non traditional providers and use of our subscription based business model. Our subscription based model may not be adopted by customers and potential customers at the rate we anticipate. Our ability to increase the number of customers who purchase our products and services or participate in our subscription based programs and make our products a significant part of their practices, depends in part on the success of our direct sales and marketing programs. Before potential customers make a subscription based purchase, they may need to recoup the cost of products that they have already purchased from competitors, and therefore they may decide to delay participating in our subscription based programs, or decide not to participate at all. If we are unable to increase market adoption and use of our products and services through our subscription based model, the number of systems we sell may be lower than anticipated. 46 Our subscription based model exposes us to the credit risk of our customers over the life of the subscription agreement. In the event that our customers fail to make the monthly payments under their subscription agreements, our financial results may be adversely affected. For the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, approximately 67% and 75%, respectively, of our system revenues were derived from our subscription based model. Although the ARTAS System will not be available under our subscription based model, we expect that our subscription based business model to continue to represent the majority of our revenue for the foreseeable future. We collect an up front fee, combined with a monthly payment schedule typically over a period of 36 months, with approximately 40% of total contract payments collected in the first year. For accounting purposes, these arrangements are considered to be sales type finance leases, where the present value of all cash flows to be received under the subscription agreement is recognized as revenue upon shipment of the system to the customer. As part of our sales and marketing effort, we do not require our customers to undergo a credit check or register a lien or security interest under the Uniform Commercial Code or similar legislation, as is typically required with a third party equipment leasing financing. Instead, to ensure that each monthly product payment is made on time and that the customer systems are serviced in accordance with the terms of the warranty, every product requires a monthly activation code, which we provide to the customer upon receiving each monthly payment. If a customer does not timely pay a monthly installment, the customer will not receive an activation code and will be unable to use the system for any procedures. This process does not protect us from the economic impact of a customer failure to make its monthly payments and as an unsecured creditor, we are subject to a greater risk in the event of a customer default. We cannot provide any assurance that the financial position of customers purchasing its products and services under a subscription agreement will not change adversely before we receive all of the monthly installment payments due under the contract. In the event that there is a default by any of the customers to whom we have sold systems under the subscription based model, we may recognize bad debt expenses in our general and administrative expenses. If this bad debt expense is material, it could negatively affect our results of operations and cash flows. 1 of our large customers filed for bankruptcy protection in February 2019 and we recorded a provision for bad debts of $8.3 million against the receivable for this customer for the year ended December 31, 2018, and if we experience other customer defaults under our subscription agreements, our financial results may be adversely affected. In February 2019, 1 of our large customers filed for bankruptcy protection. Prior to the bankruptcy filing, we had entered into numerous subscription agreements between 2015 and 2017 with this customer. We recorded a provision for bad debts of $8.3 million against the receivable for this customer for the year ended December 31, 2018. In connection with the bankruptcy, the debtors filed an adversary action against Venus Concept Ltd. (and several others) seeking to avoid any security interest of Venus Concept Ltd., to recover 89 units that had been transferred back to Venus Concept Ltd., the return of approximately $150,000 paid to Venus Concept Ltd. within the 90 days before the bankruptcy filing and to disallow Venus Concept Ltd. asserted claim of approximately $5.9 million. Venus Concept Ltd. and the debtors entered into a settlement agreement, which was approved by the bankruptcy court on May 24, 2019, pursuant to which, among other things, a third party purchaser would buy and assume certain units from the debtors and pay a total of approximately $27 million to Venus Concept Ltd. over 25 months, debtors would release and waive any and all claims against us, including the preference claim, we would retain and have all rights to previously terminated units, and any units in possession of the debtors or that were subsequently discovered to be property of the debtor would be returned to us without further cost to us. Pursuant to the settlement agreement, Venus Concept Ltd. agreed to waive and release the debtors from all claims (other than those specifically carved out). We do not anticipate receiving any further distribution from this customer bankruptcy due to the releases provided for in the settlement agreement. Although we are currently receiving monthly payments under the new agreement with the purchaser of this customer assets, we cannot assure you that we will receive the full amount. Furthermore, we cannot assure you that we will not experience further customer defaults under our subscription agreements that could have a material adverse effect on our financial position. 47 We offer credit terms to some qualified customers. In the event that any of these customers default on the amounts payable to us, our financial results may be adversely affected. In addition to our subscription based model, we generally offer credit terms of 30 to 60 days to qualified customers and distributors. In the event that there is a default by any of the customers to whom we have provided credit terms, we may recognize bad debt expenses in our general and administrative expenses. If this bad debt expense is material, it could negatively affect our future results of operations and cash flows. Additionally, in the event of deterioration of general business conditions, we may be subject to increased risk of non payment of our accounts receivables. We may also be adversely affected by bankruptcies or other business failures of our customers, distributors, and potential customers. A significant delay in the collection of accounts receivables or a reduction of accounts receivables collected may impact our liquidity or result in bad debt expenses. Our competitors may emulate our subscription based model and erode our competitive advantage. Our subscription based model allows us to penetrate new markets and access a broader customer base because it offers an alternative to traditional equipment lease financing. For the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, approximately 67% and 75%, respectively, of systems revenues were derived from the subscription based model. However, to the extent we continue to be successful in growing the market adoption of our products through our subscription based model, competitors may seek to emulate this model. Although, we believe that our products compete effectively with the products offered by our competitors, our customers may be more willing to purchase the products of our competitors if they were offered through a subscription based model. If customers decide to use the products of its competitors instead of our systems, our financial performance will be adversely affected. Our recurring losses from operations and negative cash flows raise substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern. We have had recurring net operating losses and negative cash flows from operations, and until we generate revenue at a level to support our cost structure, we expect to continue to incur substantial operating losses and net cash outflows. As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, we had an accumulated deficit of $75.7 million and $35.1 million, respectively. Our recurring losses from operations and negative cash flows raise substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern, meaning that we may be unable to continue operations for the foreseeable future or realize assets and discharge liabilities in the ordinary course of operations. In order to continue our operations, we must achieve profitable operations and or obtain additional equity or debt financing. There can be no assurance that we will be successful in raising additional capital or that such capital, if available, will be on terms that are acceptable to us. If we are unable to raise sufficient additional capital, we may be compelled to reduce the scope of our operations and planned capital or research and development expenditures or sell certain assets, including intellectual property assets. The perception of our ability to continue as a going concern may make it more difficult for us to obtain financing for the continuation of our operations and could result in the loss of confidence by investors, suppliers and employees. Our consolidated financial statements do not include any adjustments that may result from the outcome of this uncertainty. 48 Business or economic disruptions or global health concerns could have an adverse effect our business, operating results or financial condition. Global business or economic disruptions could adversely affect our business. For example, in December 2019, an outbreak of a novel strain of coronavirus originated in Wuhan, China, and has since spread to a number of other countries, including the United States. To date, this outbreak has already resulted in extended shutdowns of certain businesses in China, Europe, the United States and other countries. Global health concerns, such as the coronavirus, could also result in social, economic, and labor instability in the countries in which we or the third parties with whom we engage operate. We cannot presently predict the scope and severity or duration of any potential business shutdowns or disruptions, but if we or any of the third parties with whom we engage, including our suppliers, manufacturers, customers, regulators and other third parties with whom we conduct business, experience shutdowns or other business disruptions, our ability to conduct our business in the manner presently planned could be materially and negatively affected. Disruptions to our business could include restrictions on the ability of our sales and marketing personnel and distributors to travel and sell our systems, disruptions of our global supply chain, reduced demand and or suspension of operations by our customers which could impact their ability to make monthly payments, or deferral of aesthetic or hair restoration procedures in impacted areas. In addition, the outbreak of contagious diseases or the fear of such an outbreak could adversely affect the economies and financial markets of many countries, resulting in an economic downturn that could affect the demand for our systems. Any of these events could negatively impact our business, operating results or financial condition. Venus Concept loan and security agreements contain restrictions that limit its flexibility in operating its business. On October 11, 2016, Venus Concept Ltd. entered into a credit agreement as a guarantor with Madryn Health Partners, LP, as administrative agent, and certain of its affiliates as lenders, or collectively, Madryn, as amended, or the Madryn Credit Agreement, pursuant to which Madryn agreed to make certain loans to certain of Venus Concept subsidiaries, or the Subsidiary Obligors. On November 7, 2019, in connection with the Merger, we joined the Madryn Credit Agreement as a guarantor pursuant to that certain Tenth Amendment to Credit Agreement, Consent and Joinder Agreement. The Madryn Credit Agreement is comprised of four tranches of debt aggregating $70.0 million. As at December 31, 2019, the Subsidiary Obligors had borrowed $60.0 million under the term A 1 and A 2 and B tranches of the Madryn Credit Agreement. Term C borrowings of $10.0 million were undrawn and are no longer available. Borrowings under the Madryn Credit Agreement are secured by substantially all of our assets and the assets of the Subsidiary Obligors. The outstanding principal amount of the loans and all accrued and unpaid interest are due and payable in full on September 30, 2022 The Madryn Credit Agreement also contains various covenants that limit our ability and the ability of our subsidiaries to engage in specified types of transactions. Subject to limited exceptions, these covenants limit our ability, without Madryn consent, to, among other things sell, lease, transfer, exclusively license or dispose of our assets; create, incur, assume or permit to exist additional indebtedness or liens, which may limit our ability to raise additional capital; make restricted payments, including paying dividends on, repurchasing or making distributions with respect to our capital stock; pay any cash dividend or make any other cash distribution or payment in respect of our capital stock; make specified investments (including loans and advances); make changes to certain key personnel including our President and Chief Executive Officer; merge, consolidate or liquidate; and enter into certain transactions with affiliates. 49 In addition, the Madryn Credit Agreement contains certain covenants that require us together with our subsidiaries to achieve certain minimum revenue and liquidity thresholds. The minimum revenue and liquidity covenants require that we and our subsidiaries, on a consolidated basis, achieve (i) minimum reported revenue targets for any four consecutive fiscal quarter period of an amount equal to the greater of (A) $100.0 million and (B) 1 hundred and fifty percent (150%) of the aggregate outstanding amount of the loans as of the last day of such four consecutive fiscal quarter period, (ii) minimum levels of cash held in deposit accounts controlled by Madryn to be no less than $20 million and (iii) minimum levels of cash held in all deposit accounts, plus availability under the CNB Credit Facility (as defined below), to be no less than $5.0 million. Prior to the Merger, Venus Concept Ltd. had failed to satisfy minimum liquidity covenant and failed to timely pay an interest payment, which non compliance and default was waived. If we together with our subsidiaries fail to comply with these covenants in the future, such failure will result in a default and enable Madryn to require us and the Subsidiary Obligors to repay all outstanding principal amounts and accrued interest. In the event of a default, if we and the Subsidiary Obligors are unable to repay all outstanding amounts, Madryn may foreclose on the collateral granted to it to collateralize the indebtedness, which will significantly affect our ability to operate our business. If all or any portion of the loans under the Madryn Credit Agreement are prepaid then a prepayment premium must be paid equal to (i) 6.50% if prepaid after August 31, 2019 but on or prior to August 31, 2020; (ii) 5.00% if prepaid after August 31, 2020 but on or prior to February 28, 2021; (iii) 4.00% if prepaid after February 28, 2021 but on or prior to August 31, 2021; (iv) 300% percent if prepaid after August 31, 2021 but on or prior to February 28, 2022; and (v) 200% if prepaid after February 28, 2022 On August 29, 2018, Venus Concept Ltd. entered into an Amended and Restated Loan Agreement as a guarantor with City National Bank of Florida, or CNB, as amended, or the CNB Credit Facility, pursuant to which CNB agreed to make certain loans and other financial accommodations to the Subsidiary Obligors. In connection with the CNB Credit Facility, Venus Concept Ltd. also entered into a Guaranty Agreement with CNB dated as of August 29, 2018, or the CNB Guaranty, pursuant to which Venus Concept Ltd. agreed to guaranty the obligations of its subsidiaries under the CNB Credit Facility. On March 20, 2020, we entered into a Second Amended and Restated Loan Agreement as a borrower with CNB, as amended, pursuant to which CNB agreed to make certain loans and other financial accommodations to us and certain of our subsidiaries. In connection with the CNB Credit Facility, we also entered into (i) a Second Amended and Restated Guaranty of Payment and Performance with CNB dated as of March 20, 2020, or the CNB Guaranty, pursuant to which we agreed to guaranty the obligations under the CNB Credit Facility and (ii) a Security Agreement with CNB dated as of March 20, 2020, or the CNB Security Agreement, pursuant to which we agreed to grant CNB a security interest, in substantially all of its assets, to secure the obligations under the CNB Credit Facility. Borrowings under the CNB Credit Facility are secured by substantially all of the assets of Venus Concept Inc. and the Subsidiary Obligors and the CNB Guaranty. As of December 31, 2019, the CNB Credit Facility provided for a revolving loan commitment of $10.0 million and $7.8 million was drawn thereunder. The CNB Credit Facility contains various covenants that limit us and our subsidiaries ability to engage in specified types of transactions. Subject to limited exceptions, these covenants limit our ability, without CNB consent, to, among other things, sell, lease, transfer, exclusively license or dispose of our assets, incur, create or permit to exist additional indebtedness, or liens, to make dividends and certain other restricted payments, and to make certain changes to its management and or ownership structure. In addition, the CNB Credit Facility contains certain covenants that require the Subsidiary Obligors to achieve certain minimum account balances, or a minimum debt service coverage ratio and a maximum total liability to tangible net worth ratio. If the Subsidiary Obligors fail to comply with these covenants, it will result in a default and require us and the Subsidiary Obligors to repay all outstanding principal amounts and accrued interest. Prior to the Merger, Venus Concept Ltd. was not in compliance with the minimum debt service coverage ratio of its credit facility with CNB, which non compliance was waived. On October 30, 2019, Venus Concept Ltd. and CNB executed a Third Amendment and Waiver to Amended and Restated Loan Agreement which, among other things, revised certain of the financial covenants and waived compliance with the debt service coverage ratio covenant for the fiscal quarter ending September 30, 2019. 50 In the event of a default, and if we and the Subsidiary Obligors are unable to repay all outstanding amounts, CNB may foreclose on the collateral granted to it to collateralize the indebtedness, which includes the enforcement of the CNB Guaranty, which will significantly affect our ability to operate our business. The occurrence of any event of default under the CNB Credit Facility would trigger an event of default under the Madryn Credit Agreement. Additionally, the occurrence of any event of default under the Madryn Credit Agreement would trigger an event of default under the CNB Credit Facility. We will require additional financing to achieve our goals, and a failure to obtain this necessary capital when needed on acceptable terms, or at all, could force us to delay, limit, reduce or terminate our product development, commercialization and other operations or efforts. Since our inception, we have invested a significant portion of our efforts and financial resources in research and development and sales and marketing activities. Research and development, clinical trials, product engineering, ongoing product upgrades and other enhancements and seeking regulatory clearances and approvals to market future products will require substantial funds to complete. As of December 31, 2019, we had capital resources consisting of cash and cash equivalents of approximately $15.7 million. We believe that we will continue to expend substantial resources for the foreseeable future in connection with the ongoing commercializing of our systems, increasing our sales and marketing efforts, and continuing research and development and product enhancements activities. We believe our existing cash and cash equivalents and cash expected to be generated from the sale of our systems and other products and services will not be enough for us to fund our planned operations for the next twelve months. Therefore, we will need additional capital to fund our future operations. In addition, our operating plans may change as a result of many factors some of which may be unknown to us, and we may need to seek additional funds so1r than planned, through public or private equity or debt financings or other sources, such as strategic collaborations. Such financing may result in dilution to stockholders, the issuance of securities may have rights, preferences, or privileges senior to those of holders of our common stock, the imposition of more burdensome debt covenants and repayment obligations, the licensing of rights to our technology or other restrictions that may affect our business. In addition, we may seek additional capital if favorable market conditions or given other strategic considerations even if we believe we have sufficient capital to fund our current or future operating plans. Additional funds may not be available when we need them, on terms that are acceptable to us, or at all. If adequate funds are not available to us on a timely basis, we may be required to delay or curtail our efforts to develop system product enhancements or new products, including any clinical trials that may be required to market such enhancements; delay or curtail our plans to increase and expand our sales and marketing efforts; or delay or curtail our plans to enhance our customer support and marketing activities. We are restricted by covenants in the Madryn Credit Agreement and the CNB Credit Facility. These covenants restrict, among other things, our ability to incur additional indebtedness, which may limit our ability to obtain additional debt financing. In addition, the Madryn Credit Agreement contains certain minimum liquidity and minimum revenue covenants, which, if we fail to maintain or achieve, will result in a default under the agreement and the requirement for us to repay all outstanding principal amounts and accrued interest repay all amounts outstanding. We will need to continue to incur significant expenses to grow our business, which could negatively affect our future profitability. In order to grow our business and increase revenues, we will need to introduce and commercialize new products, grow our sales and marketing force, implement new software systems, as well as identify and penetrate new markets. Such endeavors have in the past increased, and may continue in the future, to increase our expenses, including sales and marketing, and research and development. We will have to continue to increase our revenues while effectively managing our expenses in order to achieve profitability and to sustain it. Our failure to control expenses could make it difficult to achieve profitability or to sustain profitability in the future. Moreover, we cannot assure you that our expenditures will result in the successful development and introduction of new products in a cost effective and timely manner or that any such new products will achieve market acceptance and generate revenues for our business. 51 We may not be able to correctly estimate or control our future operating expenses, which could lead to cash shortfalls. Our operating expenses may fluctuate significantly in the future because of a variety of factors, many of which are outside of our control. These factors include the cost of growing our ongoing commercialization and sales and marketing activities; the costs of manufacturing and maintaining enough inventories of our systems to meet anticipated demand and inventory write offs related to obsolete products or comp1nts; the costs of enhancing the existing functionality and development of new functionalities for our systems; the costs of preparing, filing, prosecuting, defending, and enforcing patent claims and other patent related costs, including litigation costs and the results of such litigation; the variability of ARTAS procedures being performed between periods if particular high volume practiti1rs perform a smaller number of procedures in each period as a result of the concentration of procedures performed by certain practiti1rs; any product liability or other lawsuits and the costs associated with defending them or the results of such lawsuits; the costs associated with conducting business and maintaining subsidiaries and other entities in foreign jurisdictions; customers in jurisdictions where our systems are not approved delaying their purchase, and not purchasing our systems, until they are approved or cleared for use in their market; the costs to attract and retain personnel with the skills required for effective operations; costs associated with integration of the Merger; and the costs associated with being a public company. Our budgeted expense levels are based in part on our expectations concerning future revenue from systems sales, products sales and servicing and procedure based fees. We may be unable to reduce our expenditures in a timely manner to compensate for any unexpected shortfalls in revenue. Accordingly, a significant shortfall in market acceptance or demand for our systems and procedures could have a material adverse impact on our business and financial condition. Because we incur a substantial portion of our expenses in currencies other than the U.S. dollar, our financial condition and results of operations may be adversely affected by currency fluctuations and inflation. In the year ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, 47% and 49%, respectively, of our global revenues were denominated in U.S. dollars and our reporting currency was the U.S. dollar. We pay a meaningful portion of our expenses in NIS, CAD, and other foreign currencies. Expenses in NIS and CAD accounted for 21% and 14%, respectively, of our expenses for the year ended December 31, 2019, and 32% and 14%, respectively, of our expenses for the year ended December 31, 2018. Salaries paid to our employees, general and administrative expenses and general sales and related expenses are paid in many different currencies. As a result, we are exposed to the currency fluctuation risks relating to the denomination of its future revenues in U.S. dollars. More specifically, if the U.S. dollar devaluates against the CAD or the NIS, our CAD and NIS denominated expenses will be greater than anticipated when reported in U.S. dollars. Inflation in Israel compounds the adverse impact of such devaluation by further increasing the amount of our Israeli expenses. Israeli inflation may also in the future outweigh the positive effect of any appreciation of the U.S. dollar relative to the CAD and the NIS, if, and to the extent that, it outpaces such appreciation or precedes such appreciation. We generally do not engage in currency hedging to protect the Company from fluctuations in the exchange rates of the CAD, NIS and other foreign currencies in relation to the U.S. dollar (and or from inflation of such foreign currencies), we may be exposed to material adverse effects from such movements. We cannot predict any future trends in the rate of inflation in Israel or the rate of devaluation (if any) of the U.S. dollar or any other currency against the NIS or CAD. 52 Downturns in the economy or economic uncertainty may reduce patient and customer demand for our systems and services, which could adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operations. Our results of operations could be adversely affected by general conditions in the global economy and in the global financial markets. Furthermore, the aesthetic industry in which we operate is particularly vulnerable to unfavorable economic trends. Treatments using our systems involves elective procedures, the cost of which must be borne by patients, and is not reimbursable through government or private health insurance. Economic uncertainty may reduce patient demand for the procedures performed using our systems; if there is not sufficient patient demand for the procedures for which our systems are used, practiti1r demand for these systems could drop, negatively impacting operating results. The decision to undergo a procedure using our systems is driven by consumer demand. In times of economic uncertainty or recession, individuals generally reduce the amount of m1y that they spend on discretionary Item, including aesthetic procedures. If our customers patients face economic hardships, our business would be negatively impacted, and our financial performance would be materially harmed in the event that any of the above factors discourage patients from seeking the procedures for which our systems are used. A weak or declining economy could also strain our manufacturers or suppliers, possibly resulting in supply disruption, or cause our customers to delay or stop making payments for our systems or services. As a result of the COVID 19 pandemic and the economic turmoil that has resulted, we expect that some of our customers may experience difficulty in making timely payments or payments at all under their subscription agreements. Any of the foregoing could harm our business and we cannot anticipate all of the ways in which the economic climate and financial market conditions, including the effect of the COVID 19 pandemic, could adversely impact our business. The impact of economic uncertainty on our industry may vary from region to region. It is difficult to forecast our future performance and our financial results may fluctuate unpredictably. The rapid evolution of the markets for medical technologies and aesthetic products make it difficult for us to predict our future performance. Several factors, many of which are outside of our control, may contribute to fluctuations in our financial results, such as variations in market demand for our systems and services from quarter to quarter; delays in purchasing decisions in jurisdictions where our systems are not approved, and decisions not to purchase our systems until they are approved or cleared for use in a particular market; the inability of physicians to obtain the necessary financing to purchase the ARTAS iX System or our other systems, which may not be available under our subscription based model; customers operating under our subscription based program may slow down or stop paying their monthly contractual obligations; performance of new functionalities and system updates, such as the robotic implantation functionality in the ARTAS iX System; performance of our international distributors or local partners; positive or negative media coverage of our systems, positive or negative patient experiences, the procedures or products of our competitors, or our industry generally; our ability to maintain our current, or obtain further, regulatory clearances, approvals or CE Certificates of Conformity; delays in, or failure of, product and comp1nt deliveries by our third party manufacturers or suppliers; seasonal or other variations in patient demand for aesthetic procedures; introduction of new medical aesthetic procedures or products and services that compete with our products and services; changes in accounting rules that may cause restatement of our consolidated financial statements or have other adverse effects; and adverse changes in the economy that reduce patient demand for elective aesthetic procedures. 53 The historic seasonality of our industry and other factors may contribute to fluctuations in our operating results and stock price and make it difficult to compare our results of operations to prior periods and predict future financial results. We believe that our business is affected by seasonal and other trends. Specifically, we believe our business is affected by seasonal trends during the summer months in the U.S. and Europe due to vacations taken by physician customers and their patients, as well as fluctuations in operating results due to uneven timing of distributor and corporate account orders and marketing into new geographic regions. Historically, we have sold a relatively small number of ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems at a relatively high price, with each sale of an ARTAS System or ARTAS iX System typically involving a significant amount of time, which may also contribute to fluctuations in operating results in the future. In addition, there is typically a substantial increase in sales in the last 2 months of the year. It is difficult for us to evaluate the degree to which these factors may make our revenue unpredictable in the future, and these seasonal and other trends may continue to lead to fluctuations in quarterly operating results. As a result of these factors, future fluctuations in quarterly results could cause our revenue and cash flows to be below analyst and investor expectations, which could cause decline in our stock price. Due to future fluctuations in revenue and costs, as well as other potential fluctuations, you should not rely upon our operating results in any period as an indication of future performance. Our success depends on growing physician adoption and use of our systems and adoption by physicians in non traditional specialty areas. Aesthetic and hair restoration procedures are performed primarily by physicians who practice dermatology or plastic surgery. Our success depends on the growth of aesthetic and hair restoration procedures performed by physicians other than dermatologists and plastic surgeons, and aesthetic procedures performed by general and family practiti1rs and aesthetic medical spas. Our ability to increase the number of physicians willing to make a significant capital expenditure to purchase our systems or participate in our subscription program and make them a significant part of their practices, depends on the success of our sales and marketing programs. We must be able to demonstrate that the cost of our systems and the revenue that a physician can derive from performing procedures are compelling when compared to the costs and revenue associated with alternative aesthetic treatments the physician can offer and persuade physicians to purchase our systems instead of those of our competitors, many of whom already have existing relationships with our target physicians. In addition, we believe our marketing programs, including clinical and practice development support, will be critical to increasing utilization and awareness of our systems, particularly the ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems, but these programs require physician commitment and involvement to succeed. We must also be successful in persuading physicians in non traditional specialties to introduce procedures performed with our systems into their practices. If we are unable to increase adoption and use of its systems by physicians in other non traditional specialties, our growth and prospects may be adversely affected. Our success depends in part upon patient satisfaction with the effectiveness of our hair restoration systems. In order to generate repeat and referral business, patients must be satisfied with the effectiveness of a hair restoration procedure using 1 of our hair restoration systems. If the ARTAS System, ARTAS iX System or NeoGraft system procedure is not d1 correctly, and or the patient suffers from complications and other adverse effects, the patient may not be satisfied with the benefits of our hair restoration systems. Furthermore, if the transplanted hair follicles do not grow or survive the transplant, the patient will likely not view the procedure as having a satisfactory outcome. If patients are not satisfied with the aesthetic benefits of a hair restoration procedure using 1 of our systems or feel that it is too expensive for the results obtained, our reputation and future sales will suffer. If there is not sufficient patient demand for our procedures, our financial results and future prospects will be negatively impacted. Our procedures are elective aesthetic procedures, the cost of which must be borne by the patient and is not covered by or reimbursable through government or private health insurance. The decision to undergo 1 of our procedures is thus driven by patient demand, which may be influenced by a number of factors, such as the success of our sales and marketing programs; the extent to which our physician customers recommend our procedures to their patients; the extent to which our procedures satisfy patient expectations; 54 our ability to properly train our physician customers in the use of our systems so that their patients do not experience excessive discomfort during treatment or adverse side effects; the cost, safety, and effectiveness of our systems versus other aesthetic treatments; consumer sentiment about the benefits and risks of aesthetic procedures generally and our systems in particular; the success of any direct to consumer marketing efforts we may initiate; and general consumer confidence, which may be impacted by economic and political conditions outside of our control. Our financial performance will be negatively impacted in the event we cannot generate significant patient demand for procedures performed with our systems. We compete against companies that offer alternative solutions to our systems, or have greater resources, a larger installed base of customers and broader product offerings than we have. If we are not able to effectively compete with these companies and alternative solutions, our business may not continue to grow. The medical technology and aesthetic product markets are highly competitive and dynamic and are characterized by rapid and substantial technological development and product innovation. Demand for our systems is impacted by the products and procedures offered by our competitors. Certain of our systems also compete against conventional non energy based treatments, such as Botox and collagen injections, chemical peels, and microdermabrasion. In the U.S., we compete against companies that have developed minimally invasive and non invasive medical aesthetic procedures. Outside of the U.S., likely due to less stringent regulatory requirements, there are more aesthetic products and procedures available in international markets than are cleared for use in the U.S. Sometimes, there are also fewer limitations on the claims our competitors in international markets can make about the effectiveness of their products and the manner in which they can market them. As a result, we may face a greater number of competitors in markets outside of the U.S. We also compete generally with medical technology and aesthetic companies, including those offering products and products unrelated to skin treatment. Recently, there has been consolidation in the aesthetic industry leading to companies combining their resources, which increases competition and could result in increased downward pressure on our system prices. These consolidations have created combined entities with greater financial resources, deeper sales channels and greater pricing flexibility than ours. Rumored or actual consolidation of our competitors could cause uncertainty and disruption to our business. In the surgical hair restoration market, we consider our direct competition to be strip surgeries and FUE procedures using hand held devices. Many of our surgical device and equipment competitors have greater capital resources, sales and marketing operations and service infrastructures than we do, as well as longer commercial histories and more extensive relationships with physicians. Strip surgery and some manual FUE procedures have a greater penetration into the hair restoration market. We face resistance from some established hair restoration practices in converting to ARTAS procedures due to workflow and staffing changes required, even though we believe that staffing requirements are reduced with the adoption of ARTAS procedures. Our indirect competition in the hair restoration market also includes non surgical treatments for hair loss, such as prescription therapeutics, including Propecia, and non prescription remedies, such as wigs, hair pieces and spray on applications. Many of our competitors are larger, more experienced companies that have substantially greater resources and brand recognition than we do. Some of these companies have a broad range of product offerings, large direct sales forces and long term customer relationships with the physicians we target, which could make our market penetration efforts more difficult. Competition in the medical technology and aesthetic hair restoration markets could result in price cutting, reduced profit margins, and limited market share, any of which would harm our business, financial condition and results of operations. 55 The success of our subscription based model depends on customer loyalty. The success of our subscription based model depends on customer loyalty. In order to generate recurring revenues and for customers to continue upgrading their technologies to our newest technologies, customers must believe that our systems and service offerings are superior to those of its competitors and enhance the physician practices and business from a professional, financial and reputational vantage point. To the extent we fail to maintain ongoing relationships with our customers or our systems and service offerings do not satisfy its customers needs, including their financial goals, our business will be adversely affected. We may not be able to establish or strengthen our brand. We believe that establishing and strengthening our brands is critical to achieving widespread acceptance of our systems, particularly because of the highly competitive nature of the market for aesthetic treatments and procedures. Promoting and positioning our brand will depend largely on the success of our marketing efforts and our ability to provide physicians with a reliable systems and services. Given the established nature of our competitors, it is likely that our future marketing efforts will require us to incur significant additional expenses. These brand promotion activities may not yield increased sales and, even if they do, any sales increases may not offset the expenses we incur to promote our brand. If we fail to successfully promote and maintain our brand, or if we incur substantial expenses in an unsuccessful attempt to promote and maintain our brand, systems may not achieve adequate acceptance by physicians, which would adversely affect our business, results of operations and financial condition. The aesthetic equipment market is characterized by rapid innovation. To compete effectively, we must develop and or acquire new products and services, seek regulatory clearance and maintain regulatory compliance, market new products successfully, and identify new markets for our technology. The aesthetic energy based treatment equipment and hair restoration markets are subject to continuous technological development and product innovation. If we do not continue to innovate and develop new products, services and applications, our competitive position will likely deteriorate as other companies successfully design and commercialize new products, applications and services or enhancements to current products. To continue to grow in the future, we must continue to develop and or acquire new and innovative aesthetic and medical products, services and applications, identify new markets, and successfully launch any newly developed or acquired product offerings. To successfully expand our product and service offerings, we must, among other things develop or otherwise acquire new products that either add to, or significantly improve, our current product offerings; obtain regulatory clearance for and adhere to regulatory requirements relating to new products; convince existing and prospective customers that our product offerings are an attractive revenue generating addition to their practice; sell our product offerings to a broad customer base; identify new markets and alternative applications for our technology; protect existing and future products with defensible intellectual property; and satisfy and maintain all regulatory requirements for commercialization. Historically, product introductions have been a significant comp1nt of our financial performance. To be successful in the medical aesthetics industry, we believe we need to continue to innovate. Our business strategy is based, in part, on our expectation that we will continue to increase or enhance our product offerings. We need to continue to devote substantial research and development resources to introduce new products, which can be costly and time consuming to our organization. We also believe that, to increase revenue from sales of new products, we need to continue to develop our clinical support, further expand and nurture relationships with industry thought leaders, and increase market awareness of the benefits of our new products. However, even with a significant investment in research and development, we may be unable to continue to develop, acquire or effectively launch and market new products and technologies regularly, or at all. If we fail to successfully commercialize new products or enhancements, our business may be harmed. 56 While we attempt to protect our products through patents and other intellectual property, there are few barriers to entry that would prevent new entrants or existing competitors from developing products that compete directly with our systems. We expect that any competitive advantage we may enjoy from current and future innovations may diminish over time as certain of our intellectual property expires and as companies use or create intellectual property and related products that compete with our innovations. Consequently, we believe that we will have to continuously innovate and improve our products and technology to compete successfully. If we are unable to innovate successfully, our products could become obsolete and our revenue could decline as our customers and prospects purchase competing products. We may be unsuccessful in penetrating certain international markets through majority owned subsidiary arrangements with local partners. We have established several majority owned subsidiaries in international markets as part of our international growth strategy. Although we select our local partners based on demonstrated experience and expertise in the local aesthetic market, the nature of our arrangements with local partners requires us to share control with unaffiliated third parties. We may not be able to identify local partners with the requisite experience and expertise in their local markets or successfully negotiate an agreement with such local partners. Moreover, the ability of these subsidiaries to execute their business plans depends on the local partners to fulfill their obligations. If local partners fail to fulfill their obligations to our satisfaction, our financial results could be adversely affected or we may be required to increase our level of commitment to the subsidiary and dedicate additional resources. Although our agreements with our local partners generally allow us control over business operations, differences in views could also result in delayed execution of the subsidiary business plan. If these differences cause a subsidiary to deviate from our business plans, our results of operations could be adversely affected. We may be unsuccessful in expanding and managing our direct sales and marketing forces effectively. We rely on our own direct sales force and in house marketing organization to sell our systems and services in North America and in international markets, either through wholly owned or majority owned subsidiaries. In order to meet our anticipated sales objectives, we expect to continue to grow our global sales and marketing organization over the next several years. There are significant risks involved in building and managing a sales and marketing organization, including risks related to our ability to hire qualified individuals as needed; generate sufficient leads within our target customer group for our sales force; provide adequate training for the effective sale and marketing of our systems and services; retain and motivate our direct sales and marketing professionals; effectively oversee geographically dispersed sales and marketing teams; and work successfully with local partners of our majority owned subsidiaries. Our failure to adequately address these risks could have a material adverse effect on our ability to increase sales and use of our systems and services, which would cause our revenues to be lower than expected and harm our results of operations. In addition, as we transition to direct sales in certain international markets, the transition may result in a slow down of growth or even a reduction in sales in those markets during the transition process as our distributors anticipate losing the ability to sell our systems. We depend on third party distributors to market and sell our systems in certain markets. In addition to a direct sales and marketing forces, we currently depend on third party distributors to sell, market, and service our systems in certain markets outside of North America and to train our customers in these markets. For the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, we generated 6% and 5%, respectively, of our systems revenues from sales made through third party distributors. Our agreements with third party distributors generally set forth minimum quarterly purchase commitments required for each distributor and provide the distributor the exclusive right to distribute its systems within a designated territory. As we continue to expand into new markets outside of North America, we may need to engage additional third party distributors which is subject to a number of risks, including the lack of day to day control over the activities of third party distributors; third party distributors may not commit the necessary resources to market, sell, train, support and service our systems to the level of our expectations; 57 third party distributors may emphasize the sale of third party products over our products; third party distributors may not be as selective as we would be in choosing customers to purchase our systems or as effective in training physicians in marketing and patient selection; third party distributors may violate applicable laws and regulations, which may expose us to potential liability or limit our ability to sell products in certain markets third party distributors may terminate their arrangements with us on limited, or no, notice or may change the terms of these arrangements in a manner unfavorable to us; and disagreements with our distributors that could require or result in costly and time consuming litigation or arbitration, which we could be required to conduct in jurisdictions in which we are not familiar with the governing law. In addition, 1 of our strategic initiatives is to directly provide marketing personnel and resources for third party distributors. If we fail to establish and maintain satisfactory relationships with our third party distributors, our revenue and market share may not grow as anticipated, and we could be subject to unexpected costs which would harm our results of operations and financial condition. Our expanded use of social media platforms presents new risks and challenges, which, if not managed properly, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We have implemented a robust public relations outreach strategy that incorporates both digital media and top national media in the fashion and beauty industries. In addition, as part of our practice enhancing services, we provide customers with digital marketing services, including a social media strategy, to support the growth of their practices. Negative posts or comments about us or any of our brands on any social ne2rking website could seriously damage our reputation. In addition, the inappropriate use of certain media vehicles could cause brand damage or information leakage or could lead to legal implications from the improper collection and or dissemination of personally identifiable information. Economic and other risks associated with international sales and operations could adversely affect Venus Concept business. Sales in markets outside of the U.S. accounted for approximately 57% of our revenue for the year ended December 31, 2019 and 55% of our revenue for the year ended December 31, 2018. As part of our growth strategy, we intend to expand the percentage of our business that comes from sales in markets outside of North America through increased penetration in countries where we currently market and sell our systems through our third party distributor ne2rk and local partners, combined with expansion into new international markets. The majority of our research and development activities and the manufacture of our systems is located outside of the U.S. As a result of our international business, we are subject to a number of risks, including difficulties in staffing and managing our international operations, including the sales offices of our subsidiaries; increased competition as a result of more products and procedures receiving regulatory approval or otherwise free to market in international markets; longer accounts receivable payment cycles and difficulties in collecting accounts receivable; reduced or varied protection for intellectual property rights in some countries; import and export restrictions, trade regulations, and non U.S. tax laws; fluctuations in currency exchange rates; foreign certification and regulatory clearance or approval requirements; difficulties in developing effective marketing campaigns in unfamiliar foreign countries; customs clearance and shipping delays; political, social, and economic instability abroad, terrorist attacks, and security concerns in general and uncertainties related to the coronavirus; preference for locally manufactured products; potentially adverse tax consequences, including the complexities of foreign value added tax systems, tax inefficiencies related to our corporate structure, and restrictions on the repatriation of earnings; the burdens of complying with a wide variety of foreign laws and different legal standards; and increased financial accounting and reporting burdens and complexities. If 1 or more of these risks were realized, it could require us to dedicate significant financial and management resources, and our results of operations and financial condition could be adversely affected. 58 The success of our hair restoration business depends upon the success of the ARTAS System and ARTAS iX System, which has a limited commercial history. If we are unsuccessful in developing the market for robotic hair restoration or the market acceptance for the ARTAS System and ARTAS iX System fails to grow significantly, our business and future prospects will be negatively impacted. We commenced commercial sales of the ARTAS System for hair follicle dissection in the U.S. in 2011 Our success in the hair restoration market depends on the acceptance among physicians and patients of the ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems as the preferred system for performing hair restoration surgery. Acceptance of the ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems by physicians is significantly dependent on our ability to convince physicians of the benefits of the ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems to their practices and, accordingly, develop the market for robotic assisted hair restoration surgery. Acceptance of the ARTAS procedure by patients is equally important as patient demand will influence physicians to offer the ARTAS procedure, and the degree of market acceptance of the ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems by physicians and patients is unproven. We believe that market acceptance of the ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems will depend on many factors, including the perceived advantages or disadvantages of the ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems compared to other hair restoration products and treatments; the safety and efficacy of the ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems relative to other hair restoration products and treatments; the price of the ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems relative to other hair restoration products and treatments; our success in expanding and integrating our hair restoration sales and marketing organization; the effectiveness of our marketing, advertising, and commercialization initiatives; our success in adding new functionalities to the ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems and enhancing existing functions; and our ability to obtain regulatory clearance to market the ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems for additional treatment indications in the U.S. Further, the ARTAS iX System, which was launched in July 2018, includes our recently cleared robotic implantation functionality. As this functionality is relatively new, it is possible that it could include defaults, bugs or present other technical issues which could prompt potential physician customers to delay their purchase of the ARTAS iX System or could prompt physicians that have purchased the ARTAS iX System to either return or not utilize the system. We cannot assure you that the ARTAS System or ARTAS iX System will achieve broad market acceptance among physicians and patients. Because we expect to derive a significant portion of our revenue in the hair restoration market from ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems sales, servicing and procedure based fees, any failure of this product to satisfy physician or patient demand or to achieve meaningful market acceptance will harm our business and future prospects. Our inability to effectively compete with competitive hair restoration treatments or procedures may prevent us from achieving significant market penetration in the hair restoration market or improving our operating results. We designed the ARTAS System to assist physicians in performing follicular unit extraction surgery. Demand for the ARTAS Systems and ARTAS procedures could be limited by other products and technologies. Competition to address hair loss comes from various sources, including therapeutic options including Rogaine, which is applied topically, and Propecia, which is ingested, both of which have been approved by FDA; non surgical options, such as wigs, hair loss concealer sprays and similar products; and 59 other surgical alternatives, including hair transplantation surgery using the strip surgery method or using hand held devices. Surgical alternatives to the ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems may be able to compete more effectively than the ARTAS procedure in established practices with trained staff and workflows built around performing these surgical alternatives. Practices experienced in offering strip surgery or follicular unit extractions using hand held devices may be reluctant to incorporate or convert their practices to offer ARTAS procedures due to the effort involved to make such changes. Many options may be able to provide satisfactory results for male hair loss, generally at a lower cost to the patient than the ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems. As a result, if patients choose these competitive alternatives, our results of operation could be adversely affected. While traditional hair transplantation surgery has been available for many years, the ARTAS System has only been commercially available since 2011 As a result, we have a limited track record compared to traditional hair transplantation surgery and the safety and efficacy of the ARTAS System is not yet supported by long term clinical data, which could limit sales, and the ARTAS System could prove to be less safe or effective than initially thought. The ARTAS System that we market in the U.S. is regulated as a medical device by the FDA and has received premarket clearance under Section 510(k) of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, or FDCA. In the 510(k) clearance process, before a device may be marketed, FDA must determine that a proposed device is substantially equivalent to a legally marketed predicate device, which includes a device that has been previously cleared through the 510(k) process, a device that was legally marketed prior to May 28, 1976 (pre amendments device), a device that was originally on the U.S. market pursuant to an approved premarket approval, or PMA, application and later down classified, or a 510(k) exempt device. This process is typically shorter and generally requires the submission of less supporting documentation than FDA PMA process and does not always require long term clinical studies. Hair transplantation surgery has been a treatment option for hair restoration for many years, while we only began commercializing the ARTAS System in 2011 Consequently, we lack the breadth of published long term clinical data supporting the safety and efficacy of the ARTAS System and the benefits it offers that might have been generated in connection with other hair restoration techniques. As a result, physicians may be slow to adopt the ARTAS System, we may not have comparative data that our competitors have or are generating, and we may be subject to greater regulatory and product liability risks. Furthermore, future patient studies or clinical experience may indicate that treatment with the ARTAS System does not improve patient outcomes compared to other hair restoration techniques. Such results would slow the adoption of the ARTAS System by physicians, would significantly reduce our ability to achieve expected sales from this system. We have limited complication or patient success rate data with respect to treatment using the ARTAS System. If future patient studies or clinical testing do not support our belief that our system offers a more advantageous treatment for hair restoration, market acceptance of the ARTAS System could fail to increase or could decrease and our business could be harmed. Moreover, if future results and experience indicate that our implant products cause unexpected or serious complications or other unforeseen negative effects, we could be subject to mandatory product recalls, suspension or withdrawal of FDA or other governmental clearance or approval or, CE Certificates of Conformity, significant legal liability or harm to our business reputation. Furthermore, if patients that receive traditional hair transplantation surgery, such as strip surgery, were to experience unexpected or serious complications or other unforeseen effects, the market for the ARTAS System may be adversely affected, even if such effects are not applicable to the ARTAS System. 60 If we choose to, or are required to, conduct additional studies, such studies or experience could slow the market adoption of the ARTAS System by physicians, significantly reduce our ability to achieve expected revenue from this system. 1 of our subsidiaries is the subject of an investigation by the People Republic of China, or the PRC, State Administration for Market Regulation, or SAMR, regarding the potential misclassification of 1 product as a non medical device. If this subsidiary is determined to have sold the Versa platform under an improper classification, the subsidiary could face material administrative penalties, including loss of future sales, corrective actions, disgorgement of profits and fines. Our Chinese subsidiary, or Venus Concept China, imports and sells registered medical devices and unregistered non medical devices in the PRC. 1 of its unregistered products has been the subject of inquiries from 2 district level branches of the SAMR, Xuhui MSA and Huangpu MSA, as to whether the product was properly sold as a non medical device. In January 2019, Venus Concept China had applied to register a version of this non medical device as a medical device with the National Medical Products Administration of PRC, or NMPA. On June 12, 2019, Venus Concept China was informed that Xuhui MSA had opened an administrative investigation case related to whether the device is an unregistered medical device, as a result of a complaint that Xuhui MSA received from a former distributor of Venus Concept China. Huangpu MSA notified Venus Concept China that it would be suspending its separate investigation against Venus Concept China, pending the results of the Xuhui MSA investigation. We and Venus Concept China have voluntarily stopped sales in China of this product. On December 11, 2019, Xuhui MSA informed Venus Concept China that a determination had been made by the Shanghai Medical Products Administration that Versa IPL function should be administered as a Class II medical device. Xuhui MSA also suggested that Venus Concept China consider a voluntary recall of all Versa units sold in China. Venus Concept China is currently contemplating a recall plan. In late January 2020, Venus Concept China received a copy of the Shanghai Medical Products Administration determination that because of the intended uses for Versa IPL function comprise medical treatment functions such as treatment of benign pigmented epidermis and skin lesions, Versa IPL function should be administered as a Class II medical device. Venus Concept China has not yet received a notice of proposed penalty decision from Xuhui MSA. Venus Concept China has not yet received a determination from NMPA on its application for registering Versa IPL function as a medical device. In addition to the product that is the subject of an administrative investigation, Venus Concept China also sells 2 other products in the PRC, which are not registered as medical devices with the NMPA. Venus Concept China may not be able to convince the relevant SAMR authorities that the product that is the subject of an administrative investigation was properly classified, or that any of its other products that might be the subject of future government investigations, is properly classified. If any of the products sold by us as unregistered products is ultimately determined to be a medical device, the registration process with the NMPA could be extensive and time consuming, potentially resulting in Venus Concept China inability to sell such products in the PRC for several years. Venus Concept China prior sales of those products could also subject it to material administrative penalties if it is determined that the products were sold in the absence of necessary registrations with NMPA. These administrative penalties could include limitations on future sales, corrective actions, including product recalls, disgorgement of profits and fines, the future imposition of which could materially adversely affect our business, operations, financial condition and reputation in the market. Although the revenue generated from the product that is the subject of the investigation did not represent a material amount of our total revenues for the years ended December 31, 2019 or 2018, m1tary penalties n1theless could be material. 61 We are the subject of purported class action lawsuits, and additional litigation may be brought against us in the future. Between May 23, 2018 and June 11, 2019, four putative shareholder class actions complaints were filed against us, certain of our former officers and directors, certain of our venture capital investors, and the underwriters of our IPO. 2 of these complaints, Wong v. Restoration Robotics, Inc., et al., No. 18CIV02609, and Li v. Restoration Robotics, Inc., et al., No. 19CIV08173 (together, the State Actions ), were filed in the Superior Court of the State of California, County of San Mateo, and assert claims under Sections 11, 12(a)(2) and 15 of the Securities Act of 1933, or the Securities Act. The other 2 complaints, Guerrini v. Restoration Robotics, Inc., et al., No. 518 cv 03712 EJD and Yzeiraj v. Restoration Robotics, Inc., et al., No. 518 cv 03883 BLF (together, the Federal Actions ), were filed in the United States District Court for the Northern District of California, and assert claims under Sections 11 and 15 of the Securities Act. The complaints all allege, among other things, that our Registration Statement filed with the SEC on September 1, 2017 and the Prospectus filed with the SEC on October 13, 2017 in connection with our IPO were inaccurate and misleading, contained untrue statements of material facts, omitted to state other facts necessary to make the statements made not misleading and omitted to state material facts required to be stated therein. The complaints seek unspecified m1tary damages, other equitable relief and attorneys fees and costs. In the State Actions, we, along with the other defendants, successfully demurred to the initial Wong complaint for failure to state a claim, and secured a stay of both cases based on the forum selection clause contained in our Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, which designates the federal district courts as the exclusive forums for claims arising under the Securities Act. However, on December 19, 2018, the Delaware Court of Chancery in Sciabacucchi v. Salzberg held that exclusive federal forum provisions are invalid under Delaware law. Based on this ruling, the San Mateo Superior Court lifted its stay of State Actions on December 10, 2019. On January 17, 2020, Plaintiffs in the State Actions filed a consolidated amended complaint for violations of federal securities laws, alleging again that, among other things, our Registration Statement filed with the SEC on September 1, 2017 and the Prospectus filed with the SEC on October 13, 2017 in connection with our IPO were inaccurate and misleading, contained untrue statements of material fact, omitted to state other facts necessary to make the statements made not misleading and omitted to state material facts required to be stated therein. The complaint seeks unspecified m1tary damages, other equitable relief and attorneys fees and costs. On February 24, 2020, we demurred to the consolidated amended complaint for failure to state a claim. A hearing on our demurrer is currently scheduled for May 8, 2020. On March 18, 2020, the Delaware Supreme Court reversed the Chancery Court decision in Sciabacucchi v. Salzberg and held that exclusive federal forum provisions are valid under Delaware law. The Company intends to seek appropriate relief based on the Sciabacucchi decision. In the Federal Actions, which have been consolidated under the caption In re Restoration Robotics, Inc. Securities Litigation, Case No. 518 cv 03712 EJD, Lead Plaintiff Eduardo Guerrini filed his consolidated amended complaint for violations of federal securities laws on November 30, 2018. The consolidated amended complaint alleges again that, among other things, our Registration Statement filed with the SEC on September 1, 2017 and the Prospectus filed with the SEC on October 13, 2017 in connection with our IPO were inaccurate and misleading, contained untrue statements of material facts, omitted to state other facts necessary to make the statements made not misleading and omitted to state material facts required to be stated therein. On January 29, 2019, we, along with certain of our former officers and directors, filed a motion to dismiss the consolidated amended complaint for failure to state a claim. On October 18, 2019, the District Court granted our motion to dismiss as to all but 2 allegedly false or misleading statements contained in our Prospectus. On December 9, 2019, we filed our answer to the consolidated amended complaint denying the falsity of these statements, and discovery is underway. In addition to the State and Federal Actions, on July 11, 2019, a verified shareholder derivative complaint was filed in the United States District Court for the Northern District of California, capti1d Mason v. Rhodes, No. 519 cv 03997 NC. The complaint alleges that certain of our former officers and directors breached their fiduciary duties, have been unjustly enriched and violated Section 14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or the Exchange Act, in connection with our IPO and our 2018 proxy statement. The complaint seeks unspecified damages, declaratory relief, other equitable relief and attorneys fees and costs. On August 21, 2019, the District Court granted the parties joint stipulation to stay the Mason action during the pendency of the Federal Actions, and the case remains stayed. 62 In addition to the actions described above relating to our IPO, 2 lawsuits purporting to challenge disclosures made in connection with our merger have also been filed. The first, capti1d Bushansky v. Restoration Robotics, Inc., et al., No. 519 cv 06004 MMC, alleged, among other things, that defendants violated Sections 14(a) and 20(a) of the Exchange Act and SEC Rule 14a 9. The complaint alleged that the proxy statement filed with the SEC by Restoration Robotics on September 10, 2019 in connection with the Merger omitted or misrepresented material information. The complaint sought, among other things, injunctive relief, unspecified damages, and attorneys fees and costs. On November 6, 2019, the plaintiff voluntarily dismissed the Bushansky action with prejudice as to his individual claims and without prejudice as to the claims of the putative class. The second, a putative shareholder class action complaint capti1d Pak v. Restoration Robotics, Inc., et al., No. 119 cv 02237, was filed in the United States District Court for the District of Delaware on December 6, 2019. The complaint alleges, among other things, that defendants violated Sections 14(a) and 20(a) of the Exchange Act and SEC Rule 14a 9. The complaint alleges that the proxy statement filed with the SEC by Restoration Robotics on September 10, 2019 in connection with the Merger contained false or misleading information. The complaint seeks, among other things, compensatory and or rescissory damages, and attorneys fees and costs. On February 26, 2020, the District Court appointed Joon Pak as Lead Plaintiff in the Pak action, and approved his selection of Lead Counsel. While we believe these claims to be without merit, we cannot assure you that additional claims alleging the same or similar facts will not be filed. Any litigation could result in substantial costs and a diversion of management attention and resources. We rely on a limited number of third party contract manufacturers for the production of our systems and only have contracts with certain suppliers for the comp1nts used in our systems. The failure of these third parties to perform could adversely affect our ability to meet demand for our systems in a timely and cost effective manner. We rely on third party contract manufacturers in Karmiel, Israel, Nazareth, Israel, Mazet, France, Weston, Florida and San Jose, California for the manufacture of the majority of our systems. Other than with respect to the ARTAS iX System, the majority of the comp1nts used in our systems are available off the shelf and we do not rely on any single supplier, and as a result we do not have any long term supply agreements for these comp1nts. Our reliance on third party contract manufacturers and suppliers involves a number of risks, including, among other things contract manufacturers or suppliers may fail to comply with regulatory requirements or make errors in manufacturing that could negatively affect the efficacy or safety of our systems or cause delays in shipments of our systems; we or our contract manufacturers or suppliers may not be able to respond to unanticipated changes in customer orders, and if orders do not match forecasts, we or our contract manufactures may have excess or inadequate inventory of materials and comp1nts; we or our contract manufacturers and suppliers may be subject to price fluctuations due to a lack of long term supply arrangements for key comp1nts; we or our contract manufacturers and suppliers may lose access to critical services and comp1nts, resulting in an interruption in the manufacture, assembly and shipment of its systems; we may experience delays in delivery by our contract manufacturers and suppliers due to changes in demand from us or their other customers; fluctuations in demand for systems that our contract manufacturers and suppliers manufacture for others may affect their ability or willingness to deliver comp1nts to us in a timely manner; our suppliers or those of our contract manufacturers may wish to discontinue supplying comp1nts or services to us for risk management reasons; we may not be able to find new or alternative comp1nts or reconfigure our system and manufacturing processes in a timely manner if the necessary comp1nts become unavailable; and 63 our contract manufacturers and suppliers may encounter financial hardships unrelated to our demand, which could inhibit their ability to fulfill its orders and meet our requirements. If any of these risks materialize, they could significantly increase our costs and effect our ability to meet demand for our systems. If we are unable to satisfy commercial demand for our systems in a timely manner, our ability to generate revenue would be impaired, market acceptance of our systems and our reputation could be adversely affected, and customers may instead purchase or use our competitors products. In addition, we could be forced to secure new or alternative contract manufacturers or suppliers. Securing a replacement contract manufacturer or supplier could be difficult. The introduction of new or alternative manufacturers or suppliers also may require design changes to our medical device products that are subject to FDA and other regulatory clearances or approvals, or a new or revised CE Certificate of Conformity. We may also be required to assess the new manufacturer compliance with all applicable regulations and guidelines, which could further impede our ability to manufacture our systems in a timely manner. As a result, we could incur increased production costs, experience delays in deliveries of our systems, suffer damage to our reputation, and experience an adverse effect on our business and financial results. We rely on a single third party manufacturer for the manufacturing of the reusable procedure kits, disposable procedure kits and spare procedures kits used with the ARTAS System and the ARTAS iX System. NPI Solutions, Inc., or NPI, produces reusable procedure kits, disposable procedure kits and spare kits used with the ARTAS System and ARTAS iX System. If the operations of NPI are interrupted or if it is unable or unwilling to meet our delivery requirements due to capacity limitations or other constraints, we may be limited in our ability to fulfill new customer kit orders required for use with the existing ARTAS System and ARTAS iX System. Any change to another contract manufacturer would likely entail significant delay, require us to devote substantial time and resources, and could involve a period in which our products could not be produced in a timely or consistently high quality manner, any of which could harm our reputation and results of operations. We have a manufacturing agreement for consumables with NPI for the supply of consumable products, including reusable procedure kits, disposable procedure kits and spare procedure kits used with the ARTAS System and ARTAS iX System, pursuant to both of which we make purchases on a purchase order basis. The agreement is effective for an initial term of 2 years and will continue to automatically renew for additional twelve month periods, subject to either party right to terminate the agreement upon 180 days advance notice during the initial term if our quarterly forecasted demand falls below 75% of our historical forecasted demand for the same period in the previous year or upon 120 days advance notice after the initial term. In addition, our reliance on NPI involves a number of other risks, including, among other things, that our various procedure kits may not be manufactured in accordance with agreed upon specifications or in compliance with regulatory requirements, or its manufacturing facilities may not be able to maintain compliance with regulatory requirements, which could negatively affect the safety or efficacy of our procedure kits, cause delays in shipments of our procedure kits, or require us to recall procedure kits previously delivered to customers or subject us to enforcement actions by regulatory agencies; we may not be able to timely respond to unanticipated changes in customer orders, and if orders do not match forecasts, we may have excess or inadequate inventory of materials and comp1nts; we may be subject to price fluctuations when a supply contract is renegotiated or if our existing contract is not renewed; NPI may wish to discontinue manufacturing and supplying products to us for risk management reasons; and NPI may encounter financial or other hardships unrelated to our demand for products, which could inhibit its ability to fulfill our orders and meet our requirements. If any of these risks materialize, it could significantly increase our costs, our ability to generate net sales would be impaired, market acceptance of our products could be adversely affected, and customers may instead purchase or use our competitors products, which could have a materially adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. 64 Furthermore, if we are required to change the manufacturing of our various procedure kits, we will be required to verify that the new manufacturer maintains facilities, procedures and operations that comply with our quality and applicable regulatory requirements, which could further impede our ability to manufacture the procedure kits in a timely manner. Transitioning to a new supplier could be time consuming and expensive, may result in interruptions in our operations and product delivery. The occurrence of these events could harm our ability to meet the demand for our products in a timely or cost effective manner. We cannot assure you that we will be able to secure alternative equipment and materials and utilize such equipment and materials without experiencing interruptions in our workflow. If we should encounter delays or difficulties in securing, reconfiguring or revalidating the equipment and comp1nts we require for the ARTAS System and ARTAS iX System, including the related consumables, our reputation, business, financial condition and results of operations could be negatively affected. If NPI is unable to manufacture the reusable procedure kits, disposable procedure kits and spare procedures kits used with the ARTAS System and the ARTAS iX System in high quality commercial quantities successfully and consistently to meet demand, our growth in the hair restoration market may be limited. To manufacture our reusable procedure kits, disposable procedure kits and spare procedure kits in the quantities that we believe will be required to meet anticipated market demand, NPI will need to increase manufacturing capacity, which will involve significant challenges. In addition, the development of commercial scale manufacturing capabilities will require us and NPI to invest substantial additional funds and hire and retain the technical personnel who have the necessary manufacturing experience. Neither we nor NPI may successfully complete any required increase to existing manufacturing processes in a timely manner, or at all. If NPI is unable to produce the reusable procedure kits, disposable procedure kits and spare kits in sufficient quantities to meet anticipated customer demand, our revenue, business, and financial prospects would be harmed. The limited experience NPI has in producing larger quantities of the procedure kits may also result in quality issues, and possibly result in product recalls. Manufacturing delays related to quality control could harm our reputation and decrease our revenue. Any recall could be expensive and generate negative publicity, which could impair our ability to market the ARTAS System and the ARTAS iX System and procedures and negatively affect our results of operations. If we are unable to manufacture our next generation ARTAS System, called the ARTAS iX System in high quality commercial quantities successfully and consistently to meet demand, our penetration of the hair restoration market will be limited, and our reputation could be harmed. To manufacture our ARTAS iX System in the quantities that we believe will be required to meet anticipated market demand, we will need to develop and maintain sufficient manufacturing capacity, which will involve significant challenges. Historically, we have not manufactured any of our other ARTAS System products in house or without the contract manufacturer involvement. We have been manufacturing the ARTAS iX System without a third party contract manufacturer involvement for over 18 months. The continuous development of commercial scale manufacturing capabilities will require us (or our contract manufacturer for ARTAS iX System, if we decide to utilize 1 on a long term basis) to invest substantial additional funds and hire and retain the technical personnel who have the necessary manufacturing experience. We also may become subject to additional, 1rous regulatory requirements from the U.S. regulatory agencies as well as foreign regulatory agencies. Neither we nor a third party manufacturer, if 1 is utilized, may successfully complete any required increase to existing manufacturing processes in a timely manner, or at all. If we or a contract manufacturer, if 1 is utilized, are unable to produce the ARTAS iX System in sufficient quantities to meet anticipated customer demand, our revenue, business, financial prospects, and reputation would be harmed. The limited experience we have or a third party manufacturer may have, if 1 is utilized, in producing the ARTAS iX System may also result in quality issues, and possibly result in product recalls. Manufacturing delays related to quality control could harm our reputation and decrease our revenue. Any recall could be expensive and generate negative publicity, which could impair our ability to market the ARTAS iX System and procedures and further affect our results of operations. 65 Both our manufacturing of certain of our systems and NPI manufacturing of the ARTAS procedure kits are dependent upon third party suppliers and, in some cases, sole suppliers, for the majority of our comp1nts, subassemblies and materials, making us vulnerable to supply shortages and price fluctuations, which could harm our business. We and NPI, as the case may be, rely on several sole source suppliers, including Kuka Robotics, Inc., FLIR Integrated Imaging Solutions Inc. and 3D CAM International Corporation, for certain comp1nts of the ARTAS iX System, reusable procedure kits, disposable procedure kits and spare procedure kits. We also rely on other suppliers for some of the comp1nts used to manufacture our other devices. These suppliers may be unwilling or unable to supply comp1nts of these systems to us or NPI reliably and at the levels we anticipate or require to meet demand for our products. For us to be successful, our suppliers must be able to provide products and comp1nts in substantial quantities, in compliance with regulatory requirements, in accordance with agreed upon specifications, at acceptable costs and on a timely basis. An interruption in our commercial operations could occur if we encounter delays or difficulties in securing these comp1nts, and if we cannot then obtain an acceptable substitute. We source a number of comp1nts used in the manufacture of our systems from China; the severity of the coronavirus outbreak could make access to our existing supply chain difficult or impossible and could materially impact our business, and any disruption in the chain of supply may result in manufacturing delays and inventory shortages. If we are required to transition to new third party suppliers for certain comp1nts of our systems or our ARTAS procedure kits, we believe that there are only a few such suppliers that can supply the necessary comp1nts. A supply interruption, price fluctuation or an increase in demand beyond our current suppliers capabilities could harm our ability to manufacture our systems and NPI ability to manufacture our ARTAS procedure kits until new sources of supply are identified and qualified. In addition, the use of comp1nts or materials furnished by these alternative suppliers could require us to alter our operations. Our reliance on these suppliers subjects us to a number of risks that could harm our reputation, business, and financial condition, including, among other things interruption of supply resulting from modifications to or discontinuation of a supplier operations; delays in product shipments resulting from uncorrected defects, reliability issues, or a supplier variation in a comp1nt; a lack of long term supply arrangements for key comp1nts with our suppliers; inability to obtain adequate supply in a timely manner, or to obtain adequate supply on commercially reasonable terms; difficulty and cost associated with locating and qualifying alternative suppliers for our comp1nts in a timely manner; production delays related to the evaluation and testing of products from alternative suppliers, and corresponding regulatory qualifications; delay in delivery due to our suppliers prioritizing other customer orders over ours; damage to our reputation caused by defective comp1nts produced by our suppliers; increased cost of our warranty program due to product repair or replacement based upon defects in comp1nts produced by our suppliers; and fluctuations in delivery by our suppliers due to changes in demand from us or their other customers. Where practicable, we are seeking, or intending to seek, second source manufacturers for certain of our comp1nts. However, we cannot provide assurance that we will be successful in establishing second source manufacturers or that the second source manufacturers will be able to satisfy commercial demand for our systems. If any of these risks materialize, costs could significantly increase and our ability to meet demand for our products could be impacted. If we are unable to satisfy commercial demand for our systems in a timely manner, our ability to generate revenue from these systems would be impaired. 66 We forecast sales to determine requirements for comp1nts and materials used in our systems and if our forecasts are incorrect, we may experience delays in shipments or increased inventory costs. We keep limited materials, comp1nts and finished products on hand. To manage our operations, with third party contract manufacturers and suppliers, we forecast anticipated system orders and material requirements to predict our inventory needs and enter into purchase orders on the basis of these requirements. Several comp1nts of our systems require significant order lead time. As our business continues to expand and if our needs for comp1nts and materials increases beyond our estimates, our manufacturers and suppliers may be unable to meet our demand. In addition, if we underestimate our comp1nt and material requirements, we may have inadequate inventory, which could interrupt, delay, or prevent delivery of our systems. In contrast, if we overestimate our requirements, we may have excess inventory, which would increase use of our working capital. Any of these occurrences would negatively affect our financial condition and the level of satisfaction our customers have with our business. Although we actively train our customers on the use of our systems and post treatment care, misuse by the operator of our systems may result in adverse results and may subject us to liability or otherwise harm our reputation and our business. We and our independent distributors market and sell our systems to physicians. In the U.S. and certain international markets, subject to local regulations, physician customers can generally allow nurse practiti1rs, technicians and other non physicians to perform aesthetic procedures using our systems under their direct supervision. Although we and our distributors provide training on the use of our systems as well as the proper post treatment care, we do not supervise the procedures performed with our systems, nor can we be certain that physicians are directly supervising procedures according to our recommendations. The potential misuse of our systems or failing to adhere to operating guidelines can cause skin damage and underlying tissue damage, which could harm the reputation of our systems and expose us to costly product liability litigation. In addition, patients may not comply with post treatment guidelines, which could also lead to adverse results and subject us to liability. We and our distributors offer system training sessions, but neither we nor our distributors require purchasers or operators of our systems to attend training sessions. The lack of required training for operators of our systems and the use of our systems by non physicians may result in product misuse and adverse treatment outcomes, which could harm our reputation and expose us to costly product liability litigation. Product liability suits could be brought against us for defective design, labeling, material, workmanship, or software or misuse of our systems, and could result in expensive and time consuming litigation, payment of substantial damages, an increase in our insurance rates and substantial harm to our reputation. If our systems are defectively designed, manufactured, or labeled, contain defective comp1nts or software, or are misused, we may become subject to substantial and costly litigation by our customers or their patients. For example, if a patient is injured or suffers unanticipated adverse events after undergoing a procedure using 1 of our systems, or if system operating guidelines are found to be inadequate, we may be subject to product liability claims. Claims could also be asserted under state consumer protection acts. If we cannot successfully defend ourselves against product liability claims, we may incur substantial liabilities. Even successful defense would require significant financial and management resources. Regardless of the merits or eventual outcome, product liability claims may result in decreased demand for our systems, or any future systems or services; damage to our reputation; withdrawal of clinical trial participants; costs to defend the related litigation; a diversion of management time and our resources; substantial m1tary awards to customers, patients or clinical trial participants; regulatory investigations, product recalls, withdrawals or labeling, marketing or promotional restrictions; loss of revenue; and the inability to commercialize future products. 67 We currently have product liability insurance, but any claim that may be brought against us could result in a court judgment or settlement in an amount that is not covered, in whole or in part, by our insurance or that is in excess of the limits of our insurance coverage. Our insurance policies also have various exclusions and deductibles, and we may be subject to a product liability claim for which we have no coverage. We will have to pay any amounts awarded by a court or negotiated in a settlement that exceed our coverage limitations or that are not covered by our insurance, and we may not have, or be able to obtain, sufficient funds to pay such amounts. Moreover, in the future, we may not be able to maintain insurance coverage at a reasonable cost or in sufficient amounts to protect us against losses. Third parties may attempt to reverse engineer or produce counterfeit versions of our systems which may negatively affect our reputation, or harm patients and subject us to product liability claims. Third parties have sought in the past, and in the future may seek, to reverse engineer or develop counterfeit products that are substantially similar or compatible with our systems and available to practiti1rs at lower prices than our own. Practiti1rs may be able to make unauthorized use of our systems technology. In addition, if copies of products that have been reverse engineered or counterfeit products are used with or in place of our own, we could be subject to product liability claims resulting from the use of damaged or defective goods and suffer damage to our reputation. Security breaches and other disruptions could compromise our information and expose us to liability. In the ordinary course of our business and to the extent necessary, we rely on software to control the ongoing use of our systems, collect and aggregate diagnostic data, and collect and store sensitive data, including intellectual property and proprietary business information, and certain personally identifiable information of customers, distributors, consultants and employees in our data centers and on our ne2rks. The secure processing, maintenance, and transmission of this information is important to our operations and business strategy. We have established physical, electronic, and policy measures to secure our systems in an attempt to prevent a system breach and the theft of data we collect, and we rely on commercially available systems, software, tools, and monitoring in our effort to provide security for our information technology systems and the digital information we collect, process, transmit and store. The third party providers of such information technology systems and related infrastructure may have or may obtain access to our systems and data within them. Despite our security measures, our information technology systems and related infrastructure, and those of our current and any future collaborators, contractors and consultants and other third parties on which we rely, may be vulnerable to attacks by computer viruses, malware, hackers or breaches due to malfeasance, employee or contractor error, telecommunication or electrical failures, terrorism or other created or natural disasters. The risk of a cyber attack or cyber intrusion by computer hackers from around the world, including those from foreign governments and terrorists, has greatly increased in number, intensity and sophistication. In addition, the prevalent use of mobile devices that access confidential information increases the risk of data security breaches, which could lead to the loss of confidential information or other intellectual property. The costs to us to mitigate ne2rk security problems, bugs, viruses, worms, malicious software programs and security vulnerabilities could be significant, and while we have implemented security measures to protect our data security and information technology systems, our efforts to address these problems may not be successful, and these problems could result in unexpected interruptions, delays, cessation of service and other harm to our business and our competitive position. If such an event were to occur and cause interruptions in our operations, it could result in a material disruption of our product development programs. Moreover, if a computer security breach affects our systems or results in the unauthorized release of personally identifiable information, our reputation could be materially damaged. In addition, such a breach may require notification to governmental agencies, the media or individuals pursuant to various federal and state privacy and security laws, if applicable, including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, or HIPAA, as amended by the Health Information Technology for Clinical Health Act of 2009, or HITECH, and its implementing rules and regulations, as well as regulations promulgated by the Federal Trade Commission and state breach notification laws, or the laws or 1 or more foreign jurisdictions including the European Union s, or the EU, the General Data Protection Regulation 2016 679, or GDPR. We could also be exposed to a risk of loss or litigation and potential liability, which could materially adversely affect our business, results of operations and financial condition. 68 The clinical trial process required to obtain regulatory clearances or approvals is lengthy and expensive with uncertain outcomes and could result in delays in new product introductions. In order to obtain 510(k) clearance for certain of our systems, including the ARTAS System, we were required to conduct clinical trials, and we expect to conduct clinical trials in support of marketing authorization for future products and product enhancements. Conducting clinical trials is a complex and expensive process, can take many years, and outcomes are inherently uncertain. We may suffer significant setbacks in clinical trials, even after earlier clinical trials showed promising results, and failure can occur at any time during the clinical trial process. Any of our products may malfunction or may produce undesirable adverse effects that could cause us or regulatory authorities to interrupt, delay or halt clinical trials. We, FDA, or another regulatory authority may suspend or terminate clinical trials at any time to avoid exposing trial participants to unacceptable health risks. Successful results of pre clinical studies are not necessarily indicative of future clinical trial results, and predecessor clinical trial results may not be replicated in subsequent clinical trials. Additionally, FDA may disagree with our interpretation of the data from our pre clinical studies and clinical trials, or may find the clinical trial design, conduct or results inadequate to prove safety or efficacy, and may require us to pursue additional pre clinical studies or clinical trials, which could further delay the clearance or approval of our products. The data we collect from our pre clinical studies and clinical trials may not be sufficient to support FDA clearance or approval, and if we are unable to demonstrate the safety and efficacy of our future products in our clinical trials, we will be unable to obtain regulatory clearance or approval to market our products. In addition, we may estimate and publicly announce the anticipated timing of the accomplishment of various clinical, regulatory and other product development goals, which are often referred to as milest1s. These milest1s could include the obtainment of the right to affix the CE Mark in the European Union; the submission to FDA of an investigational device exemption, or IDE, application to commence a pivotal clinical trial for a new product; the enrollment of patients in clinical trials; the release of data from clinical trials; and other clinical and regulatory events. The actual timing of these milest1s could vary dramatically compared to our estimates, in some cases for reasons beyond our control. We cannot assure you that we will meet our projected milest1s and if we do not meet these milest1s as publicly announced, the commercialization of our products may be delayed and, as a result, our stock price may decline. Delays in the commencement or completion of clinical testing could significantly affect our product development costs. We do not know whether planned clinical trials will begin on time, need to be redesigned, enroll an adequate number of patients in a timely manner or be completed on schedule, if at all. The commencement and completion of clinical trials can be delayed or terminated for a number of reasons, including delays or failures related to FDA or comparable foreign regulatory authorities disagreeing as to the design or implementation of our clinical studies; obtaining regulatory approval to commence a clinical trial; reaching agreement on acceptable terms with prospective clinical research organizations, or CROs, and trial sites, the terms of which can be subject to extensive negotiation and may vary significantly among different CROs and trial sites; manufacturing sufficient quantities of a product for use in clinical trials; obtaining institutional review board, or IRB, or ethics committees approval to conduct a clinical trial at each prospective site; recruiting and enrolling patients and maintaining their participation in clinical trials; having clinical sites observe trial protocol or continue to participate in a trial; addressing any patient safety concerns that arise during the course of a clinical trial; addressing any conflicts with new or existing laws or regulations; and adding a sufficient number of clinical trial sites. 69 Patient enrollment in clinical trials and completion of patient follow up depend on many factors, including the size of the patient population, the nature of the trial protocol, the proximity of patients to clinical sites, the eligibility criteria for the clinical trial, patient compliance, competing clinical trials and clinicians and patients perceptions as to the potential advantages of the product being studied in relation to other available therapies, including any new treatments that may be cleared or approved for the indications we are investigating. For example, patients may be discouraged from enrolling in our clinical trials if the trial protocol requires them to undergo extensive post treatment procedures or follow up to assess the safety and efficacy of a product, or they may be persuaded to participate in contemporaneous clinical trials of a competitor product. In addition, patients participating in our clinical trials may drop out before completion of the trial or suffer adverse medical events unrelated to our products. Delays in patient enrollment or failure of patients to continue to participate in a clinical trial may delay commencement or completion of the clinical trial, cause an increase in the costs of the clinical trial and delays, or result in the failure of the clinical trial. We could also encounter delays if FDA concluded that our financial relationships with our principal investigators resulted in a perceived or actual conflict of interest that may have affected the interpretation of a study, the integrity of the data generated at the applicable clinical trial site or the utility of the clinical trial itself. Principal investigators for our clinical trials may serve as scientific advisors or consultants to us from time to time and receive cash compensation and or stock options in connection with such services. If these relationships and any related compensation to or ownership interest by the clinical investigator carrying out the study result in perceived or actual conflicts of interest, or FDA concludes that the financial relationship may have affected interpretation of the study, the integrity of the data generated at the applicable clinical trial site may be questi1d and the utility of the clinical trial itself may be jeopardized, which could result in the delay or rejection of our marketing application by FDA. Any such delay or rejection could prevent us from commercializing any of our products in development. Furthermore, clinical trials may also be delayed because of ambiguous or negative interim results. In addition, a clinical trial may be suspended or terminated by us, FDA, the IRB overseeing the clinical trial at issue, the Data Safety Monitoring Board for such trial, any of our clinical trial sites with respect to that site, or other regulatory authorities due to several factors, including failure to conduct the clinical trial in accordance with applicable regulatory requirements or our clinical protocols; inspection of the clinical trial operations or trial sites by FDA or other regulatory authorities resulting in the imposition of a clinical hold; inability of a clinical investigator or clinical trial site to continue to participate in the clinical trial; unforeseen safety issues or adverse side effects; failure to demonstrate a benefit from using the product; and lack of adequate funding to continue the clinical trial. Additionally, changes in regulatory requirements and guidance may occur and we may need to amend clinical trial protocols to reflect these changes. Amendments may require us to resubmit our clinical trial protocols to IRBs for reexamination, which may impact the costs, timing or successful completion of a clinical trial. If we experience delays in completion of, or if we terminate, any of our clinical trials, the commercial prospects for our products may be harmed and our ability to generate product revenue from these products will be delayed or not realized at all. In addition, any delays in completing our clinical trials will increase our costs, slow down our product development and approval process and jeopardize our ability to commence product sales and generate revenue. Any of these occurrences may significantly harm our business, financial condition and prospects significantly. In addition, many of the factors that cause, or lead to, a delay in the commencement or completion of a clinical trial may also ultimately lead to the denial of regulatory approval of the subject product. 70 We have increased the size of our company significantly over a short period, and difficulties managing our continued growth could adversely affect our business, operating results, and financial condition. We have increased our head count from a few employees in 2009 to 525 employees as of December 31, 2019, which includes employees of Restoration Robotics. This growth has placed, and may continue to place, a strain on our management and administrative, operational and financial infrastructure. Our ability to manage our operations and growth requires the continued improvement of our operational, financial and management controls and reporting systems and procedures. If we are unable to manage our growth effectively or if we are unable to attract, incentivize and integrate additional highly qualified personnel, our business, operating results, and financial condition may be harmed. We depend on skilled and experienced personnel to operate our business effectively. If we are unable to recruit, hire, and retain these employees, our ability to manage and expand our business will be hampered, which could negatively affect our future revenue and profitability. We are highly dependent on the skills, experience, and efforts of our executive officers and other key employees. Our success depends in part on our continued ability to attract, retain and motivate highly qualified management, sales and marketing, product development and other personnel. The loss of services of any of these individuals could delay or prevent enhancement of the execution of our business and the development of future products and services. Although we have entered into employment agreements with certain members of our senior management team, these agreements do not provide for a fixed term of service. Competition for qualified personnel in the medical device field is intense due to the limited number of individuals who possess the skills and experience required by the industry. Our ability to retain skilled employees and our success in attracting and hiring new skilled employees will be a critical factor in determining whether we will be successful in the future. We will face significant challenges and risks in hiring, training, managing, and retaining sales and marketing, product development, financial reporting, and regulatory compliance employees, many of whom may be geographically dispersed. In addition, to the extent we hire personnel from competitors, we may be subject to allegations that they have been improperly solicited or that they have divulged proprietary or other confidential information, or that their former employers own their research output. The failure to attract and retain personnel, particularly sales and marketing and product development personnel, could materially harm our ability to compete effectively and grow our business. We incur significant costs because of operating as a public company, and our management devotes substantial time to new compliance initiatives. We incur significant legal, accounting and other expenses as a public company, including costs resulting from public company reporting obligations under the Exchange Act and regulations regarding corporate governance practices. The listing requirements of the Nasdaq Global Market and the rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission, or the SEC, require that we satisfy certain corporate governance requirements relating to director independence, filing annual and interim reports, stockholder meetings, approvals and voting, soliciting proxies, conflicts of interest and a code of conduct. Our management and other personnel devote a substantial amount of time to ensure that we comply with all of these requirements. Moreover, the reporting requirements, rules and regulations will continue to increase our legal and financial compliance costs and will make some activities more time consuming and costlier. Any changes we make to comply with these obligations may not be sufficient to allow us to satisfy our obligations as a public company on a timely basis, or at all. These reporting requirements, rules and regulations, coupled with the increase in potential litigation exposure associated with being a public company, could also make it more difficult for us to attract and retain qualified persons to serve on our board of directors or board committees or to serve as executive officers, or to obtain certain types of insurance, including directors and officers insurance, on acceptable terms. 71 We have identified material weaknesses in our internal control over financial reporting and if we fail to remediate these weaknesses and maintain proper and effective internal controls, our ability to produce accurate and timely financial statements could be impaired, which could harm our operating results, our ability to operate our business and investors views of the Company. Prior to the Merger, Venus Concept Ltd. was a private company. The Merger has been accounted for as a reverse acquisition with Venus Concept Ltd. as the acquiring company for accounting purposes, and the Company as the legal acquirer. As a result, upon consummation of the Merger, the historical financial statements of Venus Concept Ltd. became the historical financial statements of the combined organization. As a private company, Venus Concept Ltd. has not historically prepared public company level financial statements. In connection with our preparation and the audit of our consolidated financial statements as of and for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, we identified several material weaknesses as defined under the Exchange Act and by the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) in our internal control over financial reporting. A material weakness is a deficiency, or a combination of deficiencies, in internal control over financial reporting, such that there is a reasonable possibility that a material misstatement of the company annual or interim consolidated financial statements will not be prevented or detected on a timely basis. The material weaknesses that were identified are as follows We did not have in place an effective control environment with formal processes and procedures and an adequate number of accounting personnel with the appropriate technical training in, and experience with, U.S. GAAP to allow for a detailed review of accounting transactions that would identify errors in a timely manner. Given the growth of our company, we had not implemented centralized procedures or a technology solution that would ensure appropriate lessor accounting processes and enable the accurate and timely preparation of financial statements. We did not design or maintain effective controls over the financial statement close and reporting process in order to ensure the accurate and timely preparation of consolidated financial statements in accordance with U.S. GAAP. To remediate the material weaknesses associated with lack of effective controls over the financial statement close and reporting process, as well as lack of an effective control environment with formal processes and procedures , described above, and to prevent similar deficiencies in the future, we added additional controls and procedures in 2019. As of December 31, 2019, these material weaknesses were fully remediated. However, as of December 31, 2019, we have not yet implemented centralized procedures or a technology solution that would ensure appropriate lessor accounting processes and enable the accurate and timely preparation of consolidated financial statements. We plan to establish adequate centralized procedures related to lessor accounting processes in 2020, and as a result, we concluded that the material weakness associated with lessor accounting processes had not been remediated at December 31, 2019. Due to the material weakness in internal control over financial reporting associated with the lessor accounting processes automation our management concluded that our internal control over financial reporting was not effective as of December 31, 2019. The remediation measures we have taken and will need to take have been and may be time consuming, costly, and might place significant demands on our financial and operational resources. The material weaknesses associated with the lessor accounting processes automation will not be remediated until the necessary controls have been implemented and are operating effectively. We do not know the specific time frame needed to fully remediate this material weakness. Implementing any appropriate changes to our internal controls and continuing to update and maintain internal controls may distract our officers and employees, entail substantial costs to implement new processes and modify our existing processes and take significant time to complete. If we fail to enhance our internal control over financial reporting to meet the demands that are placed upon us as a public company, including the requirements of the Sarbanes Oxley Act, we may be unable to report our financial results accurately, which could increase operating costs and harm our business, including investors perception of our business. The actions we plan to take are subject to continued management review supported by confirmation and testing, as well as audit committee oversight. While we expect to fully remediate the material weakness associated with the lease accounting process automation, we cannot assure you that we will be able to do so in a timely manner, which could impair our ability to report our financial results. 72 We or the third parties upon whom we depend may be adversely affected by earthquakes or other natural disasters and our business continuity and disaster recovery plans may not adequately protect us from a serious disaster. Some of our facilities are located in San Jose, California, which in the past has experienced both severe earthquakes and floods. We do not carry earthquake or flood insurance. Earthquakes or other natural disasters could severely disrupt our operations, and have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition and prospects. If a natural disaster, power outage or other event occurred that prevented us from using all or a significant portion of these facilities, that damaged critical infrastructure, such as our manufacturing resource planning for the ARTAS System and enterprise quality systems, or that otherwise disrupted operations, it may be difficult for us to achieve our growth strategy for our hair restoration business. The disaster recovery and business continuity plan we have in place are limited and are unlikely to prove adequate in the event of a serious disaster or similar event. We may incur substantial expenses because of the limited nature of our disaster recovery and business continuity plans, which, particularly when taken together with our lack of earthquake or flood insurance, could have a material adverse effect on our business. Furthermore, integral parties in our supply chain are similarly vulnerable to natural disasters or other sudden, unforeseen and severe adverse events. If such an event were to affect our supply chain, it could have a material adverse effect on our business. We may not be able to enforce in all of the jurisdictions in which we have employees covenants not to compete and therefore may be unable to prevent our competitors from benefiting from expertise of some of our former employees. We currently have non competition agreements with a majority of our employees. These agreements prohibit these employees, if they cease working for us, from directly competing with us or working for our competitors. We may not be able to enforce in all of the jurisdictions in which we have employee covenants not to compete and therefore may be unable to prevent our competitors from benefiting from expertise of some of our former employees. Our employees and independent contractors, including consultants, manufacturers, distributors, commercial collaborators, service providers and other vendors may engage in misconduct or other improper activities, including noncompliance with regulatory standards and requirements, which could have an adverse effect on our results of operations. We are exposed to the risk that our employees and independent contractors, including consultants, manufacturers, distributors, commercial collaborators, service providers and other vendors may engage in misconduct or other illegal activity. Misconduct by these parties could include intentional, reckless and or negligent conduct or other unauthorized activities that violate the laws and regulations of FDA and other similar regulatory bodies, including those laws that require the reporting of true, complete and accurate information to such regulatory bodies; manufacturing standards; U.S. federal and state healthcare fraud and abuse, data privacy laws and other similar non U.S. laws; or laws that require the true, complete and accurate reporting of financial information or data. Activities subject to these laws also involve the improper use or misrepresentation of information obtained in the course of clinical trials, the creation of fraudulent data in our nonclinical studies or clinical trials, or illegal misappropriation of product, which could result in regulatory sanctions and cause serious harm to our reputation. It is not always possible to identify and deter misconduct by employees and other third parties, and the precautions we take to detect and prevent this activity may not be effective in controlling unknown or unmanaged risks or losses or in protecting us from governmental investigations or other actions or lawsuits stemming from a failure to be in compliance with such laws or regulations. In addition, we are subject to the risk that a person or government could allege such fraud or other misconduct, even if n1 occurred. If any such actions are instituted against us, and we are not successful in defending ourselves or asserting our rights, those actions could have a significant impact on our business and financial results, including, without limitation, the imposition of significant civil, criminal and administrative penalties, damages, m1tary fines, disgorgements, individual imprisonment, other sanctions, contractual damages, reputational harm, diminished profits and future earnings and curtailment of our operations, any of which could adversely affect our ability to operate our business and our results of operations. 73 We may seek to acquire companies or technologies, which could disrupt our ongoing business, divert the attention of our management and employees and adversely affect our results of operations. We may, from time to time, evaluate potential strategic acquisitions of other complementary businesses, products or technologies, as well as consider joint ventures and other collaborative projects. We may not be able to identify suitable future acquisition candidates, consummate acquisitions on favorable terms or complete otherwise favorable acquisitions because of antitrust or other regulatory concerns. We cannot be certain that the acquisition of the NeoGraft business we completed in 2018 or our business combination with Venus Concept Ltd., which closed on November 7, 2019, or any future acquisitions that we may make, will enhance our business or strengthen our competitive position. In particular, we may encounter difficulties assimilating or integrating the acquired businesses, technologies, products, personnel or operations of the acquired companies, and in retaining and motivating key personnel from these businesses. The integration of these businesses may not result in the realization of the full benefits of synergies, cost savings, innovation and operational efficiencies that may be possible from this integration and these benefits may not be achieved within a reasonable period of time. Risks Related to Intellectual Property If we are unable to obtain, maintain, retain and enforce adequate intellectual property rights covering our products and any future products we develop, others may be able to make, use, or sell products that are substantially the same as our, which could adversely affect our ability to compete in the market. Our commercial success is dependent in part on obtaining, maintaining, retaining and enforcing our intellectual property rights, including our patents and the patents we exclusively licenses. If we are unable to obtain, maintain, retain and enforce sufficiently broad intellectual property protection covering our products and any other products we develop, others may be able to make, use, or sell products that are substantially the same as our products without incurring the sizeable development and licensing costs that we have incurred, which would adversely affect our ability to compete effectively in the market. We have obtained and maintained our existing patents, seek to diligently prosecute our existing patent applications, and seek to file patent applications and obtain additional patents and other intellectual property rights to restrict the ability of others to market products that compete with our current and future products. As of December 31, 2019, Venus Concept Ltd. patent portfolio was comprised of 8 issued U.S. patents (all of which cover our (MP) 2 technology that are associated with 2 different patent families), 7 pending U.S. patent applications, 1 pending U.S. provisional patent application, 12 issued foreign counterpart patents, and 11 pending foreign counterpart patent applications. As of December 31, 2019, Restoration Robotics patent portfolio was comprised of 94 issued U.S. patents, 11 pending U.S. patent applications, 123 issued foreign counterpart patents, and 28 pending foreign counterpart patent applications. However, patents may not be issued on any pending or future patent applications we file, the claims that issue may provide limited or no coverage of its products and technologies, and, moreover, issued patents owned or licensed to us now or in the future may be found by a court to be invalid or otherwise unenforceable at any time. We may choose to not apply for patent protection or may fail to apply for patent protection on important technologies or product candidates in a timely fashion. In addition, we may be unable to obtain patents necessary to protect our technology or products due to prior uses of or claims to similar processes or systems by third parties, or to blocking intellectual property owned by third parties. Even though we have issued patents, and even if additional patents are issued to us in the future, they may be challenged, narrowed, invalidated, held to be unenforceable or circumvented, which could limit our ability to prevent competitors from using similar technology or marketing similar products, or limit the length of time our technologies and products have patent protection. Also, even if our existing and future patents are determined to be valid and enforceable, they may not be drafted or interpreted sufficiently broadly enough to prevent others from marketing products and services similar to ours, by easily designing products around our patents or otherwise developing competing products or technologies. In addition, the ownership or inventorship of 1 or more of our patents and patent applications may be challenged by 1 or more parties in 1 or more jurisdictions, including in a patent interference or a derivation proceeding in the United States Patent and Trademark Office, or the USPTO, or a similar foreign governmental agency or during the course of a litigation. If a competitor were able to successfully design around our patents, we may not be able to block such competition, and furthermore the competitor products may be more effective or commercially successful than its products. In addition, our current patents will eventually expire or they may otherwise cease to provide meaningful competitive advantage, and we may be unable to adequately develop new technologies and obtain future patent protection to preserve our competitive advantage or avoid other adverse effects on our business. 74 We have a number of foreign patent applications, and while we generally try to pursue patent protection in the jurisdictions in which we do or intend to do significant business, the filing, prosecuting, maintaining and defending patents relating to our current or future products in all countries throughout the world would be prohibitively expensive. Furthermore, the laws of some foreign jurisdictions do not protect intellectual property rights to the same extent as laws in the U.S., and many companies have encountered significant difficulties in obtaining, protecting, and defending such rights in foreign jurisdictions. As a result, our intellectual property may not provide us with sufficient rights to exclude others from commercializing products similar or identical to its products in various jurisdictions. Competitors may use our technologies in jurisdictions where we have not obtained patent protection to develop their own products, and we may be unable to prevent such competitors from importing those infringing products into territories where we do not have patent protection or into territories where we do have patent protection but there is no prohibition against such importation, or even if such prohibitions exist, the law or related enforcement is not as strong as in the U.S. These products may compete with our systems and our patents and our other intellectual property rights may not be effective or sufficient to prevent competitors from competing in those jurisdictions. If we encounter such difficulties or are otherwise precluded from effectively protecting and enforcing our intellectual property rights in foreign jurisdictions, our business prospects could be substantially harmed. Our patents may not afford us protection against competitors with similar technology. Because the systems of obtaining patent rights in the U.S. and many foreign jurisdictions mandate that the first filer of a patent application is the only 1 that may be awarded patent rights related to the invention disclosed therein, and there may be a delay up to eighteen months after filing for the patent applications of others to become public (or, in some cases, are not published until they issue as patents), we cannot be certain that we were the first to file for protection of the inventions set forth in such patent applications. Another party may own patents, may have filed or may in the future file patent applications which may result in issued patents, covering our systems or technology. Third party patent applications and patents could significantly reduce the scope of protection of patents owned by or licensed to us and limit our ability to obtain a meaningful scope of patent protection or market and sell our products or develop, market and sell future products. In the U.S., other parties may attack the validity of our patents after they issue, in a court proceeding, or in an ex parte reexamination proceeding or 1 or more post grant procedures that were authorized under the America Invents Act of 2011, that were available commencing on March 16, 2013 such as post grant review, covered business method review or inter partes review, in front of the Patent Trial and Appeal Board of the USPTO. The costs of these proceedings could be substantial. Additionally, patents and patent applications owned by third parties may prevent us from pursuing certain opportunities such as entering into specific markets or developing certain products. Finally, we may choose to enter into markets in which certain competitors own patents or control patent rights to technology that may impede our ability to compete effectively. We may in the future become involved in lawsuits to defend ourselves against intellectual property disputes, which could be expensive and time consuming, and ultimately unsuccessful, and could result in the diversion of significant resources, and hinder our ability to commercialize our existing or future products. Our success depends in part on not infringing the patents or not violating other intellectual property rights of others. Intellectual property disputes can be costly to defend and may cause our business, operating results and financial condition to suffer. Significant litigation regarding patent rights occurs in the medical technology and aesthetic product industries. Whether merited or not, it is possible that U.S. and foreign patents and pending patent applications controlled by third parties may be alleged to cover our products. We may also face allegations that our employees have misappropriated the intellectual property rights of their former employers or other third parties. Our competitors in both the U.S. and abroad, many of which have substantially greater resources and have made substantial investments in patent portfolios and competing technologies, may have applied for or obtained or may in the future apply for and obtain, patents that will prevent, limit, or otherwise interfere with our ability to make, use, sell, and or export our products. Our competitors may have 1 or more patents for which they can threaten and or initiate patent infringement actions against us and or any of our third party suppliers. Our ability to defend ourselves and or our third party suppliers may be limited by our financial and human resources, the availability of reasonable defenses, and the ultimate acceptance of our defenses by the courts or juries. Furthermore, if such patents are successfully asserted against us, this may result in an adverse impact on our business, including injunctions, damages, and or attorneys fees. From time to time and in the ordinary course of business, we may develop noninfringement and or invalidity positions with respect to third party patents, which may or not be ultimately adjudicated as successful by a judge or jury if such patents were asserted against us. 75 We may receive in the future, particularly as a public company, communications from patent holders, including non practicing entities, alleging infringement of patents or other intellectual property rights or misappropriation of trade secrets, or offering licenses to such intellectual property. Any claims that we assert against perceived infringers could also provoke these parties to assert counterclaims against us alleging that we infringe their intellectual property rights. At any given time, we may be involved as either a plaintiff or a defendant in a number of patent infringement actions, the outcomes of which may not be known for prolonged periods of time. The large number of patents, the rapid rate of new patent applications and issuances, the complexities of the technologies involved, and the uncertainty of litigation significantly increase the risks related to any patent litigation. Any potential intellectual property litigation also could force us to do 1 or more of the following stop selling, making, using, or exporting products that use the disputed intellectual property; obtain a license from the intellectual property owner to continue selling, making, exporting, or using products, which license may require substantial royalty payments and may not be available on reasonable terms, or at all; incur significant legal expenses; pay substantial damages or royalties to the party whose intellectual property rights we may be found to be infringing, potentially including treble damages if the court finds that the infringement was willful; if a license is available from a third party, we may have to pay substantial royalties, upfront fees or grant cross licenses to intellectual property rights for our products and services; pay the attorney fees and costs of litigation to the party whose intellectual property rights we may be found to be infringing; find non infringing substitute products, which could be costly and create significant delay due to the need for FDA regulatory and other regulatory clearance; find alternative supplies for infringing products or processes, which could be costly and create significant delay due to the need for FDA regulatory clearance; and or redesign those products or processes that infringe any third party intellectual property, which could be costly, disruptive, and or infeasible. From time to time, we may be subject to legal proceedings and claims in the ordinary course of business with respect to intellectual property. Even if resolved in our favor, litigation or other legal proceedings relating to intellectual property claims may cause us to incur significant expenses and could distract our technical and management personnel from their normal responsibilities. In addition, there could be public announcements of the results of hearings, motions or other interim proceedings or developments, and if securities analysts or investors perceive these results to be negative, it could have a material adverse effect on the price of our Common Stock. Finally, any uncertainties resulting from the initiation and continuation of any litigation could have a material adverse effect on our ability to raise the funds necessary to continue our operations. If any of the foregoing occurs, we may have to withdraw existing products from the market or may be unable to commercialize 1 or more of our products, all of which could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations and financial condition. Any litigation or claim against us, even those without merit, may cause us to incur substantial costs, and could place a significant strain on our financial resources, divert the attention of management from our core business and harm our reputation. Furthermore, as the number of participants in the medical aesthetic and robotic hair restoration surgery market grows, the possibility of intellectual property infringement claims against us increases. 76 In addition, we may indemnify our customers, suppliers and international distributors against claims relating to the infringement of the intellectual property rights of third parties relating to our products, methods, and or manufacturing processes. Third parties may assert infringement claims against our customers, suppliers, or distributors. These claims may require us to initiate or defend protracted and costly litigation on behalf of our customers, suppliers or distributors, regardless of the merits of these claims. If any of these claims succeed, we may be forced to pay damages on behalf of our customers, suppliers, or distributors or may be required to obtain licenses for the products they use. If we cannot obtain all necessary licenses on commercially reasonable terms, our customers may be forced to stop using our products, or our suppliers may be forced to stop providing us with products. Similarly, interference or derivation proceedings provoked by third parties or brought by the USPTO or any foreign patent authority may challenge the priority of inventions or other matters of inventorship with respect to our patents or patent applications. We may also become involved in other proceedings, such as re examination or opposition proceedings, before the USPTO or its foreign counterparts relating to our intellectual property or the intellectual property rights of others. An unfavorable outcome in any such proceedings could require us to cease using the related technology or to attempt to license rights to it from the prevailing party or could cause us to lose valuable intellectual property rights. Our business could be harmed if the prevailing party does not offer us a license on commercially reasonable terms, if any license is offered at all. Litigation or other proceedings may fail and, even if successful, may result in substantial costs and distract our management and other employees. We may also become involved in disputes with others regarding the ownership of intellectual property rights. For example, we may in the future jointly develop intellectual property with certain parties, and disagreements may therefore arise as to the ownership of the intellectual property developed pursuant to these future relationships. If we are unable to resolve these disputes, we could lose valuable intellectual property rights. The legal determinations relating to patent rights afforded to companies in the medical technology and aesthetic product fields can be uncertain and involve complex legal, factual and scientific questions, sometimes involving important legal principles which remain uncertain or unresolved, and such uncertainty could affect the outcome or intellectual property related legal determinations in which we are involved. Both the U.S. Supreme Court and the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Federal Circuit have made, and will likely continue to make, changes in how the patent laws of the U.S. are interpreted. Similarly, foreign courts have made, and will likely continue to make, changes in how the patent laws in their respective jurisdictions are interpreted. In addition, the U.S. Congress is currently considering legislation that would change certain provisions of U.S. federal patent law. We cannot predict future changes U.S. and foreign courts may make in the interpretation of patent laws or changes to patent laws which might be enacted into law by U.S. and foreign legislative bodies. Those changes may materially affect our patent rights, and our ability to obtain patents in the future. The Leahy Smith America Invents Act, or the Leahy Smith Act, includes a number of significant changes to U.S. patent law. These include provisions that affect the way patent applications are prosecuted and also affect patent litigation. The USPTO recently developed new regulations and procedures to govern administration of the Leahy Smith Act, and many of the substantive changes to patent law associated with the Leahy Smith Act, and in particular, the first to file provisions, which became effective on March 16, 2013 The first to file provisions limit the rights of an inventor to patent an invention if not the first to file an application for patenting that invention, even if such invention was the first invention. Accordingly, it is not clear what, if any, impact the Leahy Smith Act will have on the operation of our business. However, the Leahy Smith Act and its implementation could increase the uncertainties and costs surrounding the enforcement and defense of our issued patents. For example, the Leahy Smith Act provides that an administrative tribunal known as the Patent Trial and Appeals Board, or PTAB, provides a venue for challenging the validity of patents at a cost that may be lower than district court litigation and on timelines that are much faster. Although it is not clear what, if any, long term impact the PTAB proceedings will have on the operation of our business, the initial results of patent challenge proceedings before the PTAB since its inception in 2013 have resulted in the invalidation of many U.S. patent claims. The availability of the PTAB as a lower cost, faster and potentially more potent tribunal for challenging patents could increase the likelihood that our own patents will be challenged, thereby increasing the uncertainties and costs of maintaining and enforcing them. 77 The protection for our proprietary developments is uncertain because legal means may afford only limited protection and may not adequately protect our rights or permit us to gain or keep our competitive advantage arising from our proprietary developments, which could adversely affect our financial condition and results of operations. For example, any of the following could occur others may be able to make systems or devices that are similar to ours but that are not covered by the claims of our patents; others may assert that we were not the first to make the inventions covered by our issued patents or pending patent applications; our pending patent applications may not result in issued patents or obtain the coverage originally sought; any of our present or future patents or patent claims or other intellectual property rights may lapse or be invalidated, rendered unenforceable, circumvented, challenged or aband1d; we may not have, or may fail to obtain, patents in all jurisdictions in which our products are sold or in which systems or devices that are similar to ours are made or sold by third parties; our issued patents may not provide us with any competitive advantages; the claims of our issued patents or patent applications when issued may not cover our products or the future products we develop; there may be dominating or blocking patents of which we are not aware that are relevant to our technologies, including our controlled cooling technology; our ability to assert our intellectual property rights against potential competitors or to settle current or future disputes may be limited by our agreements with third parties, financial constraints, market realities, competitive concerns or other factors; there may be prior public disclosures of which we are not aware that could invalidate our inventions or place some of our intellectual property in the public domain; the laws of foreign countries may not protect our proprietary rights to the same extent as the laws of the U.S.; our intellectual property rights may not be enforceable in jurisdictions where competition may be intense or where legal protection may be weak and the outcomes are uncertain; and we may not develop additional proprietary products that are patentable. From time to time, we analyze our competitors products and services, and may in the future seek to enforce our patents or other rights to counter perceived infringement. In order to preserve and enforce our patent and other intellectual property rights, we may need to make claims or file lawsuits against third parties. Such lawsuits can be expensive and time consuming and could divert our efforts and attention from other aspects of our business. In addition, in an infringement proceeding, a court may decide that the patent we seek to enforce is invalid or unenforceable, or may refuse to stop the other party from using the technology at issue on the grounds that the patent in question does not cover products accused of infringement. An adverse result in any litigation also could put 1 or more of our patents at risk of being interpreted more narrowly than previously thought. Similarly, some of our competitors are very large companies that may be able to devote significantly more resources to intellectual property litigation, and may have significantly broader patent portfolios to assert against us if we assert our rights against them. Finally, because of the substantial discovery required in connection with intellectual property litigation in the U.S., substantial burden could be placed on us relating to discovery activities and related costs associated with intellectual property litigation. 78 Prosecution of patent applications, post grant opposition proceedings, and litigation to establish the validity, enforceability, and scope of patents, assert patent infringement claims against others or defend against patent infringement claims by others are expensive and time consuming. There can be no assurance that, in the event that claims of any of our patents are challenged by 1 or more third parties, any court or patent authority ruling on such challenge will determine that such patent claims are valid and enforceable. An adverse outcome in such litigation or post grant proceeding could cause us to lose associated patent rights and may have a material adverse effect on our business. Obtaining and maintaining patent protection depends on compliance with various procedural, document submission, fee payment and other requirements imposed by governmental patent agencies, and our patent protection could be reduced or eliminated for non compliance with these requirements. The USPTO and various foreign governmental patent agencies require compliance with a number of procedural, documentary, fee payment, and other similar provisions during the patent application process. In addition, periodic maintenance fees on issued patents often must be paid to the USPTO and foreign patent agencies over the lifetime of the patent. While an unintentional lapse can in many cases be cured by payment of a late fee or by other means in accordance with the applicable rules, there are situations in which noncompliance can result in abandonment or lapse of the patent or patent application, resulting in partial or complete loss of patent rights in the relevant jurisdiction. Non compliance events that could result in abandonment or lapse of a patent or patent application include, but are not limited to, failure to respond to official actions within prescribed time limits, non payment of fees and failure to properly legalize and submit formal documents. If we fail to maintain the patents and patent applications covering our products or procedures, we may not be able to stop a competitor from marketing products that are the same as or similar to our own, which would have a material adverse effect on our business. We may not be able to adequately protect our intellectual property rights throughout the world. Filing, prosecuting and defending patents on our products in all countries throughout the world would be prohibitively expensive. The requirements for patentability may differ in certain countries, particularly developing countries, and the breadth of patent claims allowed can be inconsistent. In addition, the laws of some foreign countries may not protect our intellectual property rights to the same extent as laws in the U.S. Consequently, we may not be able to prevent third parties from practicing our inventions in all countries outside the U.S. Competitors may use our technologies in jurisdictions where we have not obtained patent protection to develop their own products and, furthermore, may export otherwise infringing products to territories in which we have patent protection that may not be sufficient to terminate infringing activities. We do not have patent rights in certain foreign countries in which a market may exist. Moreover, in foreign jurisdictions where we do have patent rights, proceedings to enforce such rights could result in substantial costs and divert our efforts and attention from other aspects of our business, could put our patents at risk of being invalidated or interpreted narrowly, and our patent applications at risk of not issuing. Additionally, such proceedings could provoke third parties to assert claims against us. We may not prevail in any lawsuits that we initiate, and the damages or other remedies awarded, if any, may not be commercially meaningful. Thus, we may not be able to stop a competitor from marketing and selling in foreign countries products that are the same as or similar to our products, and our competitive position in the international market would be harmed. Unauthorized use of our intellectual property may have occurred or may occur in the future. Any failure to detect or identify unauthorized use of, and otherwise adequately protect, our intellectual property could adversely affect our business, including by reducing the demand for our products. Unauthorized use of our intellectual property may have occurred or may occur in the future. Any reverse engineered or counterfeit products that purport to be our systems that are currently in the market or that may be introduced in the future may harm our reputation and our sale of products. Moreover, if we commence litigation to stop or prevent any unauthorized use of our technology that occurs from reverse engineering or counterfeiting of our products, or if we have to defend allegations of such unauthorized use of a third party technology, such litigation would be time consuming, force us to incur significant costs and divert our attention and the efforts of its management and other employees. 79 We depend on certain technologies that are licensed to us. We do not control these technologies and any loss of our rights to them could prevent us from selling our products. We are dependent on intellectual property license agreements for certain key technology for which we pay royalty fees. We do not own the patents that underlie our licenses. Our rights to use the technology we license are subject to the negotiation of, continuation of and compliance with the terms of those licenses. In some cases, we do not control the prosecution, maintenance, or filing of the patents to which we hold licenses, or the enforcement of these patents against third parties. These patents and patent applications are not written by us or our advisors, and we did not have control over the drafting and prosecution. Our licensors might not have given the same attention to the drafting and prosecution of these patents and applications as we would have if we had been the owners of the patents and applications and had control over the drafting and prosecution. We cannot be certain that drafting and or prosecution of the licensed patents and patent applications by the licensors have been or will be conducted in compliance with applicable laws and regulations or will result in valid and enforceable patents and other intellectual property rights. Our intellectual property agreements with third parties may be subject to disagreements over contract interpretation, which could narrow the scope of our rights to the relevant intellectual property or technology or increase our financial or other obligations to our licensors. Certain provisions in our intellectual property agreements may be susceptible to multiple interpretations. The resolution of any contract interpretation disagreement that may arise could affect the scope of our rights to the relevant intellectual property or technology or affect financial or other obligations under the relevant agreement, either of which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects. In addition, while it is our policy to require our employees and contractors who may be involved in the conception or development of intellectual property to execute agreements assigning such intellectual property to us, we may be unsuccessful in executing such an agreement with each party who in fact conceives or develops intellectual property that we regard as our own. Our assignment agreements may not be self executing or may be breached, and we may be forced to bring claims against third parties, or defend claims they may bring against us, to determine the ownership of what we regard as our intellectual property. We may be subject to damages resulting from claims that we or our employees have wrongfully used or disclosed alleged trade secrets of our competitors or are in breach of non competition or non solicitation agreements with our competitors. We could in the future be subject to claims that we or our employees have inadvertently or otherwise used or disclosed alleged trade secrets or other proprietary information of former employers or competitors. Although we have procedures in place that seek to prevent our employees and consultants from using the intellectual property, proprietary information, know how or trade secrets of others in their work for us, we may in the future be subjected to claims that we caused an employee to breach the terms of his or her non competition or non solicitation agreement, or that we or these individuals have, inadvertently or otherwise, used or disclosed the alleged trade secrets or other proprietary information of a former employer or competitor. Litigation may be necessary to defend against these claims. Even if we are successful in defending against these claims, litigation could result in substantial costs and could be a distraction to management. If our defense to those claims fails, in addition to paying m1tary damages, a court could prohibit us from using technologies or functionalities that are essential to our products, if such technologies or functionalities are found to incorporate or be derived from the trade secrets or other proprietary information of the former employers. An inability to incorporate technologies or functionalities that are important or essential to our products would have a material adverse effect on our business and may prevent us from selling our products or from practicing our processes. In addition, we may lose valuable intellectual property rights or personnel. Moreover, any such litigation or the threat thereof may adversely affect our ability to hire employees or contract with independent sales representatives. A loss of key personnel or their work product could hamper or prevent our ability to commercialize our products, which could have an adverse effect on our business, results of operations and financial condition. 80 If our trademarks and trade names are not adequately protected, then we may not be able to build name recognition in our markets of interest and our business may be adversely affected. We have trademark registrations and applications in the U.S. and also in certain foreign countries for Venus Concept, Venus Viva , Venus Versa , Venus Freeze , Venus Legacy , Venus Bliss , NeoGraft , (MP) 2 , Restoration Robotics, ARTAS , and ARTAS iX. Actions taken by us to establish and protect our trademarks might not prevent imitation of our products or services, infringement of our trademark rights by unauthorized parties or other challenges to our ownership or validity of our trademarks. If any of these events occur, we may not be able to protect and enforce our rights in these trademarks, which we need in order to build name recognition with potential partners or customers in our markets of interest. In addition, unauthorized third parties may have registered trademarks similar and identical to our trademarks in foreign jurisdictions or may in the future file for registration of such trademarks. If they succeed in registering or developing common law rights in such trademarks, and if we were not successful in challenging such third party rights, we may not be able to use such trademarks to market our products and services in those countries. If we are unable to register our trademarks, enforce our trademarks, or bar a third party from registering or using a trademark, our ability to establish name recognition based on our trademarks and compete effectively in our markets of interest may be adversely affected. In addition, our enforcement against third party infringers or violators may be expensive and time consuming, and the outcome is unpredictable and may not provide an adequate remedy. If we are unable to protect the confidentiality of our proprietary information and know how, the value of our technology and products could be adversely affected. We rely on trade secret protection to protect our interests in proprietary know how and processes for which, for example, patents are difficult or impossible to obtain or enforce, or which we believe would be best protected by means that do not result in public disclosure. We may not be able to protect our trade secrets adequately. We have limited control over the protection of trade secrets used by our third party manufacturers and suppliers and could lose future trade secret protection if any unauthorized disclosure of such information occurs. Although we use reasonable efforts to protect our trade secrets, our employees, consultants, contractors and outside scientific advisors may unintentionally or willfully disclose our proprietary information to competitors. Litigating a claim that a third party illegally obtained and is using any of our trade secrets is expensive and time consuming, and the outcome is unpredictable. In addition, courts outside the U.S. are sometimes less willing to protect trade secrets. We rely, in part, on non disclosure and confidentiality agreements with our employees, consultants and other parties to protect our trade secrets and other proprietary technology. These agreements generally require that all confidential information developed by the individual or made known to the individual by us during the course of the individual relationship with us be kept confidential and not be disclosed to third parties. However, we may fail to enter into the necessary agreements, and even if entered into, these agreements may be of limited duration or may be breached and we may not have adequate remedies for any unauthorized use or disclosure of our confidential information. Moreover, others may independently and legitimately develop equivalent trade secrets or other proprietary information. In addition, if third parties are able to establish that we are using their proprietary information without their permission, we may be required to obtain a license to that information, or if such a license is not available, re design our products to avoid any such unauthorized use or permanently stop manufacturing and selling the related products. We could in the future be subject to claims that we or our employees have intentionally or inadvertently used or disclosed alleged trade secrets or other proprietary information of former employers or competitors. Although we have procedures in place that seek to prevent our employees and consultants from using the intellectual property, proprietary information, know how or trade secrets of others in their work for us, we may in the future be subject to claims that we caused an employee to breach the terms of his or her non disclosure obligations under 1 or more agreements, or that we or these individuals have, inadvertently or intentionally used or disclosed the alleged trade secrets or other proprietary information of a former employer or competitor. Litigation may be necessary to defend against these claims. Even if we are successful in defending against these claims, any such litigation could result in substantial costs and could be a distraction to management. If our defense to those claims fails, in addition to paying m1tary damages, a court could prohibit it from using technologies or functionalities that are essential to our systems. An inability to incorporate technologies or functionalities that are important or essential to our systems could have a material adverse effect on our business and may prevent us from selling our products or from practicing our processes. In addition, we may lose valuable intellectual property rights or personnel. Moreover, any such litigation or corresponding threat may adversely affect our ability to retain or hire employees or contract with independent sales representatives. A loss of key personnel could hamper or prevent our ability to commercialize our products, which could have an adverse effect on our business, results of operations and financial condition. 81 We also rely on physical and electronic security measures to protect our proprietary information, but these security measures may be breached or may not provide adequate protection for our property. There is a risk that third parties may obtain and improperly utilize our proprietary trade secrets or other proprietary information to our competitive disadvantage. We may not be able to detect or prevent the unauthorized access or use of such information or take appropriate and timely steps to enforce our intellectual property rights. We may become subject to claims for remuneration for service invention rights by our employees, which could result in litigation and adversely affect our business. A significant portion of our intellectual property has been developed by our employees based in Israel in the course of their employment for Venus Concept Ltd. Under the Israeli Patent Law, 5727 1967, or the Patent Law, inventions conceived by employees during and within the scope of employment with an employer are regarded as service inventions, which belong to the employer, absent a specific agreement between the employee and employer giving the employee service invention rights. The Patent Law also provides that if there is no agreement between an employer and an employee with respect to the employee right to receive compensation for such service inventions, the Israeli Compensation and Royalties Committee, a body constituted under the Patent Law, shall determine whether the employee is entitled to remuneration for his or her service inventions and the scope and conditions for remuneration. While Venus Concept Ltd. employees have generally explicitly waived their right to any additional compensation for their contribution to service invention rights, certain current or former employees may not have signed such waivers, and we may face claims from current or former employees demanding remuneration in consideration for Venus Concept Ltd. employees contribution to service invention rights, which may lead to future litigation, which could be costly and could divert management attention and we could be required to pay such remuneration. Indemnification obligations for third party intellectual property claims may increase our costs or require it to cease selling certain products, which could adversely affect our financial condition and results of operations. We may be subject to indemnification claim obligations with respect to our intellectual property rights pursuant to its agreements with our customers. Such indemnification provisions are customary in the industry. Successful claims of infringement or misappropriation by a third party against us or a customer or other third party that we indemnify could not only prevent us from distributing certain products or performing certain services, but could also require us to pay substantial damages, royalties, legal fees or other fees. Risks Related to Government Regulation Our devices and our operations are subject to extensive government regulation and oversight both in the U.S. and abroad, and our failure to comply with applicable requirements could harm our business. Certain of our systems are regulated as medical devices subject to extensive regulation in the U.S. and elsewhere, including by FDA and its foreign counterparts. FDA and foreign regulatory agencies regulate, among other things, with respect to medical devices design, development and manufacturing; testing, labeling, content and language of instructions for use and storage; clinical trials; product safety; marketing, sales and distribution; premarket clearance and approval; record keeping procedures; advertising and promotion; recalls and field safety corrective actions; post market surveillance, including reporting of deaths or serious injuries and malfunctions that, if they were to recur, could lead to death or serious injury; post market approval studies; and product import and export. 82 The regulations to which we are subject are complex and have tended to become more stringent over time. Regulatory changes could result in restrictions on our ability to carry on or expand our operations, higher than anticipated costs or lower than anticipated sales. In the U.S., before we can market a new medical device, or a new use of, new claim for or significant modification to an existing product, we must first receive either clearance under Section 510(k) of the FDCA or approval of a PMA application from FDA, unless an exemption applies. We consider our Venus Glow and NeoGraft systems exempt from FDA 510(k) clearance requirement. We have obtained 510(k) clearance from FDA for Venus Concept Freeze and Venus Freeze Plus, Venus Viva SR, Venus Legacy BX and Legacy CX, Venus Versa , Venus Velocity , Venus Heal , Venus Bliss systems, ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems. In the 510(k) clearance process, before a device may be marketed, FDA must determine that a proposed device is substantially equivalent to a legally marketed predicate device, which includes a device that has been previously cleared through the 510(k) process, a device that was legally marketed prior to May 28, 1976 (pre amendments device), a device that was originally on the U.S. market pursuant to a PMA application and later down classified, or a 510(k) exempt device. To be substantially equivalent, the proposed device must have the same intended use as the predicate device, and either have the same technological characteristics as the predicate device or have different technological characteristics and not raise different questions of safety or effectiveness than the predicate device. Clinical data are sometimes required to support substantial equivalence. If a product is not eligible for 510(k) clearance it may require approval of a de novo reclassification petition or a PMA. If there is no known predicate for a device, a company can request a de novo reclassification of the product. FDA de novo process allows a company to request for certain new devices marketing authorization as class I or class II devices, rather than being subject to PMA requirements as class III devices. In the PMA process, FDA must determine that a proposed device is safe and effective for its intended use based, in part, on extensive data, including, but not limited to, technical, preclinical, human clinical studies conducted under an IDE, and manufacturing and labeling data. The PMA process is typically required for devices that are deemed to pose the greatest risk, such as life sustaining, life supporting or implantable devices. Modifications to products that are approved through a PMA application generally require FDA approval. Similarly, certain modifications made to products cleared through a 510(k) may require a new 510(k) clearance. Both the PMA approval and the 510(k) clearance process can be expensive, lengthy and uncertain. FDA 510(k) clearance process usually takes from 3 to 12 months, but can take longer. For products subject to PMA, the regulatory process generally takes from 1 to 3 years or even longer, from the time the application is filed with FDA and involves substantially greater risks and commitment of resources than either the 510(k) clearance or de novo processes. We may not be able to obtain necessary regulatory approvals or clearances on a timely basis, if at all, for any of our products under development, and delays in receipt of, or failure to receive such approvals or clearances could have a material adverse effect on our business. In addition, FDA may disagree with certain of our device classifications. Such a misclassification could render the devices as misbranded and or adulterated. FDA can delay, limit or deny clearance or approval of a device for many reasons, including we may not be able to demonstrate to FDA satisfaction that the product or modification is substantially equivalent to the proposed predicate device or safe and effective for its intended use; the data from our pre clinical studies and clinical trials may be insufficient to support clearance or approval, where required; and the manufacturing process or facilities we use may not meet applicable requirements. FDA and other regulatory authorities policies may change, and additional government regulations may be enacted that could prevent, limit or delay regulatory approval of our products. For example, in December 2016, the 21st Century Cures Act, or Cures Act, was signed into law. The Cures Act, among other things, is intended to modernize the regulation of medical devices and spur innovation, but its ultimate implementation remains unclear. If we are slow or unable to adapt to changes in existing requirements or the adoption of new requirements or policies, or if we are not able to maintain regulatory compliance, we may fail to obtain any marketing clearances or approvals, lose any marketing clearance or approval that we may have obtained, and we may not achieve or sustain profitability. 83 We also cannot predict the likelihood, nature or extent of government regulation that may arise from future legislation or administrative action, either in the U.S. or abroad. For example, certain policies of the Trump administration may impact our business and industry. Namely, the Trump administration has taken several executive actions, including the issuance of several Executive Orders, that could impose significant burdens on, or otherwise materially delay, FDA ability to engage in routine regulatory and oversight activities such as implementing statutes through rulemaking, issuance of guidance, and review and approval of marketing applications. Notably, on January 30, 2017, President Trump issued an Executive Order, applicable to all executive agencies including FDA, requiring that for each notice of proposed rulemaking or final regulation issued in fiscal year 2017, the agency had to identify at least 2 existing regulations to be repealed, unless prohibited by law. These requirements are referred to as the 2 for 1 provisions. This Executive Order includes a budget neutrality provision that required the total incremental cost of all new regulations in the 2017 fiscal year, including repealed regulations, to be no greater than zero, except in limited circumstances. For fiscal years 2018 and beyond, the Executive Order requires agencies to identify regulations to offset any incremental cost of a new regulation and approximate the total costs or savings associated with each new regulation or repealed regulation. In interim guidance issued by the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs within OMB on February 2, 2017, the administration indicates that the 2 for 1 provisions may apply not only to agency regulations, but also to significant agency guidance documents. In addition, on February 24, 2017, President Trump issued an executive order directing each affected agency to designate an agency official as a Regulatory Reform Officer and establish a Regulatory Reform Task Force to implement the 2 for 1 provisions and other previously issued executive orders relating to the review of federal regulations, however it is difficult to predict how these requirements will be implemented, and the extent to which they will impact FDA ability to exercise its regulatory authority. If these executive actions impose constraints on FDA ability to engage in oversight and implementation activities in the normal course, our business may be negatively impacted. Even after we have obtained the proper regulatory clearance or approval to market a product, we have ongoing responsibilities under FDA regulations. The failure to comply with applicable regulations could jeopardize our ability to sell our systems and result in enforcement actions such as warning letters; fines; injunctions; civil penalties; debarment; termination of distribution; recalls or seizures of products; delays in the introduction of products into the market; total or partial suspension of production; refusal to grant future clearances or approvals; withdrawals or suspensions of current clearances or approvals, resulting in prohibitions on sales of our product or products; and in the most serious cases, criminal penalties. Any of these sanctions could result in higher than anticipated costs or lower than anticipated sales and harm our reputation, business, financial condition and results of operations. We are subject to extensive governmental regulation in foreign jurisdictions, such as Europe, and our failure to comply with applicable requirements could cause our business to suffer. We must maintain regulatory approval in foreign jurisdictions in which we plan to market and sell our systems. In the European Economic Area or the EEA, manufacturers of medical devices need to comply with the Essential Requirements laid down in Annex II to the EU Medical Devices Directive (Council Directive 93 42 EEC). Compliance with these requirements is a prerequisite to be able to affix the CE mark to medical devices, without which they cannot be marketed or sold in the EEA. To demonstrate compliance with the Essential Requirements and obtain the right to affix the CE Mark, manufacturers of medical devices must undergo a conformity assessment procedure, which varies according to the type of medical device and its classification. Except for low risk medical devices (Class I with no measuring function and which are not sterile), where the manufacturer can issue an EC Declaration of Conformity based on a self assessment of the conformity of its products with the Essential Requirements, a conformity assessment procedure requires the intervention of a Notified Body, which is an organization designated by a competent authority of an EEA country to conduct conformity assessments. 84 Depending on the relevant conformity assessment procedure, the Notified Body would audit and examine the Technical File and the quality system for the manufacture, design and final inspection of our devices. The Notified Body issues a CE Certificate of Conformity following successful completion of a conformity assessment procedure conducted in relation to the medical device and its manufacturer and their conformity with the Essential Requirements. This Certificate entitles the manufacturer to affix the CE mark to its medical devices after having prepared and signed a related EC Declaration of Conformity. As a rule, demonstration of conformity of medical devices and their manufacturers with the Essential Requirements must be based, among other things, on the evaluation of clinical data supporting the safety and performance of the products during normal conditions of use. Specifically, a manufacturer must demonstrate that the device achieves its intended performance during normal conditions of use and that the known and foreseeable risks, and any adverse events, are minimized and acceptable when weighed against the benefits of its intended performance, and that any claims made about the performance and safety of the device (e.g., product labeling and instructions for use) are supported by suitable evidence. This assessment must be based on clinical data, which can be obtained from (1) clinical studies conducted on the devices being assessed, (2) scientific literature from similar devices whose equivalence with the assessed device can be demonstrated or (3) both clinical studies and scientific literature. With respect to active implantable medical devices or Class III devices, the manufacturer must conduct clinical studies to obtain the required clinical data, unless reliance on existing clinical data from equivalent devices can be justified. The conduct of clinical studies in the EEA is governed by detailed regulatory obligations. These may include the requirement of prior authorization by the competent authorities of the country in which the study takes place and the requirement to obtain a positive opinion from a competent Ethics Committee. This process can be expensive and time consuming. On April 5, 2017, the European Parliament passed the Medical Devices Regulation, which repeals and replaces the EU Medical Devices Directive. Unlike directives, which must be implemented into the national laws of the EEA member States, the regulations would be directly applicable, i.e., without the need for adoption of EEA member State laws implementing them, in all EEA member States and are intended to eliminate current differences in the regulation of medical devices among EEA member States. The Medical Devices Regulation, among other things, is intended to establish a uniform, transparent, predictable and sustainable regulatory framework across the EEA for medical devices and in vitro diagnostic devices and ensure a high level of safety and health while supporting innovation. The Medical Devices Regulation will however only become applicable 3 years after publication. Once applicable, the new regulations will among other things strengthen the rules on placing devices on the market and reinforce surveillance once they are available; establish explicit provisions on manufacturers responsibilities for the follow up of the quality, performance and safety of devices placed on the market; improve the traceability of medical devices throughout the supply chain to the end user or patient through a unique identification number; set up a central database to provide patients, healthcare professionals and the public with comprehensive information on products available in the EU; and strengthen rules for the assessment of certain high risk devices, such as implants, which may have to undergo an additional check by experts before they are placed on the market. These modifications may have an impact on the way we conduct our business in the EEA. 85 We are subject to governmental regulation and other legal obligations, particularly related to privacy, data protection and information security, which are complex and rapidly changing. Our actual or perceived failure to comply with such obligations could harm our business. We are subject to diverse laws and regulations relating to data privacy and security, including, in the U.S., the HIPAA, and, in the EU and shortly in the EEA, GDPR. New global privacy rules are being enacted and existing 1s are being updated and strengthened. Complying with these numerous, complex and often changing regulations is expensive and difficult, and failure to comply with any privacy laws or data security laws or any security incident or breach involving the misappropriation, loss or other unauthorized use or disclosure of sensitive or confidential patient or consumer information, whether by us, 1 of our business associates or another third party, could have a material adverse effect on our business, reputation, financial condition and results of operations, including but not limited to material fines and penalties; damages; litigation; consent orders; and injunctive relief. The regulation of data privacy and security, and the protection of the confidentiality of personal information, is increasing and continues to evolve. For example, the GDPR came into effect in May 2018 reforming the European regime. The GDPR implements more stringent operational requirements than its predecessor legislation. For example, the GDPR requires us to make more detailed disclosures to data subjects, requires disclosure of the legal basis on which we can process personal data, makes it harder for us to obtain valid consent for processing, provides more robust rights for data subjects, introduces mandatory data breach notification through the EU, imposes additional obligations on us when contracting with service providers and requires us to adopt appropriate privacy governance including policies, procedures, training and data audit. If we do not comply with our obligations under the GDPR, we could be exposed to fines of up to the higher of 20,000,000 Euros or up to 4% of our total worldwide annual turnover in the event of a significant breach. In addition, we may be the subject of litigation and or adverse publicity, which could have material adverse effect on our reputation and business. We are also subject to evolving European laws on data export and electronic marketing. The rules on data export will apply when we transfer personal data to group companies or third parties outside of the EEA. For example, in 2015, the Court of Justice of the EU ruled that the U.S. EU Safe Harbor framework, 1 compliance method by which companies could transfer personal data regarding citizens of the EU to the U.S., was invalid and could no longer be relied upon. The U.S. EU Safe Harbor framework was replaced with the U.S. EU Privacy Shield framework, which is now under review and there is currently litigation challenging another EU mechanism for adequate data transfers, the standard contractual clauses. It is uncertain whether the Privacy Shield framework and or the standard contractual clauses will be similarly invalidated by the European courts. These changes may require us to find alternative bases for the compliant transfer of personal data from the EEA to the U.S. and we are monitoring developments in this area. The EU is also in the process of replacing the e Privacy Directive with a new set of rules taking the form of a regulation, which will be directly implemented in the laws of each European member state, without the need for further enactment. The current draft of the e Privacy Regulation retains strict opt in for electronic marketing and the penalties for contravention have significantly increased with fining powers to the same levels as the GDPR (i.e. the greater of 20,000,000 Euros or 4% of total global annual revenue). 86 Modifications to our products may require new regulatory clearances or approvals or expansion of the scope of our CE Certificates of Conformity with our notified body. Modifications to our products may require new regulatory clearances or approvals from FDA or other regulatory authorities or expansion of the scope of our CE Certificates of Conformity with our notified body. Even after achieving the initial market clearance, or approval from FDA or other regulatory authorities or having affixed the CE marked to a product, modifications to our systems during their life cycles may require new regulatory approvals or clearances, including 510(k) clearances, premarket approvals, the conduct of a new conformity assessment with our notified body, or foreign regulatory approvals. If we make changes or modifications to an FDA cleared or approved device, FDA requires device manufacturers to initially make and document a determination of whether or not a modification requires a new approval, supplement or clearance. A manufacturer may determine that a modification does not significantly affect safety or efficacy, and that the modification does not represent a major change in its intended use, so that no new 510(k) clearance is necessary, but rather a Letter to File is necessary. However, FDA can review a manufacturer decision and may disagree. FDA may determine that a traditional 510(k), an abbreviated 510(k), a special 510(k) clearance, or device approval is required for the device as modified. For products sold in the EU, we must notify our notified body if significant changes are made to the products or if there are substantial changes to the quality assurance systems affecting those products. We have similar obligations with Health Canada. Obtaining a new 510(k), other regulatory clearances and approvals, or a revised or new CE Certificate of Conformity can be a time consuming process, and we may not be able to obtain such clearances or approvals in a timely manner, or at all. We have made modifications to our products in the past and have determined based on our review of the applicable FDA regulations and guidance that in certain instances new 510(k) clearances or PMA approvals were not required. We may make similar modifications or add additional functionalities in the future that we believe do not require a new 510(k) clearance or approval of a PMA. FDA has issued a guidance document intended to assist manufacturers in determining whether modifications to cleared devices require the submission of a new 510(k), and such guidance has come under scrutiny in recent years, the practical impact of which is unclear. If FDA disagrees with our determination and requires us to submit new 510(k) notifications or PMA applications for modifications to our previously cleared products for which we have concluded that new clearances or approvals are unnecessary, we may be required to cease marketing or to recall the modified product until we obtain clearance or approval, which could require us to redesign our products, conduct clinical trials to support any modifications, and pay significant regulatory fines or penalties. In addition, FDA may not approve or clear our products for the indications that are necessary or desirable for successful commercialization or could require clinical trials to support any modifications. Any delay or failure in obtaining required clearances or approvals would adversely affect our ability to introduce new or enhanced products in a timely manner, which in turn would harm our future growth. Any of these actions would harm our operating results. As part of an internal review of our regulatory clearances in the U.S., we determined that Special 510(k) applications were necessary related to an earlier modification to 2 of our FDA cleared devices. Specifically, because we added to 2 of our FDA cleared devices additional FDA cleared applicators not initially considered in the device clearance submissions, we believed that Special 510(k) applications should have been filed to allow FDA to review the incorporation into the cleared devices of the separately cleared applicators. We filed 1 of the Special 510(k) submissions with FDA. FDA requested that we instead submit a Traditional 510(k) and provide additional information. We have accordingly modified the Special 510(k) submitted to FDA to a Traditional 510(k) application for this device, related to these modifications. Generally the 510(k) initial response process is 90 days, however, the overall process may extend to 180 days or more. We cannot be certain that FDA will respond to our submission in a timely manner or that clearance will be obtained. We also submitted a Traditional 510(k) for the second device and, on September 6, 2019, received 510(k) clearance from FDA. We believe that the modifications do not affect safety or efficacy, do not affect the intended use of the device, and do not alter the fundamental scientific technology of the device, however, we cannot be certain that FDA will agree with our assessment. FDA may not clear the device or may take other action against us as described above, which could have a material adverse effect on our business. 87 We are subject to restrictions on the indications for which we are permitted to market our products, and any violation of those restrictions, or marketing of systems for off label uses, could subject us to enforcement action. Our promotional materials and training methods must comply with FDA and other applicable laws and regulations, including the prohibition of the promotion of off label use in both the U.S. and in foreign countries. We train our marketing and direct sales force to not promote our systems for uses outside of FDA cleared indications for use, known as off label uses. We cannot, however, prevent a physician from using 1 of our systems off label when, in the physician independent professional medical judgment, he or she deems it appropriate. There may be increased risk of injury to patients if physicians attempt to use 1 of our systems off label. Furthermore, the use of 1 of our systems for indications other than those cleared by FDA or approved by any foreign regulatory body may not effectively treat such conditions, which could harm our reputation in the marketplace among physicians and patients. If FDA or any foreign regulatory body determines that our promotional materials or training constitute promotion of an off label use, it could request that we modify our training or promotional materials or subject us to regulatory or enforcement actions, including, among other things, the issuance or imposition of an untitled letter, a warning letter, injunction, seizure, refusal to issue new 510(k)s or PMAs, withdrawal of existing 510(k)s or PMAs, refusal to grant export approvals, and civil fines or criminal penalties. It is also possible that other federal, state or foreign enforcement authorities might take action under other regulatory authority, such as false claims laws, if they consider our business activities to constitute promotion of an off label use, which could result in significant penalties, including, but not limited to, criminal, civil and administrative penalties, damages, fines, disgorgement, exclusion from participation in government healthcare programs and the curtailment of our operations. FDA regulates the labeling of 510(k) cleared devices to make sure that the labeling complies with the cleared indications for use and no off label indication or claim is being promoted by the manufacturer. FDA also engages in market surveys to identify any devices whose intended uses include unapproved uses of the products. Devices are considered adulterated or misbranded when advertising or labeling creates a new intended use, indications for use or even a new claim. Federal laws prohibit the introduction into interstate commerce of adulterated or misbranded devices, and adulteration or misbranding violations can lead to a variety of enforcement activities in the U.S. and in foreign countries, including but not limited to large civil and criminal fines, oversight of sales and marketing practices and modifications of promotional conduct. We previously received an inquiry from FDA regarding off label or unapproved uses of the Venus Fiore on August 1, 2018. Venus Fiore is not cleared or approved in the U.S. or in jurisdictions outside of the U.S., other than Israel. Venus Fiore is marketed in Israel for aesthetic and functional treatment of the vagina, labia and mons pubis. However, we have not marketed or promoted Venus Fiore in the U.S. and explained this to the agency. We added geoblocker functionality to our website, to portray accurately what devices it is marketing in the U.S. Although we have not received subsequent inquiries regarding off label promotion, FDA may conclude that we are inappropriately promoting off label or unapproved uses for our products. If the agency brings enforcement actions, we may become subject to significant liability including criminal and civil liabilities. Off label promotion may also be treated as racketeering in civil litigation or result in expensive and time consuming lawsuits from physicians or their patients if a patient is injured by the off label use. Our systems may cause or contribute to adverse medical events that we are required to report to FDA, and if we fail to do so, we would be subject to sanctions that could harm our reputation, business, financial condition and results of operations. We are subject to FDA medical device reporting regulations and similar U.S. state and foreign regulations. FDA medical device reporting regulations require us to report to FDA when we receive or become aware of information that reasonably suggests that 1 of our systems may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or malfuncti1d in a way that, if the malfunction were to recur, it could cause or contribute to a death or serious injury. The timing of our obligation to report is triggered by the date we become aware of the adverse event as well as the nature of the event. We may fail to report adverse events of which we become aware within the prescribed timeframe. We may also fail to recognize that we have become aware of a reportable adverse event, especially if it is not reported to us as an adverse event or if it is an adverse event that is unexpected or removed in time from the use of 1 of our systems. If we fail to comply with our reporting obligations, FDA could act, including warning letters, untitled letters, administrative actions, criminal prosecution, imposition of civil m1tary penalties, revocation of our device clearance, seizure of our products or delay in clearance of future products. 88 FDA, state regulating agencies at times, and foreign regulatory bodies have the authority to require the recall of commercialized products in the event of material deficiencies or defects in design or manufacture of a product or if a product poses an unacceptable risk to health. FDA authority to require a recall must be based on a finding that there is reasonable probability that the device could cause serious injury or death. We may also choose to voluntarily recall a product if any material deficiency is found. A government mandated or voluntary recall by us could occur because of an unacceptable risk to health, comp1nt failures, malfunctions, manufacturing defects, labeling or design deficiencies, packaging defects or other deficiencies or failures to comply with applicable regulations. We cannot assure you that product defects or other errors will not occur in the future. Recalls involving any of our systems could be particularly harmful to our business, financial condition and results of operations because it is our only product. Prior to the Merger, we received a letter from FDA Center for Devices and Radiological Health (CDRH) requesting our assistance to complete an evaluation of a potential post market safety concern regarding devices used for hair restoration surgery. The letter stated that the potential safety concern is related to adverse events and possible allergic reaction after hair restoration surgery. We are fully cooperating with FDA in its evaluation and have responded to FDA questions. Companies are required to maintain certain records of recalls and corrections, even if they are not reportable to FDA. We may initiate voluntary withdrawals or corrections for any of our systems in the future that we determine do not require notification of FDA. If FDA disagrees with our determinations, it could require us to report those actions as recalls and we may be subject to enforcement action. A future recall announcement could harm our reputation with customers, potentially lead to product liability claims against us and negatively affect our sales. If we or our distributors do not obtain and maintain international regulatory registrations or approvals for our systems, our ability to market and sell our systems outside of the U.S. will be diminished. Sale of our systems, outside the U.S. are subject to foreign regulatory requirements that vary widely from country to country. In addition, FDA regulates exports of medical devices from the U.S. While the regulations of some countries may not impose barriers to marketing and selling certain of our systems or only require notification, others require that we or our distributors obtain the approval of a specified regulatory body. Complying with foreign regulatory requirements, including obtaining registrations or approvals, can be expensive and time consuming, and we cannot be certain that we or our distributors will receive regulatory approvals in each country in which we plan to market a particular system or that we will be able to do so on a timely basis. The time required to obtain registrations or approvals, if required by other countries, may be longer than that required for FDA clearance, and requirements for such registrations, clearances, or approvals may significantly differ from FDA requirements. If we modify our systems, we or our distributors may need to apply for additional regulatory approvals or other authorizations before we are permitted to sell the modified product. In addition, we may not continue to meet the quality and safety standards required to maintain the authorizations that we or our distributors have received. If we or our distributors are unable to maintain our authorizations in a particular country, we will no longer be able to sell the applicable product in that country, which could harm our business. Regulatory clearance or approval by FDA does not ensure clearance or approval by regulatory authorities in other countries, and clearance or approval by 1 or more foreign regulatory authorities does not ensure clearance or approval by regulatory authorities in other foreign countries or by FDA. However, a failure or delay in obtaining regulatory clearance or approval in 1 country may have a negative effect on the regulatory process in others. 89 Our ability to continue manufacturing and supplying our products depends on our continued adherence to ongoing FDA and other foreign regulatory authority manufacturing requirements. Our manufacturing processes and facilities are required to comply with the quality management system regulations of its target markets (i.e., FDA Quality System Regulations, or QSR, ISO 134852016, and the MDSAP). Adherence to quality management system regulations and the effectiveness of our quality management control systems are periodically assessed through internal audits and inspections of manufacturing facilities by regulatory authorities. Failure to comply with applicable quality management system requirements, or later discovery of previously unknown problems with our products or manufacturing processes, including our failure or the failure of our third party manufacturer to take satisfactory corrective action in response to an adverse quality system inspection, can result in enforcement action, which could have an adverse effect on our business. Our manufacturing process and facilities are audited annually for compliance with the last editions of QSR, ISO13485 and MDSAP requirements. FDA inspected our San Jose facility in January 2020, which audit resulted in 2 observations. We are in the process of mitigating these issues. On November 20, 2019, the Texas Department of State Health Services, or the DSHS, conducted an inspection of our Lewisville, Texas facility and identified alleged misstatements on the packaging of our Venus Skin products in violation of the Texas Health and Safety Code (Texas Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act). The DSHS issued a blanket detention of the Venus Skin inventory at the Lewisville facility until the matter is resolved. On February 12, 2020, the DSHS accepted our product re labelling proposal and agreed to release the detained inventory. FDA has not inspected our other facilities, although we expect an FDA inspection in the future. Regulating agencies, including FDA, foreign regulatory authorities, and our notified body can institute a wide variety of enforcement actions, ranging from inspectional observations to more severe sanctions such as untitled letters or warning letters; clinical holds; administrative or judicially imposed sanctions; injunctions, fines, consent decrees, or the imposition of civil penalties; customer notifications for repair, replacement, or refunds; recall, detention, or seizure of products; operating restrictions, or total or partial suspension of production or distribution; refusal by FDA, a foreign regulatory authority or the notified body to grant pending future clearance or pre market approval, or to issue CE Certificates of Conformity for our devices; debarment of us or our employees; withdrawal or suspension of marketing clearances, approvals, and CE Certificates of Conformity; refusal to permit the import or export of our products; and criminal prosecution of us or our employees. If any of these actions were to occur, it would harm our reputation and cause our system sales and profitability to suffer and may prevent us from generating revenue. Furthermore, our key comp1nt suppliers may not currently be or may not continue to be in compliance with all applicable regulatory requirements, which could result in the failure to produce our devices on a timely basis and in the required quantities, if at all. We may be subject to various federal and state laws pertaining to healthcare fraud and abuse, and any violations by us of such laws could result in fines or other penalties. While procedures utilizing our systems are not currently covered or reimbursed by any third party payor, our commercial, research and other financial relationships with healthcare providers and others may be subject to various federal and state laws intended to prevent healthcare fraud and abuse. Such laws include the U.S. federal Anti Kickback Statute and similar laws that apply to state healthcare programs, private payors and self pay patients; the U.S. federal civil and criminal false claims laws, such as the civil False Claims Act, and civil m1tary penalties laws; state and federal data privacy and security laws and regulations; state and federal physician payment transparency laws; and state and federal consumer protection and unfair competition laws. Further, these laws may impact any sales, marketing and education programs we currently have or may develop in the future and the way we implement any of those programs. Penalties for violations of these laws can include exclusion from federal healthcare programs and substantial civil and criminal penalties. 90 We may be affected by healthcare policy changes and evolving regulations. Our global regulatory environment is becoming increasingly stringent and unpredictable, which could increase the time, cost and complexity of obtaining regulatory approvals for our products, as well as the clinical and regulatory costs of supporting those approvals. Several countries that did not have regulatory requirements for medical devices have established such requirements in recent years and other countries have expanded on existing regulations. Certain regulators are exhibiting less flexibility and are requiring local preclinical and clinical data in addition to global data. While harmonization of global regulations has been pursued, requirements continue to differ significantly among countries. We expect this global regulatory environment will continue to evolve, which could impact our ability to obtain future approvals for our products or could increase the cost and time to obtain such approvals in the future. In the U.S., the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, as amended by the Health Care and Education Affordability Reconciliation Act, to which we refer collectively as the Affordable Care Act, or ACA, was enacted into law in 2010. Although most of the provisions of the ACA are now in effect, in December 2018 a federal court judge in the Northern District of Texas ruled in Texas v. Azar , or the Texas Case, that the ACA individual mandate is unconstitutional, and that the remainder of the ACA was inseverable from the individual mandate and therefore invalid. This case was appealed to the Fifth Circuit in January 2019. Because the Texas judge issued a stay of his ruling pending the appeal, the ACA continues to be in effect at this time. As a result of the passage of the ACA, an excise tax is imposed on the sale of certain medical devices by the U.S. manufacturer, producer, or importer of the device. This excise tax applies to sales of taxable medical devices beginning January 1, 2013 The excise tax equals 23% of the constructive sale price of the applicable medical device. As a U.S. based manufacturer and importer of taxable medical devices, are responsible for remitting to the federal government the excise tax on the sales of medical devices it manufactures in, or imports into, the U.S. Although this excise tax was in effect during the years 2013 2015, there was in effect a moratorium on the medical device excise tax through the end of 2019. The excise tax was repealed effective January 1, 2020. In a referendum on June 23, 2016, voters approved for the United Kingdom, or the UK, to exit the EU. On January 31, 2020, the UK departed the EU, however, there is a transition period until the end of 2020 while the UK and the EU negotiate additional arrangements. During the transition period, the current rules on trade, travel and business for the UK and the EU will continue to apply. New rules will take effect on January 1, 2021 The UK exit from the EU will have numerous consequences in all areas of the business, including, economic, regulatory, operational, and the actual impact depends on the ultimate deal reached and is very difficult to assess at this time. Changes in the industry regulations could have an effect on existing CE certificates being renewed and new certificates being issued which would impact the ability to trade; however, it is impossible to assess the full impact at this point. We are subject to environmental, health and safety laws and regulations, and must maintain licenses or permits, and non compliance with these laws, regulations, licenses, or permits may expose us to significant costs or liabilities. We are subject to numerous foreign, federal, state, and local environmental, health and safety laws and regulations relating to, among other matters, safe working conditions and environmental protection, including those governing the generation, storage, handling, use, transportation, and disposal of hazardous or potentially hazardous materials. Some of these laws and regulations require us to obtain licenses or permits to conduct its operations. Environmental laws and regulations are complex, change frequently and have tended to become more stringent over time. If we violate or fail to comply with these laws, regulations, licenses, or permits, we could be fined or otherwise sancti1d by regulators. We cannot predict the impact on its business of new or amended laws or regulations or any changes in the way existing and future laws and regulations are interpreted or enforced, nor can we ensure we will be able to obtain or maintain any required licenses or permits. 91 Recent U.S. tax legislation and future changes to applicable U.S. or foreign tax laws and regulations may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We are subject to income and other taxes in the U.S. and foreign jurisdictions. Changes in laws and policy relating to taxes or trade may have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. For example, the U.S. government recently enacted significant tax reform, and certain provisions of the new law may adversely affect us. Changes include, but are not limited to, a federal corporate tax rate decrease from 35% to 21% for tax years beginning after December 31, 2017, the transition of U.S. international taxation from a worldwide tax system to a more generally territorial system, and a 1 time transition tax on the mandatory deemed repatriation of foreign earnings. The legislation is unclear in many respects and could be subject to potential amendments and technical corrections and will be subject to interpretations and implementing regulations by the Treasury and Internal Revenue Service, any of which could mitigate or increase certain adverse effects of the legislation. In addition, it is unclear how these U.S. federal income tax changes will affect state and local taxation. Generally, future changes in applicable U.S. or foreign tax laws and regulations, or their interpretation and application could have an adverse effect on our business, financial conditions and results of operations. Risks Related to Our Operations in Israel We conduct a significant portion of our operations in Israel and therefore our business, financial condition and results of operations may be adversely affected by political, economic and military conditions in Israel. Our research and development facilities and key third party suppliers are located in northern Israel, and some of our key employees are residents of Israel. Accordingly, political, economic and military conditions in Israel may directly affect our business. Since the establishment of the State of Israel in 1948, a number of armed conflicts have taken place between Israel and its neighboring countries. Any hostilities, armed conflicts, terrorist activities or political instability involving Israel or the interruption or curtailment of trade within Israel or between Israel and its trading partners could adversely affect business conditions and have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations and could make it more difficult for us to raise capital. In recent years, these have included hostilities between Israel and Hezbollah in Lebanon, and Israel and Hamas in the Gaza Strip, both of which resulted in rockets being fired into Israel causing casualties and disruption of economic activities. In addition, Israel faces threats from more distant neighbors, in particular, Iran. In addition, hostilities, armed conflicts, terrorist activities or political instability involving Israel could have a material adverse effect on our facilities including our corporate administrative office or on the facilities of our local suppliers, in which event all or a portion of our inventory may be damaged and our ability to deliver products to customers could be significantly delayed. Certain of our executive officers and key employees reside in Israel and some may be required to perform annual military reserve duty and may be called for active duty under emergency circumstances at any time. Our operations could be disrupted by an absence for a significant period of time of 1 or more of these officers or key employees due to military service, which could adversely affect our business, results of operations and financial condition. Several countries, principally in the Middle East, restrict doing business with Israel and Israeli companies, and additional countries may impose restrictions on doing business with Israel and Israeli companies whether as a result of hostilities in the region or otherwise. Similarly, Israeli companies are limited in conducting business with entities from several countries. Such restrictions may seriously limit our revenues. Our commercial insurance does not cover losses that may occur as a result of events associated with the security situation in the Middle East, such as damages to our facilities resulting in disruption of our operations. Although the Israeli government is currently committed to covering the reinstatement value of direct damages that are caused by terrorist attacks or acts of war, there can be no assurance that this government coverage will be maintained, or if maintained, will be sufficient to compensate us fully for damages incurred. Any losses or damages incurred by us could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Any armed conflicts or political instability in the region would likely negatively affect business conditions and could harm our business, financial condition and results of operations. 92 Our operations may be affected by negative labor conditions in Israel. Strikes and work stoppages occur relatively frequently in Israel. If Israeli trade unions threaten additional strikes or work stoppages and such strikes or work stoppages occur, those may, if prolonged, have a material adverse effect on the Israeli economy and on our business, including our ability to deliver products to our customers and to receive raw materials from our suppliers in a timely manner. Risks Related to Our Common Stock Following completion of the Merger, the market price of our stock price may be volatile, and you may not be able to resell shares of our Common Stock at or above the price you paid. The market price of our Common Stock following the Merger could be subject to significant fluctuations. Some of the factors that may cause the market price of the combined company Common Stock to fluctuate include introduction of new products, services or technologies, significant contracts, commercial relationships or capital commitments by competitors; failure to meet or exceed financial and development projections the combined company may provide to the public; failure to meet or exceed the financial and development projections of the investment community; announcements of significant acquisitions, strategic collaborations, joint ventures or capital commitments by the combined company or its competitors; disputes or other developments relating to proprietary rights, including patents, litigation matters, and our ability to obtain patent protection for our technologies; additions or departures of key personnel; significant lawsuits or government investigations, including patent or stockholder litigation; if securities or industry analysts do not publish research or reports about the company business, or if they issue adverse or misleading opinions regarding our business and stock; changes in the market valuations of similar companies; general market or macroeconomic conditions; sales of Common Stock by us or our stockholders in the future; trading volume of our Common Stock; adverse publicity relating to hair restoration or other minimally invasive or non invasive medical aesthetic procedures generally, including with respect to other products in such markets; the introduction of technological innovations that compete with the products and services of the combined company; and period to period fluctuations in the combined company financial results. 93 In addition, the stock markets in general, and the markets for medical device and aesthetic stocks in particular, have experienced extreme volatility that may have been unrelated to the operating performance of the issuer. These broad market fluctuations may adversely affect the market price or liquidity of our Common Stock. In the past, when the market price of a stock has been volatile, holders of that stock have sometimes instituted securities class action litigation against the issuer. Recently, several securities class action complaints have been filed against us, certain of our current and former executive officers and directors, certain of our investors and certain underwriters in our IPO. These complaints allege violations of Sections 11, 12(a)(2) and 15 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Securities Act, due to allegedly false and misleading statements made in connection with our IPO. While we believe that these lawsuits are without merit and we intend to vigorously defend against these claims, we could incur substantial costs in defending these lawsuits and the attention of our management could be diverted from the operation of our business. Further, if more of our stockholders were to bring additional lawsuits on similar or unrelated grounds, we could incur substantial costs defending these additional lawsuits and the attention of our management would be further diverted from the operation of our business. An active market for our Common Stock may not be maintained. Our stock began trading on the Nasdaq Global Market in July 2017, but we can provide no assurance that we will be able to maintain an active trading market on the Nasdaq Global Market or any other exchange in the future. If an active market for our Common Stock does not develop or is not maintained, it may be difficult for our stockholders to sell shares without depressing the market price for the shares or at all. An inactive trading market may also impair our ability to raise capital by selling shares and may impair our ability to acquire other businesses, applications, or technologies using our shares as consideration. If equity research analysts do not publish research or reports, or publish unfavorable research or reports, about the Company, our business or our market, the Company stock price and trading volume could decline. The trading market for the Company Common Stock will be influenced by the research and reports that equity research analysts publish about us and our business. Equity research analysts may elect not to provide research coverage of our Common Stock, and such lack of research coverage may adversely affect the market price of our Common Stock. In the event that equity research analysts initiate coverage, we will not have any control over the analysts or the content and opinions included in their reports. The price of our Common Stock could decline if 1 or more equity research analysts downgrade our stock or issue other unfavorable commentary or research. If 1 or more equity research analysts ceases coverage of us or fails to publish reports on us regularly, demand for our Common Stock could decrease, which in turn could cause our stock price or trading volume to decline. We are an emerging growth company and a smaller reporting company within the meaning of the Securities Act and we have taken advantage of certain exemptions from disclosure requirements available to emerging growth companies and smaller reporting companies; this could make our securities less attractive to investors and may make it more difficult to compare our performance with other public companies. Following the Merger, we will continue to qualify as, an emerging growth company within the meaning of the Securities Act, as modified by the JOBS Act. We have taken advantage of certain exemptions from various reporting requirements that are applicable to other public companies that are not emerging growth companies or smaller reporting companies including, but not limited to, not being required to comply with the auditor attestation requirements of Section 404 of the Sarbanes Oxley Act, reduced disclosure obligations regarding executive compensation in our periodic reports and proxy statements and exemptions from the requirements of holding a nonbinding advisory vote on certain executive compensation matters and reduced reporting periods. As a result, stockholders may not have access to certain information they may deem important. We cannot predict whether investors will find our securities less attractive because we rely on these exemptions. If some investors find the securities less attractive as a result of reliance on these exemptions, the trading prices of our securities may be lower than they otherwise would be, there may be a less active trading market for our securities and the trading prices of our securities may be more volatile. 94 Further, Section 102(b)(1) of the JOBS Act exempts emerging growth companies from complying with new or revised financial accounting standards until private companies (that is, those that have not had a Securities Act registration statement declared effective or do not have a class of securities registered under the Exchange Act) are required to comply with the new or revised financial accounting standards. The JOBS Act provides that an emerging growth company can elect to opt out of the extended transition period and comply with the requirements that apply to non emerging growth companies but any such an election to opt out is irrevocable. We have elected not to opt out of such extended transition period. Accordingly, when a standard is issued or revised and it has different application dates for public or private companies, we, as an emerging growth company, could adopt the new or revised standard at the time private companies adopt the new or revised standard, unless early adoption is permitted by the standard. We intend to continue to use private company adoption dates for ASC 842, Leases. This may make comparison of us with another public company which is neither an emerging growth company nor an emerging growth company which has opted out of using the extended transition period difficult or impossible because of the potential differences in accounting standards used. If we sell shares of our Common Stock in future financings, stockholders may experience immediate dilution and, as a result, our stock price may decline. We may from time to time issue additional shares of Common Stock at a discount from the current market price of our Common Stock. As a result, our stockholders would experience immediate dilution upon the purchase of any shares of our Common Stock sold at such discount. In addition, as opportunities present themselves, we may enter into financing or similar arrangements in the future, including the issuance of debt securities, preferred stock or Common Stock. If we issue Common Stock or securities convertible into Common Stock, our common stockholders would experience additional dilution and, as a result, our stock price may decline. Because the Merger resulted in an ownership change under Section 382 of the Code for Restoration Robotics, Restoration Robotics pre merger net operating loss carryforwards and certain other tax attributes will be subject to limitation or elimination. The net operating loss carryforwards and certain other tax attributes of Venus Concept Ltd. and of the combined company may also be subject to limitations as a result of ownership changes. Restoration Robotics incurred substantial losses during its history and carried forward significant net operating losses, or NOLs, to offset future taxable income, if any, until such unused losses expire. To the extent that we continue to generate taxable losses, unused losses will carry forward to offset future taxable income, if any, until such unused losses expire. If a corporation undergoes an ownership change within the meaning of Section 382 of the Code, the corporation net operating loss carryforwards and certain other tax attributes arising before the ownership change are subject to limitations on use after the ownership change. In general, an ownership change occurs if there is a cumulative change in the corporation equity ownership by certain stockholders that exceeds 50 percentage points by value over a rolling 3 year period. Similar rules may apply under applicable state income tax laws. The Merger resulted in an ownership change for Restoration Robotics and, accordingly, Restoration Robotics net operating loss carryforwards and certain other tax attributes will be subject to limitation and possibly elimination after the Merger. The Merger may limit our net operating loss carryforwards and certain other tax attributes. Additional ownership changes in the future could result in additional limitations on our net operating loss carryforwards and certain other tax attributes. Consequently, even if the combined company achieves profitability, it may not be able to utilize a material portion of the predecessor companies or the combined company net operating loss carryforwards and certain other tax attributes, which could have a material adverse effect on cash flow and results of operations. We do not intend to pay dividends on our Common Stock, and, consequently, our stockholders ability to achieve a return on their investment will depend on appreciation in the price of our Common Stock. We do not intend to pay any cash dividends on our Common Stock for the foreseeable future. We intend to invest our future earnings, if any, to fund our growth. Payment of future cash dividends, if any, will be at the discretion of the board of directors, subject to applicable law and will depend on various factors, including our financial condition, operating results, current and anticipated cash needs, the requirements of current or then existing debt instruments and other factors the board of directors deems relevant. Therefore, our stockholders are not likely to receive any dividends on their Common Stock for the foreseeable future. Since we do not intend to pay dividends, our stockholders ability to receive a return on their investment will depend on any future appreciation in the market value of our Common Stock. There is no guarantee that our Common Stock will appreciate or even maintain the price at which our stockholders have purchased it. The terms of our credit facilities limit our ability to pay dividends. 95 Provisions in our charter documents and under Delaware law could make an acquisition us more difficult and may discourage any takeover attempts the company stockholders may consider favorable, and may lead to entrenchment of management. Provisions of our amended and restated certificate of incorporation and amended and restated bylaws could delay or prevent changes in control or changes in management without the consent of the board of directors. These provisions will include the following a classified board of directors with 3 year staggered terms, which may delay the ability of stockholders to change the membership of a majority of the board of directors; no cumulative voting in the election of directors, which limits the ability of minority stockholders to elect director candidates; the exclusive right of the board of directors to elect a director to fill a vacancy created by the expansion of the board of directors or the resignation, death or removal of a director, which prevents stockholders from being able to fill vacancies on the board of directors; the ability of the board of directors to authorize the issuance of shares of preferred stock and to determine the price and other terms of those shares, including preferences and voting rights, without stockholder approval, which could be used to significantly dilute the ownership of a hostile acquirer; the ability of the board of directors to alter its bylaws without obtaining stockholder approval; the required approval of at least 66 2 3 % of the shares entitled to vote at an election of directors to adopt, amend or repeal its bylaws or repeal the provisions of the amended and restated certificate of incorporation regarding the election and removal of directors; a prohibition on stockholder action by written consent, which forces stockholder action to be taken at an annual or special meeting of the stockholders; the requirement that a special meeting of stockholders may be called only by the chairman of the board of directors, the chief executive officer, the president or the board of directors, which may delay the ability of the stockholders to force consideration of a proposal or to act, including the removal of directors; and advance notice procedures that stockholders must comply with in order to nominate candidates to the board of directors or to propose matters to be acted upon at a stockholders meeting, which may discourage or deter a potential acquirer from conducting a solicitation of proxies to elect the acquirer own slate of directors or otherwise attempting to obtain control of the combined company. These provisions would apply even we were to receive an offer that some stockholders may consider beneficial. We are also be subject to the anti takeover provisions contained in Section 203 of the Delaware General Corporation Law, or the DGCL, or Section 203 Under Section 203, a corporation may not, in general, engage in a business combination with any holder of 15% or more of its capital stock unless the holder has held the stock for 3 years or, among other exceptions, the board of directors has approved the transaction. 96 Our certificate of incorporation provides that the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware is the exclusive forum for substantially all disputes between us and our stockholders, which could limit our stockholders ability to obtain a favorable judicial forum for disputes with us or our directors, officers or other employees. Our certificate of incorporation provides that the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware is the sole and exclusive forum for any derivative action or proceeding brought on our behalf, any action asserting a breach of fiduciary duty owed by any of our directors, officers or other employees to us or ours stockholders, any action asserting a claim against us arising pursuant to any provisions of the DGCL, our certificate of incorporation or our bylaws, or any action asserting a claim against we that are governed by the internal affairs doctrine; provided that, the exclusive forum provision will not apply to suits brought to enforce any liability or duty created by the Exchange Act or any other claim for which the federal courts have exclusive jurisdiction. Our certificate of incorporation also provides that the federal district courts of the United States of America shall be the exclusive forum for the resolution of any complaint asserting a cause of action arising under the Securities Act. However, the enforceability of similar federal court choice of forum provisions in other companies certificates of incorporation has been challenged in legal proceedings, and it is possible that a court could find this type of provision to be inapplicable or unenforceable. If a court were to find the federal choice of forum provision contained in our amended and restated certificate of incorporation to be inapplicable or unenforceable in an action, we may incur additional costs associated with resolving such action in other jurisdictions. The choice of forum provisions may limit a stockholder ability to bring a claim in a judicial forum that it finds favorable for disputes with the combined company or its directors, officers or other employees, which may discourage such lawsuits against the combined company and its directors, officers and other employees. Claims for indemnification by our directors and officers may reduce our available funds to satisfy successful third party claims against us and may reduce the amount of m1y available to us. Our amended and restated certificate of incorporation and amended and restated bylaws provide that we will indemnify our directors and officers, in each case to the fullest extent permitted by Delaware law. In addition, as permitted by Section 145 of the DGCL, our amended and restated bylaws and our indemnification agreements that we have entered into with our directors and officers provide that we will indemnify our directors and officers for serving us in those capacities or for serving other business enterprises at our request, to the fullest extent permitted by Delaware law. Delaware law provides that a corporation may indemnify such person if such person acted in good faith and in a manner such person reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the registrant and, with respect to any criminal proceeding, had no reasonable cause to believe such person conduct was unlawful; we may, in our discretion, indemnify employees and agents in those circumstances where indemnification is permitted by applicable law; we are required to advance expenses, as incurred, to our directors and officers in connection with defending a proceeding, except that such directors or officers shall undertake to repay such advances if it is ultimately determined that such person is not entitled to indemnification; we will not be obligated pursuant to our amended and restated bylaws to indemnify a person with respect to proceedings initiated by that person against us or our other indemnitees, except with respect to proceedings authorized by our board of directors or brought to enforce a right to indemnification; 97 the rights conferred in our amended and restated bylaws are not exclusive, and we are authorized to enter into indemnification agreements with our directors, officers, employees and agents and to obtain insurance to indemnify such persons; and we may not retroactively amend our amended and restated bylaw provisions to reduce our indemnification obligations to directors, officers, employees and agents. Our executive officers, directors and certain of our shareholders who are affiliated with our directors will have the ability to control or significantly influence all matters submitted to our stockholders for approval. As of December 31, 2019, our executive officers, directors and certain of our shareholders who are affiliated with our directors, in the aggregate, beneficially own approximately 621% of our outstanding shares of Common Stock. As a result, if these stockholders were to choose to act together, they would be able to control or significantly influence all matters submitted to our stockholders for approval, as well as our management and affairs. For example, if they choose to act together, these persons would control or significantly influence the election of directors and approval of any merger, consolidation or sale of all or substantially all of our assets. Within this group, EW Healthcare and its affiliates own approximately 235%, HealthQuest and its affiliates own approximately 134% and Longitude Venture Partners II, L.P and its affiliates own approximately 123% and respectively, of our outstanding shares. This concentration of voting power could delay or prevent an acquisition of the Company on terms that other stockholders may desire. Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments. N1 Item 2 Item 2 Properties.
